Foreword
The way we use money in the United Kingdom is changing, bringing fresh opportunities and 
new considerations for public policy.
Banknotes, issued by the Bank of England, are being used less frequently by households 
and businesses. New technologies are allowing for the emergence of new forms of digital 
money, and new ways and devices to pay with it. International developments have the 
potential to affect the UK domestically and as a global leader in finance.
Ensuring that public trust in money remains high, and that our modern forms of money and 
payments meet the evolving needs of individuals and businesses, are fundamental 
responsibilities of the Government and the Bank of England. We are determined that the UK 
should remain at the forefront of innovation in money, payments and financial services. This 
is part of the Government’s vision for a technologically advanced, sustainable, and open
financial services sector that is globally competitive and acts in the interests of communities 
and citizens, creating jobs, supporting businesses, and powering growth across all four 
nations of the UK.
A UK central bank digital currency – a ‘digital pound’ – would be a new form of digital money 
for use by households and businesses for their everyday payments needs. As part of the 
wider landscape of money and payments it would sit alongside, not replace, cash – a digital 
counterpart to familiar, trusted banknotes and coins, subject to rigorous standards of privacy 
and data protection. A digital pound would help to ensure that central bank money remains 
available and useful in an ever more digital economy, continuing to bolster UK monetary and 
financial stability while safeguarding the UK’s monetary sovereignty in a changing global 
financial system. It could provide a platform for private sector innovation, promoting further 
choice, competition, efficiency and innovation in payments. It could also have further benefits 
for the resilience and functionality of payments in the UK.
On the basis of our work to date, the Bank of England and HM Treasury judge that it is likely 
a digital pound will be needed in the future. It is too early to commit to build the infrastructure 
for one, but we are convinced that further preparatory work is justified. 
Any future digital pound would be a major piece of national infrastructure which would likely 
take several years to complete. Its launch would require deep public trust in this new form of 
money – trust that their money would remain safe, accessible, and private. The journey 
towards issuing any digital pound therefore necessarily involves an open, national 
conversation about the future of our money, in parallel with detailed technical consideration 
by experts across the UK public authorities, and informed by evolving market trends. 
Page 6
This consultation – issued jointly by HM Treasury and the Bank of England – opens that 
conversation and seeks to begin to build that foundation of public trust. It seeks feedback on 
the policy and technical work undertaken so far in order to inform a future decision on 
whether or not to progress to building and launching a digital pound and on our current 
proposal for its form and functions which will be taken forward in the next stage. It commits 
us to progressing the next stage of technical and policy work needed to underpin such a 
decision. This paper is being issued alongside a Technology Working Paper from the Bank 
of England, exploring the many technology challenges involved in a digital pound.
In the coming four-month consultation period, HM Treasury and the Bank of England will 
engage extensively across the UK to seek views on a potential digital pound. Responses to 
the consultation are invited from all interested members of the public, experts, and the widest 
range of organisations.
At this exciting time of change in money and payments, this consultation is a vital step 
in positioning the UK to act decisively by introducing a digital pound, should we 
choose to do so.
Rt Hon Jeremy Hunt MP, Chancellor of the Exchequer
Andrew Bailey, Governor of the Bank of England
Page 7
Part A: Our proposal for the digital pound
The Bank of England and HM Treasury judge it likely that a digital pound will be 
needed in the future. It is too early to decide whether to build the infrastructure for 
one, but we are convinced the next stage of preparatory work is justified. 
A digital pound would be a retail central bank digital currency (CBDC) – digital money for use 
by households and businesses for their everyday payments, issued by the central bank, the 
Bank of England. The Bank of England (the Bank) and His Majesty’s Treasury (HM Treasury) 
plan to accelerate our work on the technology and policy architecture for a digital pound.
A significant factor in determining whether the digital pound is needed will be how the 
payments landscape evolves in coming years, both in the UK and abroad. In particular,
whether new forms of privately-issued digital money emerge and how they interact with 
existing forms of money and payments. International developments in the provision of 
CBDCs by other countries, and their potential to affect the UK domestically and as a global 
leader in finance, will also be important.
At this stage, we judge that it is likely that the digital pound will be needed in the future and 
that it would offer benefits. As set out in more detail in Part B, the digital pound would 
maintain public access to retail central bank money, thereby anchoring trust in the monetary 
system in a more digitalised world and underpinning monetary and financial stability. Also, as 
our lifestyles and the economy become ever more digital, it would, through partnership with 
the private sector, promote innovation, choice and efficiency in domestic payments, thereby 
boosting the UK economy, supporting growth and financial inclusion.
It is too early to take the decision on whether to introduce the digital pound. That decision will 
be made in coming years taking account of developments in money and payments and
based on our findings as we investigate further the operational features and technology
needed to deliver a digital pound. For now, the Bank and HM Treasury’s priority is to step up 
development work, build the necessary skills and put in place the technical capability to 
introduce the digital pound in a timely manner, should a decision be made in future to do so.
The introduction of a digital pound would be a major public and private sector infrastructure 
project. It would take several years.
Over the next stage of our work, we will work with the private sector to explore potential
technology solutions and undertake experiments to inform any future implementation. 
Page 8
This stepping up in our development work and collaboration with the private sector will, in 
itself, support future development of the digital economy. And as we intensify our work, and 
as payments and the digital economy evolve, we will maintain a dialogue with all 
stakeholders, including firms – large and small, new and established – to ensure the digital 
pound’s design meets their needs.
In this Consultation Paper (CP), we are consulting on a proposal for a retail CBDC, designed 
for everyday payments by households and businesses. That contrasts with a ‘wholesale 
CBDC’, which would be used to settle high-value payments between financial firms. The 
concept of a wholesale CBDC is discussed in a box in Part D of this paper, alongside the 
Bank’s work with industry to enhance wholesale payments through RTGS renewal and the 
RTGS future roadmap. 
We are exploring a digital pound because money and payments are changing.1
Individuals and businesses in the UK use two main forms of money for day-to-day spending –
private money, issued by commercial banks, and public money, issued by the Bank of 
England. ‘Private money’ is typically a claim on a private commercial bank in the form of bank 
deposits held by households or businesses. This private money is underpinned by the 
regulation and supervision of commercial banks. ‘Public money’ or ‘central bank money’, by 
contrast, is issued by the Bank of England. It is currently available to the public only in the 
form of physical cash.2 Central bank money is financially risk-free in the sense that there is 
no credit, market or liquidity risk.3
Historically, the majority of payments have been made in cash. However, digital innovation is 
changing the way we pay. With the convenience of card, app, and digital wallet payment 
systems, the use of electronic payments has accelerated. In 2021, card payments accounted 
for close to 60% of UK payments (Chart A.1) and 32% of all payments were contactless.4
Almost a third of retail sales were made online and about 9 in 10 adults own a smartphone, 
which can be used to make digital payments, including in-store.5
1 Forms of money in use now, and in prospect, are discussed in Box B.
2 The Royal Mint issues coins which can also be considered ‘public money’. Deposits held at the central bank 
(reserves) are also public money: they exist in digital form but are only available to certain financial institutions.
3 Throughout this Paper, we refer to central bank money as ‘financially risk free’ to reflect the absence of these 
risks. Operational risks, including those related to the security and resilience of CBDC infrastructure, and the 
role of ‘Payment Interface Providers’ are considered further in Part D.
4 UK Finance (2022) – UK Payment Markets Summary. 
5 See ONS and Ofcom (2022) – Online Nation 2022.
Page 9
As a result of these innovations, the balance of public and private money used to make 
payments has shifted. Around 95% of the funds held by individuals to make UK payments 
today are private money, held as commercial bank deposits, and typically spent 
electronically, such as by bank transfer or debit card.6 As spending has become more digital, 
the use of cash for payments has declined, falling from 55% of transactions to 15% over the 
past decade.7
Chart A.1: Cash payments have declined while card use has accelerated (a)
Sources: UK Finance and Bank calculations.
(a) Payment volumes (millions). Cards comprises debit card and credit/charge/purchasing card.
New services and technologies are emerging in money and payments. Some examples are
embedded finance, blockchain technology, smart contracts and decentralised finance (Box 
A). These are often being developed by firms outside of the traditional financial sector, which 
brings new entrants into payments markets. New functionalities can support novel use cases 
and features, which are already starting to emerge in wholesale and business-to-business 
payments. Going forward, were a digital pound introduced, private sector Payment Interface 
Providers (PIPs) in the digital pound ecosystem would be able to leverage such new 
functionalities to provide innovative services in retail payments to end users.
6 Cunliffe (2021) – Do we need 'public money’?
7 UK Finance (2022) – UK Payment Markets Summary. 
Page 10
Cash, of course, remains vital for many. Around 1.2 million UK adults do not have a bank 
account and around one fifth of people name cash as their preferred payment method.8 Cash 
remains important to a large cross-section of society. Even those who do not use it regularly
consider it an important back up form of payment. For those reasons, UK authorities are 
committed to ensuring continued access to cash. Measures to protect retail access to cash, 
and the supporting wholesale distribution services, are being introduced in the Financial 
Services and Markets Bill.9 But while we ensure continued access to cash, we also have to 
recognise that it cannot be used in digital transactions, which are becoming an increasingly 
important part of daily life.
If current trends continue, the public’s access to, or use of, central bank money will diminish 
and the monetary system could become fragmented, posing a risk to monetary and financial 
stability. The payments landscape could also become concentrated if firms’ use of new 
technologies in money issuance results in dominance by a small number of them. That would 
pose a risk to competition and diminish the incentives for longer-term innovation.
Considering these payment trends, we judge there is likely to be a benefit from the Bank 
issuing a digital form of retail central bank money. It would support the safety and 
interchangeability of money, as well as encourage choice, competition and innovation. The 
digital pound would complement banknotes and ensure that the Bank continues to provide 
money that is relevant to the way people choose to pay, both today and in the future. It would 
also coexist with and complement both existing and new forms of private digital money.
The future payments landscape in the UK will not only reflect these developments in retail
payments (for households and businesses) and the likely need for a digital pound. There will 
also be evolution in wholesale payments (high-value payments, typically between financial 
institutions). The Bank already provides central bank money in electronic form for wholesale 
settlement through its Real-Time Gross Settlement (RTGS) service. The Bank is improving 
this service through a transformational programme of RTGS Renewal. This will include a new 
core settlement engine to enable a range of new functionalities and capabilities to promote 
more efficient wholesale settlement. It would be able to interact with a broader set of actors 
and technologies. The Bank will continue to engage with the global central banking 
community to monitor and learn from the wide range of experiments, including those using 
new technologies, being conducted internationally.10
8 FCA (2020) – Financial Lives Survey.
9 UK Parliament (2023) – Financial Services and Markets Bill. 
10 There is significant international experimentation around wholesale settlement. These projects have sought to 
innovate and enhance domestic interbank settlement (for example, early stages of Project Jasper and Project 
Ubin), securities settlement (for example, Project Helvetia) and cross-border payments (for example, Project 
Jasper-Ubin, Project Inthanon-LionRock and Project Dunbar). Project Meridian, run by the London Centre 
of the BIS Innovation Hub, seeks to develop a prototype synchronisation operator to connect counterparties and 
co-ordinate settlement directly in central bank money. 
Page 11
The digital pound
The digital pound would provide a public platform for private sector innovation.
The digital pound system would be a public-private partnership. The private sector would play 
a crucial role in offering innovative and user-friendly services.
The Bank would issue the digital pound. This means it would be a direct claim on the Bank, 
as cash is today. It would be denominated in sterling, the currency of the UK, and £10 of 
digital pounds would always have the same value as, and be interchangeable with, a £10 
banknote. 
The Bank would provide the digital pound and the central infrastructure, including the ‘core 
ledger’. Private sector companies – which could be banks or approved non-bank firms –
would be able to integrate into the central digital pound infrastructure and provide the 
interface between the Bank and users. They would do this by offering digital ‘pass-through’ 
wallets to end users. The wallets could be integrated into their other services. They are 
known as ‘pass-through’ wallets (hereafter referred to simply as ‘wallets’) because the user’s 
holdings of digital pounds are recorded anonymously on the Bank’s core ledger, in order to 
safeguard their privacy, and the wallet simply passes instructions from the user to the core 
ledger. End-users would interact with these wallets rather than directly with the Bank.
Page 12
Users would interact with digital pounds by using their wallet to see their balance and instruct 
payments and transfers of digital pounds. It is likely most people would access the wallet via 
their smartphone, but there would be alternative options, such as a smart card.
We call this approach the ‘platform model’. It plays to the respective strengths of the public 
and private sectors, and we judge it the most efficient mechanism to deliver the digital pound 
in a way that also catalyses innovation. 
Firms providing wallets would be regulated to ensure payments using digital pounds are 
resilient, reliable, and compatible with other payments. HM Treasury and relevant regulatory 
authorities would consult on the details of a regulatory regime in future. Standards for 
participating firms would be set in such a way that encourages a competitive and innovative 
ecosystem. 
To support trust and confidence, the digital pound would be subject to rigorous standards of 
privacy and data protection. Digital payments account for the majority of transactions today. 
These generate personal data which is held by users’ payment providers, such as banks, to 
identify users in order to prevent fraud, money laundering and the financing of terrorism. Like 
current digital payments, the digital pound would not be anonymous because the ability to 
identify and verify users is needed to prevent financial crime.
Recognising, however, the fundamental importance of trust, the digital pound would be at 
least as private as current forms of digital money, such as bank accounts. Digital pound 
users would be able to make choices about the way their data is used. Therefore, our 
proposal for the digital pound envisages that Payment Interface Providers would identify and 
verify users, but anonymise personal data before any sharing with the Bank. 
As a result, the identity of users would only be known to their Payment Interface Provider, 
and neither the Government nor the Bank would have access to digital pound users’ personal 
data, except for law enforcement agencies under limited circumstances prescribed in law and 
on the same basis as currently with other digital payments and bank accounts more 
generally. 
Page 13
The digital pound would be designed to support the Government’s and Bank’s 
commitments to mitigate climate change. 
The Government is committed to reaching net zero greenhouse gas emissions by 2050, as 
part of a wider strategy of managing, and mitigating, the impacts of climate change.11
The digital pound would be designed to be consistent with this commitment. While the digital 
pound would be a new form of digital money, it would be fundamentally different to a 
cryptoasset and would therefore not make use of the same energy-intensive technologies 
that underpin some cryptoassets.12
The digital pound would be used like a digital banknote.
The digital pound would be used like a digital banknote. It would be designed for everyday 
payments – both in-person and online – and would be a direct claim on the Bank. Like a 
physical banknote, and many current accounts, no interest would be paid on a digital pound. 
This makes it useful for everyday payments but not designed or intended for savings.
It should be seamless to exchange digital pounds for cash and bank deposits and vice versa. 
This would enable people to move money between accounts: £10 of cash or bank deposits 
could be exchanged for £10 of digital pounds and £10 of digital pounds could be exchanged 
for £10 of bank deposits or cash. If new, non-bank forms of payment such as stablecoins
emerge, they would be required to be exchangeable with the digital pound.
Although a digital pound would be designed with UK users in mind, it would be available to 
non-UK residents too. 
The digital pound would not replicate physical cash in every respect.
There would be some important differences with physical cash.
A digital pound would have the same (or stronger) privacy protections as bank accounts, 
debit cards or cheques. Individuals’ personal details would be known to their private sector 
wallet provider in the same way they are for bank account providers today (and subject to the 
same privacy protections). But individuals’ personal details would not be known by the 
Government or the Bank of England.
By providing the same privacy as most of the money we use, the digital pound would be 
designed to protect against fraud and counterfeiting, while not facilitating financial crime.
11 The Bank remains on track to meet its 2030 target to reduce absolute greenhouse gas emissions by 63% 
from 2016 to 2030. The Bank has committed to reduce emissions from its physical operations to net-zero by 
2050 at the latest and aims to publish its net-zero transition plan as part of next year’s climate disclosure. Bank 
of England (2022) – The Bank of England's climate-related financial disclosure 2022.
12 Blockchains which use a ‘proof of stake’ consensus mechanism are less energy intensive than those which 
use ‘proof of work’.
Page 14
The Bank and HM Treasury would welcome views on this approach to privacy. Further 
information on data and privacy can be found in Section D.2.
Unlike cash, the amount of digital pounds an individual or business could hold would be
subject to some restrictions, during an introductory period at least. This would ensure a
smooth introduction without unintended consequences for monetary or financial stability. 
Those restrictions would still enable individuals to use the digital pound for their everyday 
transactions, including receiving their pay. It would be for a further decision, in the light of 
experience, whether those restrictions should be made permanent.
Next steps
The Bank and HM Treasury consider a digital pound is likely to be needed in the UK 
though no decision to introduce one can be taken at this stage. We will therefore step 
up development and move to the next stage of our work.
This CP, and the Bank’s accompanying Technology Working Paper are the conclusion of 
the ‘research and exploration’ phase of our work on the digital pound – Phase 1 of our digital 
pound roadmap (Diagram A.2). We will now move to Phase 2, to develop further, in both
technology and policy terms, the model for the digital pound set out in Part D, upon which we 
are consulting. 
This work in Phase 2, the ‘design’ phase, will enable us to respond to developments in the 
payments landscape and materially reduce the lead time if there is a future decision to 
introduce a digital pound in the future. It will involve investment in the Bank’s technology 
capabilities, and an ambitious approach to the technology roadmap and collaboration with the 
private sector.
By the end of the design phase we will have evaluated comprehensively the 
technological feasibility of a digital pound, determined the optimal design and 
technology architecture, and supported business model innovation through 
knowledge sharing and collaboration between the private and public sectors.
Consistent with our objective of stepping up the development of a digital pound, and 
positioning the authorities to respond to developments in the payments landscape, our aims 
for Phase 2 – the design phase – are to:
Page 15
• Cut lead-times on development and equip ourselves with the knowledge and 
capabilities to move into a ‘build’ phase, should there be a decision to introduce a 
digital pound.
• Determine the technological feasibility and investment needed to build a digital pound.
• Articulate, in detail, what the technology and operational architecture for a digital 
pound would look like.
• Assess and evaluate the benefits and costs of the digital pound architecture.
• Deepen the Bank’s knowledge of CBDC technology and the private sector’s
understanding of our technology approach.
• Support the development of the broader UK digital currency technology industry 
through experimentation and proofs of concept.
• Provide the basis for a future decision on whether to introduce a digital pound and 
move to a ‘build’ phase.
Consistent with these aims, the design phase will have two focus areas, both aiming 
to accelerate development of a digital pound (Diagram A.2).
The first objective of the design phase is to develop a comprehensive, conceptual 
architecture that could be used as the blueprint for construction of a digital pound should we 
decide in the future to proceed to a ‘build’ phase. This will require us to set out in detail the 
comprehensive and precise requirements for digital pound technology and the commercial 
and operational implications of the digital pound.
The second objective is experimentation and proofs of concept – in collaboration with private 
sector innovators – to inform the development of our potential architecture and to build both 
the Bank’s and the private sector’s digital currency technology know-how. The Bank will 
operate an open and transparent process for participation in proof-of-concept work and share 
the lessons learned from those experiments.
The design phase will present opportunities for business model innovation and 
technology capability in the UK fintech sector, benefits we expect to endure even if 
we do not build a digital pound.
Technologies for a digital pound are also relevant to privately-issued digital money, such as 
stablecoins. By partnering with the private sector on proofs of concept and experiments, the 
Bank and HM Treasury seek to catalyse private innovation in digital currency technologies, 
encourage innovative digital money business models, and support knowledge sharing across 
the UK fintech sector. The design work will also benefit the Bank by informing our
assessment of the economic benefits and the risks to financial stability of technologies 
supporting new forms of private digital money. Given our expectation that digital currency 
technologies will be significant in shaping the future of finance, the benefits of the design 
phase are expected to endure even if we do not build a digital pound.
Page 16
Like the research and exploration phase, the costs associated with the design phase will be 
funded by the Cash Ratio Deposit (CRD) scheme, which is used to fund the Bank’s policy 
work, and thereafter by the new Bank of England Levy, which will replace the CRD scheme in 
future. No decision has been taken yet on whether to build or introduce a digital pound, and 
therefore the funding arrangement for any such build phase is still to be decided.
After the design phase, there will be a decision on whether to build a digital pound. 
On completion of the design phase, following further consultation, and in light of the evolution 
in payments, the Bank and the Government will decide whether to proceed to build a digital 
pound (Diagram A.2). Work undertaken during the design phase would help to generate 
evidence to support a thorough evaluation of benefits and costs.
If we decide to move into a build phase, it would involve developing a prototype digital pound
technology in a simulated environment, before moving to live pilot tests. A digital pound
would only be launched if, among other things, it met our exacting standards for security, 
resilience, and performance.
Page 17
Diagram A.2: The indicative digital pound roadmap has three phases
A decision on whether or not to proceed to a build phase would be made at the end of 
the design phase, around the middle of the decade. This work will shorten the lead 
time for the introduction of a digital pound, which would be in the second half of the 
decade.
The digital pound would be major national infrastructure and would require significant 
investment. Any decision on whether to build it would require extensive evidence and public 
engagement. The legal basis for the digital pound will be determined alongside consideration 
of its design.
Page 18
Proceeding to the design phase now will enable a digital pound to be introduced in the 
second half of the decade. It would take time to build infrastructure that is secure, resilient, 
and high performing. Experience from overseas digital currency projects, and from digital 
innovation more generally, indicates that building user familiarity and understanding, and 
ensuring that innovative and customer-friendly applications emerge will be critical to success. 
We will engage stakeholders extensively and be transparent about our work.
Transparency around our work, and engagement with a diverse group of stakeholders, will be 
more important than ever in the design phase. We will build upon our approach to date, 
including our Engagement and Technology Forums. We will also continue engagement 
with civil society, academics, technologists, and stakeholders across the UK as well as 
internationally.
This Consultation Paper seeks views on the key features of the model we intend to 
take forward in the next phase.
This CP consults on the proposed design for a digital pound, given our primary motivations.
The remainder of this paper is structured as follows. Part B sets out why there is likely to be a 
need for the digital pound. Part C sets out the implications of the digital pound for the Bank’s 
objectives of monetary and financial stability. Part D sets out the detailed model of the digital 
pound that we propose, subject to consultation, to develop further in the next stage of our 
work.
Page 19
Box A: New technologies and payments functionalities 
Over recent years, new services and technologies have emerged in money and 
payments. They are typically being developed and deployed by firms who are outside 
the traditional financial sector, bringing a range of new entrants into payments markets.
These technologies are enabling new services and functionalities in digital payments, 
supporting novel use cases and features. These functionalities are already starting to 
permeate the markets for wholesale and business-to-business payments, supporting 
new business models and improved efficiencies.
In time, these technologies could also improve retail payments. Private firms who would 
provide services to digital pound users may be able to leverage some of these 
innovations. The accompanying Technology Working Paper explores how some of 
these technology trends might be applicable in the design of a digital pound.
Embedded finance is an innovation that could shape the retail payments experience. 
This is where financial services, and in particular payments, are integrated into another 
industry’s service, function or feature. Examples include, ‘one-click’ purchases of goods 
via social media platforms, ‘in-game’ payments or, in the future, marketplaces and 
transactions in the metaverse. Embedded finance is also often associated with 
‘super-apps’, mobile apps which offer a one-stop shop for a wide array of products and 
services in a single, seamless, platform.
Blockchain technology, which underpins many cryptoassets (for example Bitcoin) also 
represents a major innovation. This introduced digital assets supported and distributed 
in a peer-to-peer fashion, backed by cryptography alone and stored on an immutable
distributed ledger. 
Smart contracts automate business logic based on pre-determined terms and 
conditions. The concept pre-dates the emergence of Blockchain and is not exclusive to 
any specific technology, but their use has been popularised recently by permissionless 
blockchain technologies such as Ethereum.
Developments in smart contracts have led a trend towards 24/7, ‘always on’, automated 
markets and products, and a wider world of decentralised finance, or ‘DeFi’. DeFi 
applications use a combination of these technologies, including blockchain and smart 
contracts, to enable users to buy, swap, sell and settle crypto products without reliance 
on central intermediaries or institutions. 
Atomic swaps, where the transfer of assets is linked to ensure that the transfer of one 
asset occurs if and only if the transfer of another asset also occurs, have also seen a 
rise in popularity. They are currently used in some traditional financial transactions to
remove settlement risk and reduce liquidity inefficiencies. The Bank is already exploring 
atomic swaps and settlement in the wholesale market through its work on 
synchronisation operators as part of our RTGS Renewal programme.
Page 20
The pseudonymous and public nature of permissionless blockchains has also spurred 
research and innovation in cryptography. That is particularly prominent in 
Privacy-Enhancing Technologies such as zero knowledge proofs. These can minimise 
the risk of personal data exposure and maximise data security. These techniques are 
not just applicable to blockchain and Distributed Ledger Technology (DLT), but to 
centralised applications as well. 
Innovative cryptography can also be used in novel digital identity solutions. Those can 
enable users to prove their identity, or an attribute of their identity (for example that they 
are over 18), without having to share all the personal identity data in an ID document. 
The role of digital identity in the future digital economy could server to generate further 
efficiencies and improve KYC and AML processes.
Page 21
Box B: Forms of money in use now, and in prospect
To serve its important role in society, money must satisfy three criteria: it must 
be a store of value, a medium of exchange and a unit of account. 
Most money today is a kind of IOU (or promise to pay) that is special in that it is widely 
trusted and therefore performs important social and economic functions. It serves as: (a) 
a store of value with which to transfer purchasing power from today to the future; (b) a 
medium of exchange with which to make payments for goods and services, and (c) a 
unit of account with which to measure the value of all other goods, services, and 
financial assets.13
There are several forms of regulated money in the UK monetary system.
‘Public money’ or ‘central bank money’ is issued by the Bank of England. It is currently 
available to the public in the form of physical cash.14 Central bank money is financially 
risk-free in the sense that credit, market and liquidity risks are absent. ‘Private money’, 
by contrast, is typically a claim on a regulated private commercial bank, in the form of 
digital bank deposits held by households or businesses (Table A.3).
Looking ahead, new forms of money such as ‘stablecoins’ could provide money-like 
instruments. But it is important that risks are managed robustly. The Financial Policy 
Committee (FPC) has set out two expectations that stablecoins must meet to be used as 
money-like instruments in systemic payments chains. The first expectation states that 
payment chains that use stablecoins should be regulated to standards equivalent to 
those applied to traditional payments chains. The second expectation states that 
stablecoins used as a money-like instrument should have standards equivalent to those 
that apply for commercial bank money in relation to stability of value, robustness of legal 
claim and the ability to redeem at par in fiat.
Stablecoins issued by non-banks could be offered under a tailored regulatory regime 
proposed by HM Treasury in the future.15 The Financial Services and Markets Bill, 
currently in Parliament, seeks to address regulation of certain payment systems and 
related firms that use ‘digital settlement assets’, drawing on the current Bank of England 
and Financial Conduct Authority (FCA) regulatory regimes for e-money and payments 
systems to cover the use of stablecoins. The interaction between the digital pound and 
systemic stablecoins is discussed in Box E.
13 See McLeay et al (2014) – Money in the modern economy: an introduction for a discussion of the 
evolution of money used in the economy and the types of money present today.
14 The Royal Mint issues coins which can also be considered ‘public money’. Deposits held at the central bank 
(reserves) are also public money. They exist in digital form but are only available to certain financial institutions.
15 The exact scope of stablecoins that will be covered will be developed as the regulatory regime takes shape.
Page 22
Unbacked cryptoassets are not money as they are high-risk, speculative 
assets. 
Cryptoassets are a digital representation of ownership or contractual rights that can be 
transferred, stored or traded electronically, and which typically use cryptography, 
distributed ledger technology (DLT) or similar technology.16
The majority of cryptoasset activity is driven by the use of highly volatile unbacked 
cryptoassets as speculative investment assets. Such cryptoassets (the most commonly 
known being Bitcoin and Ether) comprise around 90% of the total market capitalisation. 
These unbacked cryptoassets do not provide holders with a safe or stable store of value 
or a reliable unit of account.
16 See Bank of England (2022) – Financial Stability in Focus: Cryptoassets and decentralised finance.
Table A.3: Types of retail money Issuer Form
Banknotes 
Banknotes are bearer instruments – those who 
possess a banknote generally own it, and by handing it 
to someone else, the new holder becomes the owner.
Issued by the 
Bank of 
England 
Physical 
Bank deposits 
Commercial bank deposits account for around 95% of 
the money held by households and businesses. They 
are created by bank lending and are a liability of the 
banking system — banks stand ready to convert those 
deposits into central bank money in the form of 
physical cash or to honour payments customers make 
with those deposits, which typically involves a transfer 
of the claim to a customer in another bank. They could 
include bank deposits that are ‘tokenised’ using 
distributed ledgers.
Privately 
issued by 
commercial 
banks
Digital 
Stablecoins
Stablecoins refer to cryptoassets that seek to stabilise 
their value against existing national fiat currencies or 
other assets, typically by holding backing assets 
(Box E).
Privately 
issued by bank 
or non-bank 
providers
Digital 
Page 23
Unbacked cryptoassets do not represent a claim on a future income stream or collateral. 
As such, they only have extrinsic value in that they are worth only what someone is 
prepared to pay for them. As a result, large daily swings in their value are common –
Bitcoin prices have fallen by 10% or more in a day around 25 times over the past five 
years.17
The outstanding value of cryptoassets, globally, grew around tenfold between early 2020 
and November 2021, peaking at US$2.9 trillion. The market capitalisation has since 
fallen to under US$900 billion at the end of November 2022, so that it now represents 
under 0.2% of global financial assets.
18
Volatility in the value of unbacked cryptoassets has meant they do not preserve wealth 
for their holders. Similarly, volatility in their purchasing power means they are unstable 
units of account. In turn, this volatility has led to their low acceptance as a form of
payment so that they are not considered an efficient medium of exchange either.
17 CoinMarketCap.
18 CoinMarketCap and Financial Stability Board (2021) – Global Monitoring Report on Non-Bank Financial 
Intermediation.
Page 24
Part B: The likely need for a digital pound
Diagram B.1: Our primary motivations for the digital pound
Our primary motivations for the digital pound are the availability of central bank 
money as an anchor for confidence and safety in money, and promoting innovation, 
choice, and efficiency in payments.
Box C discusses trends in the digital economy and the payments landscape. In light of these 
trends, the Bank and HM Treasury judge there is likely to be a future need for, and benefits 
from, the digital pound. We consider there are two primary motivations: 
1. To sustain access to UK central bank money – ensuring its role as an anchor for 
confidence and safety in our monetary system, and to underpin monetary and financial 
stability and sovereignty; and
2. To promote innovation, choice, and efficiency in domestic payments as our lifestyles
and economy become ever more digital.
These two motivations go hand in hand. For the digital pound to play the role that cash plays 
in anchoring the monetary system, it needs to be usable and sufficiently adopted by 
households and businesses. Some of that adoption will arise from innovation which in turn 
will be supported by a public digital pound infrastructure available to all eligible private-sector 
firms that wish to develop new payment services.
Page 25
There are other motivations for developing the digital pound. These include supporting 
financial inclusion and improving domestic payments resilience and cross-border payments.19
These have also helped to inform our design choices, set out in Part D.
Central bank money as the anchor of monetary and financial 
stability
Uniformity and trust in the safety of money are the bedrock of our economy.
The stability of the UK economy and monetary system relies on the uniformity of money: that 
all forms of money – both bank deposits and cash – are valued equally (‘at par’ or ‘face 
value’), denominated in a common currency (sterling) and interchangeable with each other. 
£10 in a bank account can be easily changed into a £10 banknote, and deposits held in one 
bank are valued equally to the deposits in another and can be moved between them.
Access to public money – which is a safe liquid asset backed by the state – and the 
uniformity of money are critical for the smooth functioning of the economy. That is because 
they ensure that households and businesses can be confident in the value of money, 
regardless of its form and issuer. 
Widely usable public money that will always be accepted helps to anchor both the perception 
of uniformity and its reality. Holders of commercial bank money can convert their money into 
public money at any time they choose. 
The three pillars of the monetary system that deliver uniformity (Diagram B.2):
1. Retail central bank money – currently in the form of cash – underpins uniformity.
Cash is currently the only form of central bank money available to households and 
most businesses. Its existence and one-to-one convertibility with commercial bank 
money supports public confidence that financially risk-free money widely accepted for 
transactions in the UK will be available in both stress and normal times. Convertibility 
of bank deposits into cash further supports confidence in private money and the 
banking sector. It provides users with tangible proof that money kept in bank deposits 
is safe, while the option to withdraw deposits as cash, one-to-one and on demand, 
gives depositors control of their private money holdings.20 It provides the acid test for 
the safety of commercial bank money as commercial banks must be able to convert 
customers’ money into cash – public money denominated in sterling – on demand. As 
all commercial banks must offer this option, this supports the uniformity of money.
19 The Bank and HM Treasury are required by the Equality Act 2010, in the exercise of their respective public 
functions, to have due regard to the equality considerations set out in the Public Sector Equality Duty. In their 
exploration of the digital pound, relevant considerations will therefore include the impact of the design on 
individuals with certain protected characteristics, including the impact on individuals who rely on cash as the 
dominant means of making payments.
20 See Panetta (2021) – Central bank digital currencies: a monetary anchor for digital innovation, and 
Armelius et al (2020) – Is central bank currency fundamental to the monetary system?.
Page 26
2. Wholesale central bank money also anchors the value of private money issued by 
commercial banks. Wholesale central bank money (deposit accounts held by 
commercial banks at the central bank, also known as ‘reserves’) is a financially 
risk-free way for financial firms to store value and make payments to each other via 
the Bank’s RTGS core infrastructure. Commercial banks commit to settle transactions 
with other banks in reserves. This ensures uniformity between deposits at different 
banks as they can always be converted, via the central bank, to deposits in another 
bank at a rate of one-to-one.
3. Robust regulation and supervision target the safety and soundness of financial 
institutions, the resilience of the wider financial system and therefore private money. 
Prudential requirements for banks support the public’s confidence that they will meet 
customer demand to redeem their deposits and honour their commitment to convert 
deposits into central bank money one-to-one. The Financial Services Compensation 
Scheme provides insurance on deposits up to £85,000, further supporting public 
confidence. And the UK’s resolution regime ensures that if a bank failed, it would do so 
in an orderly way with disruption to any of its vital services minimised.21
Diagram B.2: Three pillars of the monetary system deliver uniformity and trust in 
money and the financial system
21 The UK established a framework for resolution (known as the ‘resolution regime’) in the Banking Act 2009. 
This followed the 2008 financial crisis, when alongside other countries, the UK felt it had no choice but to bail 
the banks out because they were 'too big to fail'. See Resolution | Bank of England.
Page 27
Uniformity and safety could be threatened by a combination of lower cash use and 
the emergence of some new forms of private digital money.
As cash continues to become less central and less usable in many people’s lives, central 
bank money will become less used for everyday transactions. The decline in the use of cash 
is expected to continue as commerce and payments become more digital, even though UK 
authorities are committed to keeping cash available as long as there is demand for it.
Technological advances also make it likely that new forms of private digital money that 
enable new services will emerge (Box A). Stablecoins, for example, are different to
conventional bank deposits and are offered by institutions including non-banks, such as big 
technology platforms. These offer the prospect of much deeper integration of money and 
payments into digital services, for example through smart contracts. The emergence and 
take-up of these new forms of private digital money are uncertain, as is whether they are 
issued by existing financial institutions or new entrants, such as ‘Big Tech’ firms and startups. 
There is a risk that new forms of private digital money emerge in a fragmented way, such that
they cannot always be easily converted into other types of money. Fragmentation may arise if 
holders of one form of money can only interact with others using the same system or from the 
same issuer. It may also arise if there are restrictions on accessing certain services based on 
the form of payment. For example: 
• Walled gardens and closed loop systems are closed payment systems in which 
all operations are controlled by the system operator. For example, an internet 
platform issuing a certain form of money might impede other firms’ ability to provide 
wallet services for that money. Alternatively, users may not be able to transact with 
users outside of that specific system. For example, in many countries someone 
who holds their money in a non-bank can find it cumbersome to transfer balances 
to a user of a different non-bank (for example, Venmo in the US and, until recently, 
Alipay and WeChat Pay in China).22 This contrasts with the UK banking sector, 
within which someone who holds money in one bank is able to pay someone who 
holds money in another bank.
• Convertibility may be costly, complex, or slow between different forms of digital 
money, even where conversion is possible. And wallet services providers, who act 
as intermediaries, might also restrict transactions.
22 In October 2022, Alipay and WeChat Pay (which together account for more than 90% of the total mobile 
payments market in China) launched features that permit inter-platform transfers.
Page 28
A new form of non-sterling digital money may threaten uniformity if it were used for a 
significant amount of retail transactions in the UK. If that were to happen at scale, sterling 
might no longer be the unit of account for a significant portion of UK transactions. This could 
compromise monetary sovereignty – the UK authorities’ ability to achieve price stability
through monetary policy. The Bank might also be unable to gain assurance about the 
robustness and supervision of a foreign-operated form of digital money. This could 
compromise financial sovereignty – the UK authorities’ ability to effectively regulate systemic
financial institutions and payments systems. 
Such an outcome is judged to be unlikely, but if it materialised the impact would be very 
significant, difficult to resolve and beyond authorities’ risk tolerance (Annex 1).
Preventing risks to uniformity underpins the case for the digital pound.
Declining cash use and the potential emergence of new forms of private digital money 
suggest that, if current trends continue, the digital pound is likely to be needed in the future, 
alongside cash, to anchor the monetary system.
The digital pound could support the uniformity of money by replicating the role of cash in a 
highly digitalised economy. It would offer continued access to retail central bank money: a 
financially risk-free, highly trusted, and accessible means of payment for households and 
businesses.
The digital pound could, if designed appropriately, also complement and support new forms 
of private digital money and payment services. For example, by acting as a digitally-native 
‘bridging’ asset between different forms of digital money, it could support their convertibility 
and enable them to trade at face value.23 And importantly, by establishing technical 
standards available to all, it could promote interoperability among different digital platforms. It 
would also provide a widely usable backstop means of payment, giving households the 
security that they could exit the banking sector or private payment platforms to a digital, 
financially risk-free asset.
If, in future, digital money denominated in other currencies became widely available, the 
digital pound could play an important role in preserving sterling as the unit of account in the 
UK. For example, by offering users the new functionalities in sterling as offered by new 
non-sterling digital money, the digital pound would reduce the incentive to use such 
non-sterling money.
23 A ‘digitally native’ form of money only exists in the digital world, rather than having a physical form.
Page 29
Supporting innovation, competition, choice, and efficiency
Innovation boosts the UK economy and supports growth and inclusivity.
The way we make payments has evolved over centuries – from metallic coins, to banknotes,
to the paper-based use of bank deposits like cheques, to the range of options for payments 
today. These innovations have benefited users, improved security, reduced frictions and the 
cost of transactions and ensured the way we pay has kept pace with the demands of modern 
life.
Recent innovations, within an appropriate regulatory framework, have opened up the 
payments market, enabling new firms to enter, and have widened access to payment 
services, resulting in improved user experience. Innovation leads to wider participation in 
markets – by both providers and end-users – as well as improvements in convenience, 
speed, cost, and choice. Such payments innovations increase productivity and hence the 
growth of the UK economy.24 For example:
• ‘Contactless’ card payments, launched in 2007, are now used by close to 90% of 
people and make up almost a third of all payments in the UK.25 This innovation has 
benefited retailers and customers and increased the speed and convenience of
smaller transactions.
• Nearly a third of UK adults are registered for mobile payment apps such as 
ApplePay or GooglePay.26 Such apps offer integration into ecommerce, security 
benefits, and convenience.
• ‘Payment facilitators’ (for example, Zettle by PayPal, Square, SumUp) have helped
merchants, particularly smaller businesses, to accept card payments and join the 
digital economy.27
• Open Banking enables consumers and small and medium-sized enterprises (SMEs) 
to share their transaction data securely with trusted third parties and allows them to 
initiate payments directly from their payment accounts to the bank account of their 
payee, without the use of cards. Although in its early days, accepting payments in this 
way is already reducing transaction costs for some businesses.28
24 Department for Business, Energy and Industrial Strategy (2021) – From ideas to growth.
25 Barclaycard (2021) – Tap, tap, tap: a brief history of contactless payments and UK Finance (2022) – UK 
Payment Markets Report.
26 UK Finance (2022) – UK Payment Markets Report.
27 PSR (2021) – Market review into card-acquiring services.
28 Open Banking – How Open Banking can help businesses. 
Page 30
There is scope for innovation to generate further efficiencies in payments.
Innovation has not come to an end and there is likely scope for it to further reduce payment 
costs and generate further efficiencies in payments.29 That improvement might be facilitated 
by new technologies and new entrants to payments markets offering new functionalities. 
Small and medium-sized merchants pay higher fees for accepting card payments than larger 
businesses.30 The average merchant service charge for card payments was 0.6% of each 
transaction in 2018, but the smallest merchants were paying over four times more on 
average than very large ones (Chart B.3).31 Although these costs are not paid directly by 
customers, they may feed into higher prices in the economy overall. 
Elsewhere in the payments landscape, cross-border transactions in particular are often very 
costly. The average cost of a payment sent to another country is about 6% of the value 
sent.32
Chart B.3: Charges faced by merchants to accept cards are higher for smaller
businesses
29 This Consultation Paper focuses on the scope for innovation via the digital pound to generate further 
efficiencies in retail payments. Innovation in UK wholesale payments, by contrast, is primarily being taken 
forward through the Bank’s RTGS Renewal Programme and opening up access, for example to non-bank 
payment system providers for settlement accounts.
30 Unlike card-based payments, cash handling between merchant and customer is free at the point of sale for a 
cash payment. But the merchant does face costs associated with storage, transport and banking of cash.
31 Haldane (2020) – Seizing the Opportunities from Digital Finance.
32 The World Bank (2022) – Remittance Prices Worldwide Quarterly.
Page 31
But innovation can come with risks of concentration.
UK authorities have identified several characteristics of digital markets that may lead to
concentration.33 Those suggest that the future development of private digital money issuance 
could tend towards a small number of firms taking a significant market share. Such 
characteristics include network effects (where platforms become more valuable to their users 
as they grow), economies of scale and scope (which can act as a barrier to entry for small 
firms), and data advantages (which allow incumbents to hone and personalise their products 
in a way that is difficult for new entrants to replicate). 
As recognised in a recent paper by the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA), ‘concentration and 
market power are not inherently harmful. The success of a small number of firms can reflect 
the fact they offer more innovative products, integration that benefits consumers, or greater 
efficiency.’34
Market concentration might limit consumer choice, however. If operators or issuers of new 
forms of private digital money were to develop and entrench dominant market positions, they 
may create ‘walled gardens’ or payment systems with low interoperability (as discussed in 
Part B in the context of risks to the uniformity of money). 
Market concentration might also limit the ability of new firms to enter the marketplace. So 
short-term innovation in digital payments might, under certain conditions, generate 
dominance and reduce long-term innovation. Such outcomes might be detrimental to the 
Government’s objectives around competition and innovation. For example, in 2022 the UK 
Competition and Markets Authority launched an investigation into Google’s Play Store rules, 
which obliged app developers offering digital content to use Google’s own payment system 
for in-app purchases.
Authorities must remain proactive to support safe and sustainable innovation. In 2022, the 
Payment Systems Regulator acknowledged that there is a ‘long-term risk to competition in 
retail payments’ based on the existing concentration, and the difficulty for new firms to enter 
the market to address this.
35 And the FCA found that, while Big Tech firms’ entry in financial 
services could benefit many consumers at least in the short-term, there was a risk in the 
longer term that competition benefits could be eroded if Big Tech firms created and exploited
entrenched market power to harm healthy competition and worsen consumer outcomes.36
33 The Furman Review for HM Treasury and the Department for Business, Energy and Industrial Strategy (2019) 
– Unlocking digital competition: Report from the Digital Competition Expert Panel.
34 FCA (2022) – DP22/5: The potential competition impacts of Big Tech entry and expansion in retail 
financial services. The paper predominantly considers Google (Alphabet), Apple, Meta Platforms (including 
Facebook, WhatsApp, Instagram), Amazon and Microsoft.
35 PSR (2022) – The PSR Strategy and BIS Bulletin No 45 (2021) – Regulating big techs in finance.
36 FCA (2022) – DP22/5: The potential competition impacts of Big Tech entry and expansion in retail 
financial services.
Page 32
The digital pound can support innovation, choice and efficiency.
The digital pound would be a public-private partnership designed to support innovation and 
competition. The Bank would provide core infrastructure and the settlement asset – the digital 
pound – upon which a competitive ecosystem of private sector firms would provide innovative 
user-facing payment services (Part D). This model of a flexible core platform would lay the 
foundation for the private sector to innovate to provide new services to the public. 
The digital pound could drive further efficiency in the provision of transaction services to 
merchants and households. But, more importantly, it could provide an open platform for the 
development of future services by the private sector. Experience of digital innovation to date 
suggests that new services will emerge as digitalisation of daily life continues. 
There are already examples of the direction in which the digital pound could support 
innovation through improved functionality for users, such as programmability. Technology is 
emerging that allows users to set rules to limit their spending on certain products, for 
example on gambling, or to automatically save a small amount of money after each 
purchase. This technology builds on existing, familiar applications like Direct Debit.
Programmability, delivered by Payment Interface Providers, could also enable the use of 
smart contracts, which carry out specific actions based on pre-defined terms and conditions. 
For example, a smart contract could be set up to immediately pay a supplier on signed 
receipt of goods, rather than having to wait for an invoice to be issued and then paid. Another 
type of function the digital pound could enable is micropayments, which are payments of 
extremely low value. Supporting micropayments could enable new business models, such as 
paying a small amount to read a single newspaper article, rather than having to pay for a 
whole subscription.
The digital pound’s support for greater efficiency in retail payments in the UK would 
complement the Bank’s efforts to enhance wholesale payments through RTGS Renewal. 
The digital pound may offer other benefits. And it should not crowd out other forms 
of digital innovation.
The digital pound may offer other benefits, aside from the primary motivations discussed in 
this section (Box D). Those benefits might include payments resilience, support to financial 
inclusion and improved cross-border payments. Importantly, the digital pound should not 
crowd out or prevent other forms of digital innovation by the private sector. 
Page 33
For example, HM Treasury and the Bank are also establishing a regulatory framework for 
systemic stablecoins.37 One possibility under consideration is that they could be backed by 
deposits held with the central bank. Such a stablecoin would be economically like the digital 
pound, but they could coexist and complement one another (Box E).
37 The Financial Services and Markets Bill, which is being considered by Parliament, and relevant planned 
secondary legislation, aims to bring fiat-backed stablecoins into the remits of relevant UK regulatory authorities. 
The FCA would regulate activities including stablecoin issuance and custody. The Bank would have 
responsibility for regulating systemic stablecoins, subject to a HM Treasury decision to recognise these as 
systemic. 
Page 34
Box C: Future trends in payments drive the likely need for the
digital pound
The digital pound would only be introduced if it supported both the Bank’s and 
HM Government’s objectives. A decision to proceed will depend on whether the 
payments landscape evolves in line with current trends in the UK and abroad, and so the 
Bank and HM Treasury’s priority is to build readiness should it be required. While we 
cannot say for certain what the digital economy and payments landscape might look like 
in coming years, we have identified key trends that may influence our decision to 
proceed.
• First, whether, and how sharply, cash use continues to decline. While UK 
authorities are committed to ensuring continued access to cash for those who 
wish to use it, trends in recent years suggest the use of cash for payments may 
continue to decline in the future. 
• Second, the emergence of new forms of private digital money issued by new 
payment entities. Today, card-based transactions (for example via Visa and 
Mastercard) dominate retail payments in the UK. Banks connect with regulated 
payment and technology companies, enabling electronic payments and 
settlement with commercial bank money. But new business models and novel 
technologies, including Distributed Ledger Technology (DLT), mean that 
payments services can now be offered by non-bank firms. This includes the 
potential for e-money, stablecoins and deposits at ‘narrow banks’.38 The 
emergence and take-up of these new forms of private digital money is uncertain, 
as is whether they are issued by existing financial institutions or new entrants and 
start-ups. 
• Third, whether new forms of private digital money display adequate 
interoperability. This is how easily new forms of money can be converted into 
existing (and other new) forms. It is also the ease with which new forms of money 
can be transferred between individuals, as well as whether they can be spent in a 
variety of places or only on particular platforms or locations.
• Fourth, international developments in CBDC and private digital money. Many 
countries are exploring retail CBDC.39 Some are already live and some may be 
introduced in more jurisdictions in the near future.40 A survey of central banks 
showed that 68% consider it likely or possible that they will issue a retail CBDC in 
the short or medium term.41 Some new forms of digital money might be issued 
38 Deposits at banks with specialist payments-focused business models. Narrow banks typically hold very low 
risk assets with maturities that match the bank’s liabilities.
39 For example, European Central Bank (2020) and Federal Reserve (2022).
40 For example, Central Bank of the Bahamas (2019).
41 BIS (2022) – Gaining momentum – Results of the 2021 BIS survey on central bank digital currencies.
Page 35
that are denominated in currencies other than sterling, but still available in the 
UK. These could be dollar (or other) denominated stablecoins or foreign CBDCs 
available to UK residents.
In addition to these trends in retail payments, there is also innovation in wholesale 
payments, which will be an important factor in shaping the future payments landscape in 
the UK and globally. The Bank is renewing its Real-Time Gross Settlement (RTGS) 
system to support more efficient wholesale settlement in central bank money. In 2024, a 
new RTGS core settlement platform will be introduced, offering greater resilience and a 
range of new features and capabilities. Wholesale settlement is discussed in more detail 
in Box H. 
Page 36
Box D: Other motivations for the digital pound
Beyond its primary motivations, the digital pound may offer additional benefits. 
The digital pound could improve resilience as an additional payment rail.
A key aspect of financial stability is the resilience of payment systems used daily by 
households and businesses. Existing UK payments systems are already regulated and 
supervised to ensure they are resilient. This intends to avoid disruption and ensures they 
recover quickly on the rare occasions that disruption occurs. The digital pound could 
improve resilience as a new payment system that could operate outside of existing ones
for digital pound-to-digital pound payments. 
Like other digital payments systems, such as card networks, the digital pound would be 
exposed to risks of electricity outages and cyber-attack. The Bank and other UK 
authorities would need to ensure the digital pound had the highest standards of 
resilience against such risks. 
It could also complement existing financial inclusion initiatives.
Financial inclusion is relatively high in the UK and the Government has already made 
good steps towards enhancing it. The digital pound could complement existing initiatives 
as another option for some financially excluded groups (Box J). One way to achieve this 
could be through offline payments – payments which can be conducted without a data 
connection. While challenging to implement (see Technology Working Paper), this 
could be valuable in remote areas or for users with limited internet access.
Using the digital pound to improve cross-border payments is an opportunity
but would take time and require international co-operation to deliver.
Cross-border payments are typically expensive, slow and opaque. Improving the existing 
global infrastructure for these is a priority for the G20 group of governments, working 
with the Committee on Payments and Market Infrastructures.
CBDCs such as the digital pound and those of other countries, would in principle offer 
the opportunity to start from a clean slate, avoiding frictions that have built up between 
existing national payments systems. But they would not address all frictions. For 
example, CBDCs would not themselves alleviate frictions caused by different
Anti-Money Laundering regulations/Combatting the Financing of Terrorism (AML/CFT) 
standards between countries. Addressing those is a focus of the G20 and several 
initiatives are under way globally to improve existing systems (for example through 
linking up national faster payments systems). 
So, while enhancing cross-border payments is not a primary motivation for the digital 
pound, we would work closely with other countries to ensure that its design did not 
introduce unintended barriers to payments with other currencies and, in so far as other 
countries issue their own CBDC, would offer the potential for interlinking.
Page 37
Consultation questions
1. Do you have comments on how trends in payments may evolve and the opportunities 
and risks that they may entail?
Page 38
Part C: Monetary and financial stability
If introduced, the digital pound would need to support the Bank’s objectives for 
monetary and financial stability. 
The Bank’s statutory objectives are to maintain monetary and financial stability, which 
includes maintaining low and stable inflation, and stable provision of credit to the economy. 
The digital pound would contribute to the Bank’s objectives by acting as an anchor for the 
wider monetary system, promoting trust and confidence in money and payments (Part B).
Care must also be taken in its design to manage any risks it could introduce to those 
objectives.
The digital pound could also pose some risks, which would need to be managed before it 
could be introduced. The introduction of the digital pound would require adjustment in the 
financial system. Depending on the speed and scale of uptake by households and 
businesses, the transition in particular could affect some bank business models. This could
affect the cost and availability of credit in the economy and there could also be an impact on 
the transmission of monetary policy. 
If a digital pound were to be introduced, the Bank would seek to limit such financial stability
and monetary policy risks through the design of the digital pound, particularly during that
transition period. The Bank would aim to ensure the digital pound’s introduction was orderly 
and that the risks in transition were carefully managed.
The Bank does not, however, seek to preserve the status quo structure of the financial 
system or to protect any business model within the commercial banking sector from the 
impact of technological innovation and competition.
Financial stability
New forms of digital money, both the digital pound and stablecoins, could adversely
impact banks’ businesses models and affect the cost and availability of credit. 
The introduction of the digital pound would result in households and businesses switching 
some of their bank deposits to digital pounds. That loss of deposits for commercial banks is 
known as ‘bank disintermediation’ and, depending on the speed and scale, could have
implications for financial stability.42
42 See Broadbent (2016), Mancini-Griffoli et al (2018), Andolfatto (2018), Kumhof and Noone (2018), 
Meaning et al (2018), and Chiu et al (2019), among others.
Page 39
As set out in the Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper, banks losing deposits may replace them by 
borrowing in wholesale funding markets to maintain the same level of lending.43 To the extent 
that wholesale funding is more costly than deposits, banks might pass this on in their lending, 
by increasing the price of credit (loans) to households and businesses or reducing the 
quantity of credit they are willing to supply, or both (Diagram C.1).
Diagram C.1: The movement of deposits from banks to digital pounds could 
impact credit
43 First, banks lose central bank reserves, which are highly liquid assets, when they lose deposits. Second, in 
order to maintain their regulatory liquidity and funding ratios, banks could raise longer-term wholesale funding 
from capital markets to buy high-quality liquid assets (HQLA), such as government bonds.
Page 40
The extent of bank disintermediation and impact on the cost of credit depends
crucially on the speed and scale of adoption of the digital pound. This is uncertain 
and would vary between transition, steady state and stress.
The extent of bank disintermediation and the impact on the cost of credit would depend on 
the behavioural response of households and businesses to the digital pound, including how 
much of their money they would want to keep in that form. This is uncertain and very difficult 
to forecast. And it would probably vary between transition, steady state and stress.
The illustrative scenario in the Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper suggested that, under the 
assumptions it used, the impact of even a very high degree of deposit disintermediation on 
credit conditions in steady state would likely be modest. Assuming around 20% of 
commercial bank retail deposits migrated to new forms of digital money (equivalent to the 
total amount of non-interest-bearing deposits in the UK), bank lending rates were estimated 
to rise by around 20 basis points in steady state, although there is considerable uncertainty 
around this estimate.44
The speed of the transition to that steady state following the introduction of the digital pound 
would matter, however. So it is particularly important to manage that period, during which the 
behavioural response of households and businesses would become clearer, and the financial 
sector would adjust. 
Limits on holdings of the digital pound during a transition period would constrain the extent of 
outflows from bank deposits and allow UK authorities to learn more about its impact (Part D).
Transition could take several years. During that period, there would be uncertainty about the 
extent of deposit outflows, and for a given amount of outflows, banks’ ability to replace lost 
retail funding with wholesale funding in a timely and cost-effective way. In turn, there would 
be uncertainty about the impact on banks’ overall cost of funding and the extent to which the 
cost and availability of credit may be affected. The non-bank sector’s ability to replace any fall 
in bank lending to borrowers and the extent of any disruption to sterling money markets 
would also be unclear.
In periods of banking or financial stress, where consumers seek safety and do not wish to 
hold assets perceived as risky, demand for digital pounds could be particularly strong. If 
outflows to digital pounds were particularly large and rapid, banks might be unprepared and 
find it difficult to replace lost deposits. Existing bank regulation, which includes requirements 
for banks’ liquidity holdings, and hence also their ability to draw on the Bank’s liquidity 
facilities, provides resilience to the banking system against this risk. 
44 Under other assumptions the increase in lending rates might be around 80 basis points (Chart 3.4 in the 
Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper).
Page 41
In time, the financial stability risks of large and rapid disintermediation due to a digital pound 
could further diminish and should be manageable if the financial system had the time and 
flexibility to adjust. That adjustment would be through the provision of greater long-term 
funding to banks, or the provision of more market-based financing to the real economy.
However, as noted in the Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper, there could be other increased 
risks, including from banks becoming more reliant on wholesale funding and less on deposits.
Monetary stability
The digital pound would not fundamentally alter the traditional channels of money 
creation, but it might affect monetary stability.
Today, money in the UK economy is created in two ways. First, the Bank can increase the 
amount of money in the economy by creating reserves, which it exchanges for non-money 
financial assets through open market operations. Second, commercial banks can create bank 
deposits through lending. When a bank makes a loan, it simultaneously creates a matching 
deposit in the borrower’s account, thereby creating new money.45 If introduced, the digital 
pound would not fundamentally alter these channels or necessarily represent new money 
creation.46 It would, however, be a new form of money for households to pay for goods and 
services in their daily life.
The introduction of the digital pound could still have implications for monetary stability 
though. First, via the transmission mechanism of monetary policy; second, via monetary 
policy implementation; third, via the equilibrium interest rate and the effective lower bound 
(ELB); and fourth, via productivity.
Bank disintermediation might affect the transmission of monetary policy to the real
economy.
The introduction of the digital pound could affect the transmission of monetary policy to the 
real economy. The overall effects are uncertain – transmission could be weakened or 
strengthened – and the Bank would monitor them closely. As set out in Box F, using the
digital pound as an additional tool for the transmission of monetary policy is not a policy 
motivation for it. 
If banks lost deposits to the digital pound, then they could become more reliant on wholesale 
funding. It is unclear whether this would strengthen or weaken the monetary transmission 
mechanism. On the one hand, if wholesale funding costs are more responsive to Bank Rate
than deposit rates, then increased use of wholesale funding might mean that bank loan rates 
become more responsive to Bank Rate. On the other hand, recent research on the monetary 
45 McLeay et al (2014) – Money creation in the modern economy.
46 See Box A in the Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper and Box 4 of the Bank’s 2020 Discussion Paper.
Page 42
transmission mechanism finds that banks’ use of retail deposits (as opposed to wholesale 
funding) could strengthen the transmission of policy rate changes to loan rates.47
Another way in which disintermediation could affect the monetary transmission mechanism is 
via a greater proportion of lending being performed by non-bank financial intermediaries. 
Recent research in the US and Denmark finds that lending by non-banks is typically less 
responsive to monetary policy than lending by banks.48
These effects on the monetary transmission mechanism could be larger in times of stress if, 
as described above, demand for the digital pound becomes particularly strong. To maintain 
banks’ provision of credit to households and businesses in such circumstances and ensure 
that monetary policy continues to be transmitted effectively, the Bank could conduct liquidity 
and lending operations.
Keeping the digital pound retail-focused would help to ensure that monetary policy is 
implemented effectively.
A core part of the Bank’s approach to implementing monetary policy is to keep short-term 
market interest rates close to Bank Rate. The Bank transmits Bank Rate to short-term market 
interest rates via the remuneration and supply of central bank reserves held by commercial 
banks, a liability of the Bank. Should wholesale actors use the digital pound widely, this could 
change the relationship between reserves and sterling money market rates. Keeping the 
digital pound retail-focused – for example via holding limits – would reduce the likelihood of 
such money market restructuring taking place. In addition, to ensure that monetary policy can 
still be implemented effectively, the Bank would intervene to change the supply of reserves 
more frequently or in larger size. Annex 2 considers the implications of the digital pound on 
the Bank of England’s own balance sheet more broadly.
If households and businesses who hold bank deposits switched to the digital pound, that 
would reduce the quantity of reserves held by commercial banks. If the introduction of the 
digital pound did not reduce reserves below the level demanded by the banking system, 
there would be no impact on the size of the Bank’s balance sheet (Annex 2). Instead, it would
simply change its composition, with fewer reserves and more digital pounds. However, if the 
demand for the digital pound caused reserves to fall below the minimum level demanded by 
banks at the target interest rate, the Bank would intervene to supply reserves to meet banks’ 
demand and ensure the effective implementation of monetary policy.49
47 Drechsler et al (2017), Xiao (2020) and Polo (2021).
48 Nelson et al (2017), Xiao (2020), Elliott et al (2020) and Cucic and Gorea (2021).
49 The Bank recently published an Explanatory Note setting out its framework for ensuring short-term market 
interest rates remain close to Bank Rate as the Asset Purchase Facility (APF) is unwound and reserves begin to 
fall. 
Page 43
If demand for a digital pound grew gradually, the Bank’s Short-Term Repo Facility would be 
available to meet demand for reserves. However, substitution into the digital pound could be 
larger or more rapid in a stress. In this case, the Bank may choose to deploy longer-term 
lending operations to supply additional reserves. In either case, all else equal, the creation of 
reserves would increase the size of the Bank’s balance sheet.
No decisions have yet been taken on the framework for meeting demand for the Bank’s 
liabilities (and therefore effectively implementing monetary policy) in the future. 
The digital pound could affect the level of the equilibrium interest rate, with 
implications for the conduct of monetary policy.
The ‘equilibrium interest rate’ is often thought of as an important guide for monetary policy.50
It is the interest rate consistent with the economy producing output in line with its productive 
capacity (‘potential’) and inflation at the target.51 As such it determines longer-term trends in 
Bank Rate. For example, if a shock hit the economy and resulted in output being below (or 
above) its potential, Bank Rate would need to be set below (or above) the equilibrium rate for 
a period to return output to its productive capacity consistent with the Bank’s inflation target.
If introducing the digital pound were to lower the equilibrium interest rate, this would mean 
the level of Bank Rate would need to be set lower on average. All other things equal, this 
would imply that there is less scope to cut Bank Rate before hitting the effective lower bound 
(ELB), constraining expansionary monetary policy more often. This is particularly the case if 
the equilibrium interest rate is already low for other reasons.
We judge that the impact of the digital pound on the equilibrium interest rate is small, 
though this is uncertain.
The Bank has considered ways in which the digital pound could affect the equilibrium interest 
rate. To date there is little existing literature on the channels or the magnitude of such effects, 
and so the Bank’s understanding of this issue is likely to develop over time. Two channels in 
particular are worth considering at this stage.
First, bank disintermediation could lower the equilibrium rate. As described above,
disintermediation could lead to higher lending rates as banks experience higher funding 
costs, and credit provision in the economy shifts towards non-bank lending, which may be 
more expensive and difficult to access for households and smaller non-financial companies. 
The resulting higher lending spread could be offset through a structural adjustment that 
lowered the equilibrium rate.52
50 The equilibrium interest rate cannot be directly observed, but it is thought to have fallen in recent decades.
51 Bank of England (2018) – August Inflation Report.
52 This spread between the borrowing rate and the risk-free rate reflects the risk of the loan and the costs 
related to intermediation. If this spread increased, for example, pushing up borrowing rates for a given risk-free 
interest rate, investment would fall, and a negative output gap would open. A lower equilibrium rate is therefore 
needed to offset the increase in the spread.
Page 44
Second, the increased likelihood of deposit withdrawals could also lower the equilibrium rate. 
The digital pound could make bank deposits more susceptible to more frequent inflows and 
outflows because it could be easier to switch into digital pounds than into cash. As a result, 
banks may choose to hold more high-quality liquid assets against the increased possibility of 
high demand for withdrawals.53 This could lead to a lower proportion of banks’ assets being 
available for longer-term lending: for example, the type of lending that might fund business 
investment projects. This could slow productivity growth and in turn reduce the equilibrium 
interest rate. 
Overall, we judge that the impact on the equilibrium interest rate from the introduction of the 
digital pound is likely small and probably slightly negative, though this is uncertain. 
The digital pound could affect the level of productivity, but the direction is uncertain.
Productivity influences the economy in important ways, affecting key variables such as 
output, employment and wages. It is a fundamental determinant of potential output growth 
and the equilibrium interest rate.54 The digital pound could affect productivity in two opposite 
ways, with possibly significant but highly uncertain impacts.
On the one hand, the digital pound could lift productivity, directly or indirectly. The direct 
effect would be through enhanced payments efficiency as payments become faster and/or 
cheaper. An indirect impact on productivity could also occur if the cost saving from more 
efficient payments led to additional spending on productive activities, for example to fund 
investment.55
On the other hand, the digital pound may result in bank disintermediation and tighter financial 
conditions, reflecting higher funding costs or bank lending rates. That would lower 
investment, weighing on productivity. These are the same channels that affect the equilibrium 
interest rate, as explained previously.
Overall, the effects of the digital pound on productivity are highly uncertain and judged likely 
to be small in steady state. But there could be a large effect during a transition period, if 
banks adjusted to deposit outflows by relying on more expensive wholesale funding. Limits 
on digital pound holdings would mitigate such bank disintermediation, so changes to the 
equilibrium interest rate and productivity would likely be contained.
53 Ennis and Keister (2013) – Economic Growth, Liquidity, and Bank Runs.
54 Lopez-Garcia and Szörfi (2021) – Key factors behind productivity trends in euro-area countries.
55 Bank of England (2018) – Box 6, August Inflation Report.
Page 45
Box E: Interactions between the digital pound and systemic 
stablecoins
Stablecoins are a new form of digital money, issued by the private sector.
Stablecoins are a form of cryptoasset that aim to maintain a stable value, typically 
against existing fiat currencies, by holding safe backing assets. As explained in the
Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper, given their perceived safety, they have the potential to 
become widely used in payments, particularly compared to unbacked cryptoassets (for 
example Bitcoin). 
If appropriately designed, within a robust regulatory framework, stablecoins offering 
greater functionality than existing forms of electronic money could play an increasingly 
important role in retail payments, offering benefits such as convenient and cheaper 
payment services. As set out in Box A, novel features such as programmability, smart 
contracts or micropayments, could drive demand for new digital payment methods. 
Stablecoins might also improve consumer choice, better integrate into digital services 
offering improved functionality, and promote competition. Currently, stablecoins are 
traded and used as a settlement asset on centralised cryptoasset exchanges and used 
in decentralised finance (DeFi) applications. But innovative functionality and attractive 
use cases could result in a stablecoin achieving a large scale and becoming a systemic 
payment method, widely adopted for retail and/or wholesale payments.
The Bank is working closely with the Financial Conduct Authority and HM Treasury to 
establish the regulatory framework for systemic and non-systemic stablecoins, with 
legislation currently before Parliament (Box B). 
An important feature of systemic stablecoins is the asset used to back their
liabilities.
To meet the FPC’s expectations, we would expect that systemic stablecoin issuance 
would need to be fully backed with high-quality and liquid assets.56 One model under 
consideration would be for the backing assets to be held entirely with the central bank. If
backed by central bank liabilities, a stablecoin would be economically similar to the 
digital pound. As the backing assets would be financially risk-free, it may be perceived 
by end users as a safe alternative to traditional bank payments (though it would still be 
exposed to operational risks). Another model under consideration would be to back 
stablecoins with other high-quality liquid assets. In contrast to the digital pound, 
stablecoins, regardless of their backing asset, would be a liability of the private-sector 
issuer rather than a claim on the central bank. That means they would be private money, 
like commercial bank deposits. 
56 Financial Policy Committee (2019) – Financial Stability Report
Page 46
Part C of this paper described how new forms of digital money that are safe or perceived 
to be safe could cause commercial banks to lose some of their retail deposits, making 
credit provided by banks to households and businesses more expensive. This risk to 
financial stability might require imposing limits on the digital pound and/or systemic 
stablecoins, at least in transition.57
Features other than the stablecoin’s backing assets would affect how similar
or different it might look to the digital pound.
Part D sets out our proposed design choices for the digital pound. These seek to 
balance supporting the take-up of the digital pound and managing risks to monetary and 
financial stability from its introduction. 
Stablecoin regulation would need to consider the implications of any similarities and 
differences between stablecoins and the digital pound, to ensure coherence in the 
approach to monetary and financial stability risks, and prevent regulatory arbitrage.
In a mixed payments economy, the digital pound could coexist with, and 
complement, a systemic stablecoin.
In the past, stability has been achieved by the coexistence of cash and 
interchangeability of cash and bank accounts, and innovation through the introduction of 
new banking products and services, for example Automated Teller Machines (ATMs) in 
the 1960s. 
As set out in Part B, the public sector can require uniformity between different forms of 
money, for example through requiring banks to convert deposits into cash on demand.
Private-sector innovation in retail payments can then enhance users’ payments 
experience and widen access to services. 
There is scope for new forms of private digital money such as stablecoins to provide 
further user benefits. But they could pose a threat to the uniformity of money (for 
example if not easily converted into each other and/or existing forms of money), and to 
competition (for example if a stablecoin issuer became dominant through network 
effects, economies of scale and/or data advantages).
57 The Bank’s 2021 Discussion Paper on new forms of digital money noted that ‘During any such ‘transition 
period’, the Bank and other UK authorities may [therefore] wish to limit migration, so that the financial system 
could adjust to the presence of new forms of digital money in an orderly fashion.’
Page 47
Therefore, the Bank judges that even if there were a systemic stablecoin that is backed 
by liabilities of the central bank, and looks economically similar to the digital pound, a 
significant case for the digital pound would remain:
• The digital pound, issued by the Bank, would preserve access to retail central 
bank money. As a claim on the Bank of England, this money would be supported 
by the credibility of the issuing institution. This credibility is underpinned by the 
institutional framework in which the Bank operates and its focus on public policy 
objectives, as set out by Parliament.
• In much the same way that cash exists alongside private money, the digital pound 
does not need to be a dominant form of money in order to meet its public policy 
objectives. The digital pound could exist alongside other forms of money, 
including stablecoins. However, private stablecoin issuers would not necessarily 
have the same motivation to ensure the uniformity and interoperability of different 
forms of money, given the commercial incentives to establish dominant market 
positions. This could favour the creation of ‘walled gardens’ with low 
interoperability. As discussed earlier in this consultation, such dominant positions 
have the potential to be detrimental to innovation and competition in payments.
• Even setting aside these considerations for market structure, technological 
challenges might limit the ability of private issuers to achieve wide interoperability. 
Given the wide range of private providers and private systems in payments,
interoperability between all of them poses challenges for co-ordination. The digital 
pound would provide public infrastructure with low barriers to entry to promote 
innovation, and technical standards for interoperability. By doing so, and by 
having the digital pound as a financially risk-free, widely available bridging asset, 
this could also enhance competition between stablecoins, by helping users to 
move between, and send payments to, different stablecoin networks.
• While regulation would seek to manage some of the above risks, the presence of 
the digital pound might complement regulation and further reduce potential harms 
to competition and innovation that might arise from non-interoperable stablecoins.
The digital pound could make it less likely that a stablecoin exploits network 
effects to establish a dominant position in retail payments.
Page 48
Box F: Assessment of monetary policy as a motivator for the 
digital pound
Remunerating the digital pound, either positively or negatively, to make monetary 
policy more effective is not a motivation for issuing the digital pound.
As noted in the 2021 Discussion Paper, paying an interest rate on the digital pound 
could in principle provide the Bank with a new monetary policy tool alongside Bank Rate. 
This is not a motivation for issuing the digital pound, which is one of the reasons it would 
not be remunerated/interest-bearing (Part D).
Monetary transmission mechanism 
The digital pound could in principle help to strengthen the monetary transmission 
mechanism, by enhancing the impact of changes in Bank Rate on household spending 
and saving decisions. A digital pound that pays interest – that is ‘remunerated’ – could 
be designed to pass through changes in Bank Rate to its holders automatically. This, in 
turn, could increase pass-through of Bank Rate changes to banks’ retail deposit rates. 
For example, in response to an increase in Bank Rate and the interest rate paid on the 
digital pound, banks may need to increase the interest they pay on their deposits by 
more than otherwise, to avoid households moving their bank deposits into the digital 
pound. Increased pass-through of changes in Bank Rate to bank deposit rates could 
also increase pass-through to bank loan rates.
However, the economic response to a change in the interest rate on the digital pound 
would be uncertain. The digital pound has never been used – indeed, no CBDC has to 
date been used at scale in any economy – so there is much uncertainty about how 
paying interest would affect the impact of changes in Bank Rate on the real economy, 
including on households’ saving and spending decisions.58 There is also a risk that bank 
disintermediation might work in the other direction and act to weaken, rather than 
strengthen, the transmission of monetary policy to the wider economy.
The effective lower bound (ELB)
Following the global financial crisis, nominal interest rates in the UK and elsewhere 
reached historically low levels. When nominal interest rates are low, there is a greater 
risk of hitting the ELB – the point at which further cuts in Bank Rate no longer provide 
additional stimulus. This limits the ability of monetary policy to stimulate the economy
should it be required. The precise level of the ELB is uncertain.59
58 For an explanation of how changes in Bank Rate affect the economy and inflation, see The monetary 
transmission mechanism of monetary policy, Quarterly Bulletin, 1999 Q2.
59 Bank of England (2020) – Box 1, August Monetary Policy Report.
Page 49
An important cause of the ELB is the existence of cash. Cash always pays a nominal 
interest rate of zero. So if deposit rates fall below zero, depositors might decide to 
withdraw deposits and hold cash rather than face negative interest rates. This means 
banks might be unwilling to pass through cuts in Bank Rate to deposit rates below a 
certain level. In turn, this might impede their ability to pass through Bank Rate cuts to 
loan rates, and hence weaken the transmission of Bank Rate cuts to the real economy.
This has two implications for the design and impact of the digital pound.
First, applying a negative interest rate on the digital pound would not reduce the ELB. 
Some commentators have argued that the potential to apply a negative interest rate to 
the digital pound could enable the Bank to set a more negative Bank Rate.60 That is, the
digital pound could help to reduce the ELB on Bank Rate, helping the Bank to loosen 
monetary policy further in a low-interest environment, to meet the inflation target.61
However, this argument relies on the idea that the digital pound would replace cash. If 
the digital pound were introduced, and if it paid a negative interest rate, depositors could 
still convert their deposits to cash so long as cash were available, so applying a negative 
interest rate on the digital pound would not reduce the ELB. The Bank and UK 
authorities are committed to sustaining access to cash and meeting cash demand.62 The 
digital pound would be designed to complement, rather than replace, cash.
Second, an unremunerated digital pound (ie one that paid no interest) could increase the 
level of deposit rates at which the ELB occurs. That is because it gives deposit holders 
another way to avoid negative rates on bank deposits. There are costs to holding 
physical cash rather than digital deposits – such as storage costs and loss of 
transactional convenience (for example for digital payments). This means that even 
though cash does not pay interest, banks might be able to reduce deposit rates 
somewhat below zero without losing large quantities of deposits to cash. Relative to
cash, the digital pound would have negligible storage costs and higher convenience for 
online transactions. So the introduction of an unremunerated digital pound could make it 
more difficult for banks to charge negative deposit rates without losing deposits. This 
might increase the ELB for Bank Rate, and risk constraining monetary policy more often.
As explained in Part D, any decision to revisit our approach to remuneration would be 
preceded by a review with full consultation. The Bank would provide adequate lead time 
to allow holders of digital pounds to switch funds into or out of other forms of money 
such as bank deposits and cash. Part D also explains why the digital pound would not 
be remunerated, setting aside monetary policy considerations.
60 See Bordo and Levin (2017) and Haldane (2021).
61 In February 2021, the MPC decided to add a negative Bank Rate to the monetary policy toolkit. See the 
minutes of this meeting. Also see Box 1 of the August 2020 Monetary Policy Report for more discussion of 
negative policy rates.
62 Gov.UK (2021) – Access to Cash Consultation and HM Treasury (2022) – Protecting UK wholesale cash 
infrastructure.
Page 50
Part D: Our model for the digital pound
Part D sets out our proposed model for the digital pound and is organised around three
themes:
• Section D.1 sets out the platform model for provision of the digital pound. This 
describes the roles and expectations of the Bank and of the private sector in its 
delivery.
• Section D.2 sets out considerations around data and privacy. This describes the 
robust protections around data protection and privacy for users that would be part of 
the design for the digital pound.
• Section D.3 sets out the user experience. This describes the design features of the
digital pound that would benefit households and businesses and how they might 
interact with it.
Our analysis has been supported by consumer and merchant research (Annex 3), the
discussions of the CBDC Engagement Forum (comprising senior stakeholders from across 
business, academia, and civil society (Boxes K and L)), the Technology Forum (made up of 
expert technologists) and outreach to major UK financial institutions (Annex 4). More detailed
information about design, and some principal technology considerations, can be found in the 
accompanying Technology Working Paper.
The model for the digital pound set out in Part D is a proposal for a retail CBDC, designed for 
everyday payments by households and businesses. That contrasts with a ‘wholesale CBDC’, 
which would be for settlement of high-value payments between financial firms. Wholesale 
CBDC is discussed in Box H of this paper, alongside coverage of the Bank’s collaboration 
with industry to enhance wholesale payments through RTGS renewal and the RTGS future 
roadmap.
Page 51
Any model for the digital pound must meet a set of key criteria.
Based on the primary motivations set out in Part B, we have identified a set of criteria for the 
model of provision of the digital pound. We judge the model set out here meets these criteria 
and is the best design to support the objectives set out in Part B:
• To ensure that central bank money acts as the anchor of monetary and financial 
stability, the model should ensure access to financially risk-free central bank money, a 
direct end-user claim on the Bank and settlement finality for any transactions.
o The model should be interoperable with other forms of money, in particular
cash and bank deposits.
• To support innovation, choice and efficiency, the model should be extensible and 
flexible reflecting the fact that the future payments landscape is innovative and 
dynamic.
o The model should ensure a standard of operational resilience necessary for
major national infrastructure.
Our proposed model supports private sector innovation, safeguards data protection 
and privacy, and promotes accessibility.
The model set out in this section is judged to be the best design to support the objectives set 
out in Part B. It further supports private sector innovation, safeguards data protection and 
personal privacy, and promotes accessibility.
Page 52
Section D.1 The platform model and public-private partnership
The delivery of the digital pound would be a public-private partnership that reflects 
the comparative advantages of each sector.
One of the digital pound’s principal aims is to support payments innovation by the private 
sector. Publicly provided infrastructure that is open to use by all could catalyse innovative 
and efficient payment (and other) services provided by the private sector. It could also 
support participation in the digital economy by businesses – particularly small and mediumsized enterprises. 
Here we set out our high-level technology and operational architecture and define the 
infrastructure that would allow digital pounds to be held, transferred and used for payments. 
We also establish a boundary between what the Bank and the private sector would each do.
Page 53
We propose that the digital pound should be designed as a platform model, as originally set 
out in the Bank’s 2020 Discussion Paper. In the platform model, the Bank would issue the 
digital pounds which would be recorded in a ‘core ledger’. The Bank would build and operate
the ledger – a highly secure, fast and resilient technology platform – which would provide the 
minimum necessary functionality for the digital pound. Regulated private firms – Payment 
Interface Providers (PIPs) and External Service Interface Providers (ESIPs) – could then 
access the core infrastructure via an application programming interface (API). These private 
sector firms would deal with all user-facing interactions, including handling customers’ 
information, and be able to develop and offer innovative services using the digital pound
(Diagram D.1).
The public sector would offer infrastructure to support private sector innovation.
In the platform model, a payment made in digital pounds between two users would be 
processed and settled by a transfer on the Bank’s core ledger. Payment Interface Providers 
(PIPs) would be responsible for initiating these payments, but the transfer of holdings and 
settlement would occur at the central bank. The exchange of digital pounds into other forms 
of money, for example bank deposits, would involve links to other payment systems.
As a retail payment system executing payments on a real-time basis, the digital pound 
infrastructure must be operational 24/7 – i.e. at all times. There would be equivalent 
expections for private sector firms involved in the ecosystem.
The private sector would be responsible for interacting directly with end users. They would 
hold the customer’s information as banks do now. They would provide digital pass-through 
wallets – an interface that offers payments services and related products to users. These are 
known as ‘pass-through’ wallets because the user’s holdings of digital pounds are recorded 
on the Bank’s core ledger, and the wallet simply passes instructions from the user to that
core ledger. The private sector would never be in possession of end users’ digital pound 
funds. They would be responsible, however, for recording the identity of digital pound users 
and carrying out any necessary Know Your Customer (KYC) and Anti-Money Laundering
(AML) checks. The Bank would receive payment messages instructing transfers on the core 
ledger in anonymised form and would not know the identity of the payer and payee.
The platform model is agnostic to many technology decisions. For example, the core ledger 
operated by the Bank might be centralised, running as a traditional database, or it might use
distributed ledger technology (that might be blockchain or another technology). These 
concepts are discussed in the accompanying Technology Working Paper.
Page 54
We consider that the platform model we have proposed best meets our criteria but
will test this further in the next phase of our work.
A platform model offers a robust and unambiguous user claim on the Bank, and supports a 
diverse, innovative, and competitive Payment Interface Provider (PIP) and External Service 
Interface Provider (ESIP) ecosystem. It also provides a single infrastructure to support 
extensibility, offering common APIs for participants to connect to and build upon, as well as 
managing changes and updates in a single place. Given the possible single point of failure 
risk with the platform model, it would be necessary to ensure the infrastructure is protected to 
the very highest standards, including working together with the National Cyber Security 
Centre. Box G sets out alternative models of provision for comparison.
Diagram D.1: The platform model of the digital pound
Page 55
The digital pound model must support innovation and competition.
The digital pound technology architecture must be flexible, adaptable and extensible.
‘Layered’ architecture comprises the public infrastructure (the core ledger), a significant role 
for private innovators on the customer facing layers (wallets and devices) and standardised 
components (API interface). These elements are important for supporting ongoing innovation
and ensuring the platform model can keep pace with developments in payments habits and 
the wider digital economy.
The platform model of provision could support innovation and competition in three ways:
Mobilise Payment Interface Provider (PIP) participation: The digital pound would be
financially risk-free as market, credit, and liquidity risks are absent.63 PIPs, and the wallets 
they provide, would never be in possession of end-users’ digital pound funds so do not pose 
counterparty or credit risk to their customers. Therefore, PIPs are unlikely to need extensive 
prudential regulation that is typical of some other types of financial institution. As a result, the 
digital pound might offer an opportunity for payments innovators to mobilise their businesses 
in a simple, safe and proportionate framework. 
Accessible and open infrastructure: The digital pound, as an accessible public platform, 
could allow new entrants to offer innovative payment services without the need to develop 
extensive infrastructure or issue money of their own. The Bank would ensure that the digital 
pound system was open to all innovators who meet the requirements for participation. These
would include regulatory requirements, complying with the Bank’s rules as the operator of the 
digital pound system and being operationally robust. This openness may contrast with some 
proprietary infrastructures, which might have incentives to be closed or exclusive.
Start-ups and non-financial companies could be encouraged to enter the payments market
too. The simplicity of digital pound services could make this system a ‘safe space’ for 
innovation and might allow providers of wallets to have a wider variety of business models. 
For example, media, e-commerce and technology firms might integrate digital pound wallets
to add payment functionality to their digital business models.
Extensible architecture: To keep pace with future payment needs, and support continued 
innovation, the digital pound ecosystem must be extensible. Extensibility is a measure of how 
easy it is to expand a system’s features over time without affecting its internal structure. 
Extensibility would be an important part of the digital pound as it is difficult to predict what 
future payments needs might be, and how the digital economy might evolve. The core ledger 
would be a single piece of infrastructure that could be updated and upgraded as demands 
and needs change. 
63 To note, however, that the possibility of conduct and operational risks including in relation to the activities of 
Payment Interface Providers and External Service Interface Providers remains.
Page 56
Digital pass-through wallets allow customers to interact with their digital pound
holdings. 
Digital pass-through wallets would allow users to hold and use the digital pound, which would 
always be a direct liability of the Bank. Pass-through wallets contrast with a different type of 
wallet where the user’s funds are held as a claim on the wallet provider or held in custody by 
the wallet.
Wallet providers would be encouraged to provide an array of novel and user-friendly features 
and services, but all wallets would need to provide certain minimum functionality:
• Access to digital pounds: customers must be able to register on the digital pound 
ledger and open a wallet;
• Make payments: wallets should allow users to easily make and accept payments 
from merchants, to other users, and commercial bank accounts, as well as switch 
digital pounds into cash; 
• View balances and transaction history: users must be able to view their activity; 
and
• Mobility: customers must be able to switch easily between wallet providers and, if 
desired, close their wallet.
There would be opportunities for businesses who do not wish to process payments.
External Service Interface Providers (ESIPs) might also participate in the digital pound
ecosystem. These are firms whose business is not payments. ESIPs might provide services 
that augment digital pound wallets and are of value to users and merchants. Examples of 
services they might offer include business analytics, budgeting tools and fraud monitoring.
Subject to appropriate controls and user consents, ESIPs might be granted ‘read’ access to 
specific data on the digital pound ledger. A Payment Interface Provider authorised to operate 
in the digital pound system would automatically be able to undertake the activities of an 
ESIP.
Revenue models will be important for incentivising innovation. 
Private innovation depends on the existence of appropriate incentives, and the provision of 
infrastructure in support of innovation requires sustainable funding. As such, it is essential 
there are commercial opportunities for PIPs and ESIPs in the digital pound system.
Given the wide range of business models and commercial propositions that could offer digital 
pound services, it would be for the management of those firms to determine the appropriate 
revenue models. Some possible revenue streams that might support the provision of digital 
pound services are set out in Table D.2.
Page 57
Table D.2: Possible revenue streams that might support provision of digital pound 
services
We welcome feedback from prospective Payment Interface Providers (PIPs) and External 
Service Interface Providers (ESIPs), as well as wider stakeholders, on the revenue models 
PIPs and ESIPs may wish to adopt and seek their views on the commercial viability of such 
services.
We recognise that provision of digital pound services may be ancillary to some firms’ main 
business activities, whose principal revenue streams might be generated from other activities 
such as e-commerce, media or advertising. This poses the question of whether digital pound
related services must be viable on a stand-alone basis, or whether cross-subsidy or support 
from other business activities or group entities may be appropriate. Cross-subsidisation, as a 
pricing practice, has the potential to produce both positive but also negative effects for 
consumers and the wider market, including leading to market concentration and/or 
dependence on associated non-payments activities for the provision of critical digital pound 
services.64 We welcome respondents’ views on this, as we will consider this issue in further 
detail as the regulatory and operational requirements for PIPs and ESIPs are developed.
Involvement of non-financial firms could boost innovation and choice.
The participation of non-financial firms as PIPs or ESIPs in the digital pound ecosystem,
could bring significant benefits for choice and innovation. That would occur if they integrated
digital pound payments into their wider business, or they harnessed innovative capabilities 
from their other activities. 
64 Financial Conduct Authority (2016) – Price discrimination and cross-subsidy in financial services.
Revenue model Examples
Transaction fees levied on
merchants 
Currently one of the most common revenue models for 
payment service providers, such as acquirers. Affordable fees
would be needed to ensure access to public money.
Service or transaction fees 
levied on individuals 
Fees might apply on high-value, international and 
business-to-business payments.
Commercial use of data
Subject to the legal and policy considerations set out in 
Section D.2, PIPs might use transaction data to improve 
existing operations or to offer new customer-facing services.
Subscription or product 
fees for value-add 
services.
PIPs might charge a subscription fee for premium services that 
go beyond basic wallet functionality, for example budgeting 
tools.
Page 58
For example, micropayments might allow content-sharing platforms and broadcasters to 
generate revenues from individual content, rather than relying on subscriptions. Digital pound 
wallets might also at some stage be integrated into ‘Internet of Things’ (IoT) devices for 
machine-to-machine payments. 
Firms from the following sectors might particularly benefit from adding a digital pound wallet 
to their services, although this list is by no means exhaustive:
• Media and social media
• Broadcasters and content sharing platforms
• E-commerce and online marketplaces
• Retailers 
• Device manufacturers, consumer and home electronics and developers of smart 
and IoT devices
• Charities and community groups
Payment Interface Providers (PIPs) and External Service Interface Providers (ESIPs)
would operate within a robust legal and regulatory framework to protect users and 
ensure the resilience and integrity of the system.
For the digital pound to command trust and confidence and to uphold the Bank’s mission of 
monetary and financial stability, the system would need to be resilient and rigorously 
governed and regulated. 
PIPs and ESIPs would be robustly yet proportionately regulated to ensure resilience, 
continuity of operations and protection of customers.65 The specific regulatory treatment of 
PIPs and ESIPs in the digital pound system would be subject to further work by the relevant 
authorities. The regulation governing them would be 1) based on the precise activity 
performed, 2) proportionate to the risks they pose to themselves and the wider financial 
system, and 3) agnostic to the nature of technology.
As operator of the digital pound system, the Bank would likely impose principles for operation 
for PIPs and ESIPs, including technical standards, alongside regulatory requirements. Those 
principles would be developed as the design of the digital pound system matures and as 
likely business models become clearer but might include those set out in Diagram D.3.
65 Currently, in the UK, a number of regulatory authorities have supervisory remit in relation to the payments 
sector – see the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA); the Prudential Regulation Authority (PRA); the 
Payment Systems Regulator (PSR); and the Bank of England. There is ongoing work by HM Treasury, FCA, 
PSR and the Bank to ensure the regulatory regime for payments keeps pace with innovation.
Page 59
Diagram D.3: Examples of principles for Payment Interface Providers (PIPs) and
External Service Interface Providers (ESIPs)
• Availability: executing payments instructions on a real-time basis, 24/7 with no 
downtime.
• Security and resilience: effective end-to-end risk management to ensure services 
are available, secure and protected from threats. This includes plans for orderly 
transfer of users to other PIPs in the event of failure.
• Fast and convenient: provide fast, convenient and cost-efficient services.
• Interoperability: support exchange and conversion into other forms of money and 
ease of transfer to other PIPs; including adherence to any system-wide technology or 
operating requirements for interoperability laid down by the relevant authority.
• User friendly: promote ease of use among all users.
• Inclusion: offer access to payment services for the most vulnerable, or those in 
vulnerable circumstances, thereby avoiding unintended exclusion.
• Diversity and innovation: offer products and services that meet, evolve with and 
respond to societal changes and needs.
• Privacy: protect user privacy and give users control over who they share data with.
Activities of Payment Interface Providers might need to be restricted to safeguard system 
resilience, and limitations may need to be set to protect the digital pound system from 
financial and operational threats. This is to mitigate risks that might impair the system’s 
functionality and availability for users.
Page 60
There could also be a risk of contagion from certain financial activities that a PIP might 
undertake with non-digital pound funds, such as credit intermediation. These could threaten 
financial or operational resilience, including the PIP’s provision of wallet and payment 
services. We would monitor this and consider appropriate mitigants to ensure PIPs are 
resilient and not exposed to financial risks that might threaten their operational continuity.
Payment fraud has increased significantly in recent years.
Fraud is a major issue. There were an estimated 5.2 million fraud offences in the UK during 
2021, a 41% increase compared with 2019.66 In particular, there has been a substantial 
increase in Authorised Push Payment (APP) fraud. These are scams where a payer is 
deceived into authorising a payment to a criminal. According to UK Finance, APP fraud 
losses increased by 71% during 2021 H1 to £355 million, surpassing the amount of money 
stolen through card fraud for the first time. Given these trends, the digital pound would need 
to be designed in a way that mitigates the risk of such fraud. Learning lessons from previous 
implementations of digital payments innovations would be of paramount importance.
All entities in any digital pound ecosystem would have a responsibility to protect 
consumers from fraud and uphold robust financial crime controls.
Protection from fraud is a material consideration for the digital pound and represents a 
strategic issue for authorities and Payment Interface Providers alike. The mitigation of fraud 
requires effective financial crime controls, particularly rigorous identity verification, and 
analytics of user behaviours and payment patterns in the system. However, such safeguards 
would have trade-offs for financial inclusion, privacy, and overall system cost, given that 
identity verification and transaction monitoring would require resources and technology that 
may be expensive, and data and proof of identity that some may struggle to access or 
consider intrusive (Section D.2). The authorities will be mindful of this balance as they 
explore the digital pound, and it would be a significant consideration in any eventual design.
PIPs participating in the digital pound system would be held to at least the same standards
relating to financial crime as those to which regulated payment services providers are held 
today, including to prevent money laundering, terrorist financing, and fraud. 
No system is fool proof, and like any digital payment system, the digital pound would be 
exposed to fraud risk. A liability and compensation framework for instances of fraud in the
digital pound system would be needed. Further in-depth consideration will need to be given, 
by the relevant authorities in consultation with stakeholders, on the optimal liability and 
compensation framework for instances of fraud in the digital pound system.
66 See ONS Crime Survey for England and Wales.
Page 61
Box G: Alternative models of provision to the platform model
While the platform model is our preferred approach, there are other provisioning models 
that have been proposed. We set those out here. While these models do not, at this 
time, appear as suited to our policy objectives they are viable alternatives and may 
inform some part of any ultimate implementation. The platform model is the basis of an 
illustrative conceptual model within the accompanying Technology Working Paper.
An alternative approach is a delegated model.
Another approach would be a ‘delegated’ model. In this model, rather than have all 
holdings stored on the core ledger, individual Payment Interface Providers (PIPs) would 
have their own ledgers recording customer holdings. Transactions between users with
the same PIP would occur on that PIP’s ledger. For users of different PIPs, the 
transaction between them would be facilitated on the Bank’s core ledger. The core 
ledger in the delegated model records the movement of funds between different PIPs. 
This contrasts with the platform model, where the core ledger would process every 
transaction between every user. 
We judge that a delegated model is less effective at meeting our criteria. In this model, 
the PIP rather than the Bank has a record of a user’s holdings of digital pounds. This 
could undermine how clear and direct the user’s claim on the Bank is. This approach 
also places greater technical and operational requirements on PIPs. That may be
advantageous in reducing risks of the core ledger as a single point of failure, but could 
increase mobilisation requirements, making it harder for smaller firms to act as PIPs. 
A bearer instrument model is not appropriate.
Another approach is a bearer instrument model, where ownership of digital pounds is 
recorded on individual user devices, and transactions take place between users, with no 
interaction with the central bank. This is close to the way cash works at present. Such an 
approach presents several challenges. While hardware devices (for example, phones, 
wearables, cards) are difficult to hack, if that happens it is difficult to detect and to fix. 
Further, there is no trusted intermediary involved in transactions. That could give rise to
‘double spend risk’, where a user attempts to copy and spend the same digital pound 
multiple times. Also, a bearer instrument approach, where users never have to check 
back in with a central ledger, would lead to completely anonymous payments. This 
would go against our design principles for privacy and data protection, as well as laws to 
prevent financial crime (see Section D.2).
There is additional complexity for conducting transactions between two individuals over 
distance as both hardware devices would need to be updated accurately. For these 
reasons, bearer instrument models are not appropriate as the only operating model for 
the digital pound, but they may have uses as part of other use cases: bearer instruments 
may be the best approach for offline payments, for example.
Page 62
Reserve backed stablecoins would be economically similar to the digital 
pound, but are not a CBDC.
A non-bank stablecoin could have backing assets held entirely with the central bank. 
While this would be economically similar to the digital pound, such a stablecoin would be 
a liability of the private-sector issuer rather than a claim on the central bank. Such an 
approach has been described by some as ‘synthetic CBDC’ but, given the user’s claim is 
not on the central bank, this is not considered a CBDC, and is therefore not under 
consideration as part of our models of provision.67
67 BIS (2020) – Central bank digital currencies: foundational principles and core features provides further 
discussion of the term ‘synthetic CBDC’.
Page 63
Box H: Wholesale CBDC
Retail and wholesale CBDC
The Bank and HM Treasury are consulting on a proposal for a retail CBDC that would 
allow central bank money to be used in electronic form for everyday payments by 
households and businesses.
Wholesale payments are high-value transactions, typically between financial institutions, 
including the settlement of securities and foreign exchange. At present, the Bank 
enables wholesale settlement through the Clearing House Automated Payment System 
(CHAPS) and its Real-Time Gross Settlement (RTGS) service, whose participants 
include financial market infrastructures. The balances held within RTGS are a direct 
claim on the Bank of England and therefore a form of wholesale central bank money, as 
set out in Diagram B.2.
New technologies present the opportunity to innovate in the provision of wholesale 
money to financial institutions. Firms and public authorities, including the Bank of 
England, have been active in exploring them, through the enhancement of existing 
infrastructure or the concept of establishing a new wholesale CBDC platform.
There are many different models under investigation and different potential solutions or 
technologies to deliver enhanced provision of wholesale settlement in central bank 
money: 
• Transparency: using modern data interfaces and automation to allow financial 
firms and end users to be informed in real time about the status of payments and 
reach consensus for transactions to proceed;
• Availability: providing reliable settlement services on a 24/7 basis;
• Efficiency: minimising frictions in delivery of wholesale settlement;
• Atomicity: complex transactions can be made safer and more efficient by 
coordinating movements of assets and funds across different ledgers; and
• Access: expanding the use of central bank money for settlement, both by 
increasing uptake among already-eligible institutions and by extending eligibility 
to more types of institutions.
In delivering those outcomes, a wholesale CBDC could facilitate the innovation and 
experimentation that is taking place in wholesale markets, such as the development of 
DLT-based exchanges and settlement systems where tokenised financial securities 
could be issued and traded.
Page 64
There are three broad approaches that could be adopted to realise these benefits:
1. Enhance existing systems
2. Enable private sector innovation
3. Establish a new wholesale CBDC platform
1. Enhance existing systems
The Bank already provides central bank money in electronic form for wholesale 
settlement through its RTGS service. The Bank is improving this service through a 
transformational initiative to renew and enhance the current system. 68 At the heart of 
this is the delivery in 2024 of a modern, flexible and efficient core settlement engine, 
which will be modular, flexible and based on open standards (including ISO20022 for 
messages). 
Following consultation with industry, the Bank is developing a roadmap for RTGS 
beyond 2024.69 This will deliver greater digitisation of wholesale settlement and 
represent a fast and well understood approach to realising many of the benefits 
commonly associated with a wholesale CBDC.
The key features that will be delivered in the improved service are:
• The Bank will increase the transparency, efficiency and speed of information 
exchange through adopting the ISO 20022 standard and through the provision of 
APIs, and plans to expand the range of available APIs over time to meet user 
needs.
• The Renewed RTGS will be more available and capable of extending near 24/7 
operation. The Bank plans to explore which approach to operating hours delivers 
most value to industry while meeting our public policy objectives.
• The Roadmap for RTGS beyond 2024 includes proposals to deliver atomicity by
allowing third parties using DLT to coordinate transactions between RTGS and 
other ledgers. The Bank continues to explore this via Project Meridian, a joint 
initiative with the BIS Innovation Hub London Centre which is prototyping and 
testing the end-to-end flow of synchronised settlement.
68 Bank of England – RTGS Renewal Programme.
69 Bank of England (2022) – Roadmap for RTGS Service Beyond 2024.
Page 65
2. Enable private sector innovation
Within the RTGS Renewal Programme, the Bank’s focus has been to develop our 
roadmap for ongoing improvements to the RTGS service, in line with industry feedback 
and incorporating elements from previous proofs of concept and experiments. These
have included:
• DLT Proof of Concept: a project to explore and demonstrate basic functions of 
wholesale settlement using DLT.70 The Bank built on this work via a second 
exercise working with Baton Systems, Clearmatics Technologies Ltd, R3 and 
Token to ensure our renewed RTGS service could connect with systems based 
on DLT and other innovative technologies.71
• Cross-border Synchronisation: a joint project with Ripple demonstrating that 
synchronised FX transactions in two different simulated RTGS systems can be 
achieved, leading to the incorporation of synchronisation functionality into the 
roadmap for renewal.72
Building upon this collaboration with industry, the Bank has developed new policies and 
structures to enable the benefits of innovative technologies to be delivered by new types 
of private sector firms.73
In 2017, the Bank widened access by making non-bank payment service providers 
eligible to apply for a settlement account in RTGS.
In 2021, the Bank launched its Omnibus Account policy, which allows an operator of a 
payment system to fund their participants’ balances with central bank money.74 The 
Bank has already accepted an application for an operator that uses DLT. Omnibus 
Accounts will allow private sector operators to provide settlement in central bank money 
in ways that deliver the benefits of transparency, availability and atomicity, while also 
supporting innovative use cases of central bank money to improve access. 
The Bank continues to engage with private sector firms to understand potential new 
models of wholesale settlement and how these can be supported going forward. 
Alongside this work, the Government announced in April 2021 the creation of a new 
sandbox for firms exploring how to use technologies such as DLT to improve financial 
market infrastructure. The sandbox will be delivered jointly by the Bank, HM Treasury 
and the FCA, and will launch later in 2023.
70 Bank of England (2016) – PwC FinTech Accelerator Proof of Concept.
71 Bank of England (2018) – Baton Systems, Clearmatics Technologies Ltd, R3 and Token proof of 
concept.
72 Bank of England (2017) – Ripple proof of concept.
73 Cunliffe (2022) – Reflections on DeFi, digital currencies and regulation.
74 Bank of England (2021) – Bank of England publishes policy for omnibus accounts in RTGS.
Page 66
3. Establish a new wholesale CBDC platform
A new platform could enable a wide range of new technological capabilities. However, in 
the UK, this approach would have a long lead time compared to the renewed RTGS 
which will start delivering in 2024. 
The global central banking community continues to experiment with technologies 
associated with wholesale CBDC (including establishing new infrastructure). The Bank 
engages closely with such initiatives to evaluate whether wholesale CBDC technologies 
offer benefits to the UK and, if so, whether they might best be delivered via the renewed 
RTGS service, or whether new infrastructure might be needed. In particular, the Bank is 
closely involved with the work of the BIS Innovation Hub, especially its London Centre, 
so is well positioned to understand and learn from the range of experiments and 
approaches being trialled internationally with regard to wholesale CBDC, and wholesale 
settlement more broadly.75
Diagram D.4: The Bank of England’s vision for RTGS
Consultation questions
2.Do you have comments on our proposition for the roles and responsibilities of private 
sector digital wallets as set out in the platform model? Do you agree that private sector 
digital wallet providers should not hold end users’ funds directly on their balance sheets?
75 As at July 2022, 28 central banks were investigating CBDC with wholesale applications in some capacity 
(proofs of concept or research). Auer et al (2022) – Rise of the CBDCs: drivers, approaches and 
technologies.
Page 67
Section D.2 Data protection and privacy
The digital pound would be subject to rigorous standards of privacy and data 
protection. This is fundamental to trust and confidence in money.
Individuals' privacy, user control and the proper use of personal data in line with UK data 
protection laws are of paramount importance to the public, the Bank and the Government. 
Research by the Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) shows that the public continues to 
be concerned about issues relating to the storage and use of their personal data.76 Those 
issues have become more important as the UK economy has become more digital. Access 
to, and use of, personal data has also become increasingly commercially valuable for firms, 
making informed choice and control around the sharing and use of data by consumers 
critical.
Transparency and clear understanding of the rights and tools around personal data will
promote good data use, which is critical to the success of the digital pound.
76 ICO (2021) – Information Rights Strategic Plan: Trust and Confidence, page 14.
Page 68
All digital payments made by individuals today, such as card payments or bank 
transfers, generate personal data.
Digital transactions like debit card purchases or bank transfers generate personal data in 
relation to location, time and date, method of payment and transaction value. Digital 
transactions account for the majority of transactions in the UK today.
These personal data are held and used by providers – banks and other payment firms
– for anti-fraud and financial crime reasons.
Personal data from bank account transactions is used and stored by firms to comply with 
legal and regulatory data capture requirements in the UK’s Anti-Money Laundering (AML)
and Combatting the Financing of Terrorism (CFT) Regimes. For example, those regimes
require that users’ personal data is captured by firms in order for them to carry out the 
customer due diligence, or sufficient monitoring required to detect money laundering.77 Firms 
also have to comply with data capture requirements in the UK’s Payment Services 
Regulations 2017.
Access to these data is governed by applicable UK data protection laws, which are 
supported by ICO guidance. 
As with all personal data controlled and processed – including personal data from bank 
account transactions – firms also have to comply with UK data protection laws.78 Subject to 
UK data protection law, such personal data can also be used and stored by providers to 
manage commercial relationships, develop marketing activities as well as develop and tailor 
products and services. 
Law enforcement agencies or competent authorities which seek to access and 
process personal data for the primary purpose of law enforcement have to do so on a 
fair and lawful basis.
Today, law enforcement agencies and competent authorities can seek to access personal 
data held by firms, for example bank account transactions data, so long as the primary 
purpose is law enforcement. This purpose is defined in Section 31 of the Data Protection Act 
2018 as the prevention, investigation, detection or prosecution of criminal offences or the 
execution of criminal penalties, including safeguarding against and prevention of threats to 
public security.
Firms that hold personal data can also share those data provided that there is a lawful basis. 
For example, firms might share personal data where there is a need to report a crime or
comply with a formal request or court order from a law enforcement authority. 
77 The UK’s AML and CFT Regime includes the Money Laundering, Terrorist Financing and Transfer of 
Funds (Information on the Payer) Regulations 2017, and the Funds Transfer Regulation 2015.
78 UK Data Protection Law includes the UK General Data Protection Regulation, the Data Protection Act 2018
and the Privacy and Electronic Communications Regulations 2003. 
Page 69
Before sharing individuals’ personal data, Article 6(1) of the UK GDPR requires that firms 
must be satisfied that sharing personal data with a law enforcement authority is lawful. This is 
because firms are obliged to protect the personal data of individuals that they control and 
process. 
The digital pound would have at least the same level of privacy as a bank account 
and would also allow users to make choices about data use.
Responses to the Bank’s 2020 Discussion Paper emphasised the importance that users 
place on having privacy in their transactions. Security and privacy were often cited as 
aspects on which there should be little or no room for compromise. The Bank and 
Government agree, and this perspective informs our proposals for the digital pound’s design.
We therefore propose that the digital pound is at least as private as current forms of digital 
money, like the money in a commercial bank account or e-money. Digital pound users will be 
able to make choices about the way their data is used. We are supportive of, and encourage, 
firms to offer services that enable holders to opt for enhanced privacy functionality and exert 
greater user control of personal data. The digital pound will be set up in a way that enables
this.
Diagram D.5: Privacy objectives for the digital pound
Page 70
As set out in Diagram D.5, the key objectives of the digital pound in the context of privacy 
and data protection are that:
• Neither the Government nor the Bank would have access to digital pound users’ 
personal data except for law enforcement agencies under limited circumstances, 
prescribed in law, and on the same basis as currently with other digital payments.
• The digital pound would not be anonymous because the ability to identify and verify 
users is needed to prevent financial crime.
• Users should be able to choose from a range of wallet services – varying levels of 
identification would be accepted to cater to different preferences and ensure that the
digital pound is accessible for all.
• Users should be able to vary their privacy preferences to suit their needs, within 
parameters set by the law and the Bank and the Government as part of system 
design.
• Enhanced privacy functionality could result in digital pound users securing greater 
benefits from sharing their personal data.
The Bank of England, as operator of the payment system, would not have access to 
personal data.
Our proposal for the digital pound foresees that Payment Interface Providers (PIPs) would 
manage user wallets, but the Bank would run the digital pound infrastructure by operating 
and maintaining the core ledger. 
PIPs would anonymise personal data before any sharing with the Bank (Diagram D.6). It is 
crucial that, from the Bank’s perspective, these data would be anonymised and not be 
considered personal data. The Bank will conduct tests, and evaluate the legal, technical, and 
operational standards needed to operationalise such a system in the next phase of its work. 
Access to some data may be useful in the running of the core ledger, and to support 
innovation. We propose that while the Bank would not have access to users’ personal data, it 
should have access to anonymised transaction data and aggregated system-wide data. This 
would provide an overview of the total transactions – for example, volumes and values –
taking place over a given period. 
Those data could also provide insights that may support innovation and improve the provision 
of services to both digital pound users and PIPs. The Bank and HM Treasury will consult on 
what data might be collected and for what purposes in due course.
Page 71
As is the case today with private forms of digital money such as bank accounts, law 
enforcement agencies and competent authorities could only access digital pound 
data where there is a fair and lawful basis. This is in compliance with data protection 
laws.
Law enforcement and competent authorities may need information on digital pound 
transactions to carry out law enforcement or intelligence investigations. In the same way and 
on the same basis as currently for existing commercial bank accounts, any law enforcement 
or Government agency that seeks to access and process digital pound users’ personal data 
from PIPs would have to do so on a lawful basis in compliance with the Data Protection Act 
2018.
Outside these instances, and as is the case for other existing forms of digital money including 
bank accounts, the law enforcement agencies and competent authorities would not have 
access to digital pound users’ personal data.
Diagram D.6: Users will interact with intermediaries, rather than directly with 
the Bank
Page 72
The digital pound would not be anonymous because, just like bank accounts, the 
ability to identify and verify users is necessary to prevent financial crime. Payment 
Interface Providers (PIPs) would gather and have access to personal data.
Just like opening a bank or other payment account, some level of identity verification would 
be required when opening a digital pound wallet, in order to prevent financial crime. These 
requirements would be consistent with those that legally apply today and in the future for 
financial and payments institutions. The UK Digital Identity and Attributes Trust Framework, 
including the confidence levels outlined in Good Practice Guide 45, could be used by PIPs 
and users to support access to a digital pound.79
PIPs would hold the direct commercial relationships with users. To establish and maintain 
these relationships, PIPs would require identity information of wallet account holders, which 
would allow them to carry out KYC checks and comply with AML regulations. They would be 
responsible for ensuring their compliance with data protection law and the preservation of 
digital pound users’ privacy rights. Digital pound users would continue to be able to protect 
their personal data to today’s legal standards and future data protection rights.
Small cash payments are anonymous but larger value transactions require more data 
collection to help mitigate financial crime.
Cash, as a physical form of money, has lower amounts of data collection than other forms. 
However, the UK AML and CFT Regime dictates that additional information about the payer 
must be collected for large-value transactions made in cash. 
The digital pound would have lower frictions than physical cash, so carries higher 
risks of abetting crime. It is not therefore appropriate to allow such anonymity for 
digital pounds.
The physical, as opposed to digital, nature of cash means that it is harder to make large 
payments with, or store large amounts of, cash than it is to do the same with digital money, 
which in itself acts to limit the scale of its use in financial crime. In this regard, the digital 
pound would be more similar to a bank account than cash and hence it would be 
inappropriate to allow large-scale anonymous transactions in digital pounds.
However, we are supportive of exploring ways to allow small numbers of small value 
transactions in digital pounds to have higher levels of privacy.
It may, however, be appropriate and possible to allow low values of digital pounds to be 
spent with lower data collection requirements. We are supportive of firms exploring this in two 
ways: tiered identity verification and enhanced privacy controls.
79 The Trust Framework creates a set of rules and standards to facilitate common recognition and 
interoperability of certified digital identities. This allows an individual to bind personal information to their digital 
identity and share this information as needed. The system allows for information to be established with varying 
levels of confidence. These levels of confidence are stipulated by a combination of the number of pieces of 
identity evidence, the strength and validity of the evidence, their activity history, and identity fraud.
Page 73
Digital pound users should be able to choose from a range of wallet services. Varying 
levels of identification would be accepted to ensure services are accessible for all. 
An important way in which different services can be provided to users, reflecting differing 
preferences and to ensure accessibility for all, is to support and encourage tiered access to 
the digital pound. 
Tiered accounts – allowing customers to make low value digital payments with lower KYC 
requirements – exist in the payments market today. Many existing payments firms develop 
and shape their customer value propositions around what is legally permitted by linking the 
strength of user identity verification to access and payments functionalities. 
For the digital pound, tiered access would allow for different levels of user access and 
functionality based on the amount of identification (ID) a user is willing or able to provide. The 
stronger ID information a user provides, the more types and higher values of payments they 
would be able to undertake. For example, users might be able to open a basic digital pound 
wallet with limited ID, which would allow for limited functionality, low-value payments. For 
more advanced and higher value services, users would provide more or stronger forms of ID. 
This tiered approach would link the strength of a user’s proof of identity to the transaction 
amounts and types permitted in their digital pound wallet.
Basic access to the digital pound wallet with limited identity verification can be designed so 
as to be consistent with existing legal requirements in the UK AML and CFT Regime and the 
Payment Services Regulations 2017. To support access to the digital pound, HM Treasury 
and the Bank would be supportive of the private sector developing and offering basic tiered 
access to all users and welcomes views from respondents on this point.
Digital pound users should be able to vary their privacy preferences to suit their 
needs.
HM Treasury and the Bank of England would seek to provide for a digital pound that offers 
users control over their personal transactions data. This is consistent with the UK’s National 
Data Strategy and the Government’s aim to create an environment where data is 
appropriately usable, accessible, and available across the economy, while protecting 
people’s data rights and private enterprises’ intellectual property.
Some private providers currently offer the option to shield some personal data generated 
when making some forms of digital payments for privacy or security reasons, for instance 
with prepaid and disposable cards. For these services, providers must collect the data that is 
required for legal purposes, for example in the course of AML checks, but (unlike in many 
other services) they do not collect additional data. Subject to user agreement, the data which 
digital pound users decide not to shield could be used by Payment Interface Providers for 
commercial purposes, for example to provide additional value-added services.
Page 74
The digital pound should be designed to enable PIPs to offer such services. Users’ control 
over personal data generated by their transactions could be achieved by designing a system 
that supports good data protection and privacy by design which includes privacy-enhancing 
techniques. This is explored in more detail in the Technology Working Paper. 
Any commercial use of personal data would need to comply with UK data protection laws. 
Informing digital pound users of their rights, the value of their personal data and putting at 
their disposal the tools to control that data might provide users with the opportunity for 
additional choice or convenience and would help build the trust that will be essential to the 
uptake of the digital pound. 
Enhanced privacy functionality could result in digital pound users securing greater 
benefits from sharing their personal data.
The UK has been at the forefront of the successful execution of increased data sharing to 
benefit consumers. For example, Open Banking enables customers to direct their banks to 
securely share their data with third-party providers and has led to the emergence of 
innovative services and benefits for customers. 
Research commissioned by the ICO found that choices over personal data are very important 
to consumers who want to understand what they can do with their personal data, for example 
preserving or maintaining their privacy or even securing economic value from its use. There 
is public appetite for trading personal information for access to products and services.80
The UK’s National Data Strategy recognises that a data ecosystem which removes barriers 
to responsible data-sharing and use has the potential to transform almost every part of our 
society and economy. Mission 1 of the Strategy is focused on unlocking the value of data 
across the wider economy. Lawful use of digital pound data – governed by choices made by 
users of the digital pound – could contribute to this strategy.
Consultation questions
3.Do you agree that the Bank should not have access to users’ personal data, but 
instead see anonymised transaction data and aggregated system-wide data for the 
running of the core ledger? What views do you have on a privacy-enhancing digital 
pound?
4.What are your views on the provision and utility of tiered access to the digital pound 
that is linked to user identity information?
5.What views do you have on the embedding of privacy-enhancing techniques to give 
users more control of the level of privacy that they can ascribe to their personal 
transactions data?
80 ICO (2021) – Information Rights Strategic Plan: Trust and Confidence, page 5.
Page 75
Section D.3 User experience for households and businesses
Diagram D.7: the user experience of the digital pound
People and businesses would be the main users of the digital pound. 
The digital pound would be designed for households and businesses to use for everyday 
payments – both in-person and online. This section set outs aspects of design that are 
relevant to individuals using the digital pound (for more information on how businesses might 
use the digital pound, see Box I).
Page 76
The digital pound would support two essential types of payment:
• Person-to-business (P2B) – both ‘in-store’ (such as buying groceries in a supermarket) 
and ‘online’. 
• Person-to-person (P2P), such as sending money to a friend. 
The Bank’s recent consumer research found that most (88%) P2B in-store payments are 
made using debit and credit cards, but cash is still relevant for two in five consumers.81
Online, card payments are most popular (74%), while other options such as wallets like 
PayPal provide an increasingly used alternative. That is likely because convenience and the 
speed of notice of receipt of payment are the most important factors in the payment 
experience.
There may be scope to improve existing methods used by individuals to make transfers.
There are generally fewer methods available for P2P payments compared to options for
when individuals pay businesses, and current P2P payments can be inconvenient. The 
Bank’s consumer research found that 81% of respondents made a P2P payment, mostly by 
online bank transfer.82 The digital pound could offer an easy method of P2P payment and 
add to the current choices available.
All UK residents would be able to hold and use digital pounds. Non-UK resident individuals
would be able to hold and use digital pounds when visiting the UK (for example, as tourists), 
and when outside the UK for payments with either a UK or non-UK resident. To ensure 
consistency and equal treatment, non-residents’ holdings of digital pounds would be on the 
same basis as residents. 
Non-resident access would involve two requirements. First, a recognition regime to determine 
which non-UK Payment Interface Providers and External Service Interface Providers could
offer digital pound wallets and other services. That would ensure that UK standards of 
resilience, consumer protection, AML, KYC and any other legal requirements are upheld. 
Second, the UK authorities might reserve the right not to grant access to digital pounds for 
non-residents from certain high-risk jurisdictions. That includes potentially considering the 
Financial Action Task Force’s list of countries judged as having weak regimes to combat AML
and CFT.
81 Market research (Annex 3).
82 As part of the Bank’s market research with YouGov and London Economics, 72 participants took part in a 
discussion forum. This included a seven-day payment diary. See Annex 3 for further information.
Page 77
Payments in digital pounds may involve a variety of devices.
Users should be able to make and receive digital pound payments in a range of ways, 
including, but not exclusively:
• Smart devices, in particular smartphones, but also desktops, laptops, tablets, 
wearables, and Internet of Things (IoT) devices;
• Smart cards, similar to existing payment cards today;
• E-commerce websites and applications; and
• Point-of-Sale (PoS) devices, including those that exist in stores today.
Ultimately, the specific devices and form factors would be developed by private providers.83
The Bank would still have a role in defining aspects of how they operate, and ensuring they 
meet necessary standards for accessibility and inclusion. 
Users would be likely to make digital pound payments using smartphones or cards. 
Based on current trends in payments, we expect that most users would access their digital 
pounds via a wallet hosted on their smartphone. Users would be able to sign up for a wallet, 
which would allow them to manage their balance and make payments. Payments could then
be made either by placing a smartphone near a reader, much like with card or mobile 
payments today, or by using the digital pound wallet to send a payment to another person or 
business (Diagram D.8). Payments would be quick, with immediate confirmation that the 
payment has been processed alongside updated balances. 
Digital pound payments under the proposed model could also use options such as physical 
cards, which would help support financial inclusion and accessibility. That is because not 
everyone has a smartphone, and some people find them difficult to use.
Initially, using digital pounds would be designed to feel like existing payment methods. It 
would need to be designed to work with existing online and in-store payments technology, 
such as card readers. That would mean that merchants would not have to buy new 
infrastructure, encouraging adoption.
Encouraging innovation is a priority for the digital pound. We expect that innovators could
develop new devices and ways to pay which offer more convenience and functionality. That 
might include devices such as wearables (for example, smartwatches or wristbands) and IoT
devices (for example, smart speakers, intelligent fridges or TVs).
83 Form factors include, for example, smartphones, tablets, wearables, smart cards etc.
Page 78
Diagram D.8: The digital pound would be compatible with different devices to
ensure it can be used for making and accepting payments.
Although in-store, online and person-to-person payments would be the initial focus of 
the digital pound, that may broaden out in future.
All payments should be able to be made using the digital pound so long as they are lawful, 
observe any restrictions (for example, maximum user holdings – see below) and comply with 
regulatory obligations laid down by authorities. Subject to a payment being lawful, the Bank 
would be neutral in processing it, and does not envisage applying any limitations on 
payments on ethical grounds.
Over time, we would expect the digital pound to enable a broader range of payments than 
those commonplace today. That is especially important given the evolving payments 
landscape and our wish to facilitate innovation. Examples of those payments might be split, 
batch or micropayments.84 We also intend to do further exploration of offline and cross-border 
payments.
84 Split payments are where one payment instruction has multiple beneficiaries. Micropayments are payments 
for very small amounts.
Page 79
We do not propose to develop a digital pound that enables government or central 
bank-initiated programmable money. As discussed in Part B, payments programmability
could provide enhanced functionality for users to set rules on their payments. While it may be 
possible to program the digital pound so that it could only work in certain ways, this is not 
relevant to HM Treasury and the Bank’s policy objectives for the digital pound. Further, this 
functionality could damage the uniformity of the CBDC and cause user distrust. For these 
reasons, HM Treasury and the Bank will not pursue government or central bank-initiated 
programmable functions.
However, during our research, stakeholders highlighted the potential benefits of 
programmability for innovation and user experience. HM Treasury and the Bank would 
therefore permit Payment Interface Providers and External Service Interface Providers to 
implement such functionalities themselves, but they would require user consent and not be at 
HM Treasury or the Bank’s direction.
Like a physical banknote, the digital pound would be unremunerated.
Our vision for the digital pound is similar to that of a digital banknote. Accordingly, we 
propose that the digital pound, like banknotes, would not be remunerated. This means it 
would not pay (nor charge) an interest rate. That is for three reasons:
• First, the digital pound is intended to be a means of payment, like cash or a current 
account. It is not intended as a savings product, so it does not need to be 
remunerated. Not remunerating the digital pound would also mean it would not 
compete with bank accounts as a way to hold savings. This would reduce impacts on
the banking sector.
• Second, using the digital pound for monetary policy reasons is not a motivation for its 
introduction (Part C and Box F). That means there is no current need for the digital 
pound to be remunerated.
• Third, to achieve its objective as a monetary anchor, the digital pound would need to 
be widely available and useable, but does not need to be the dominant form of money 
for retail payments. Remuneration is therefore not required to incentivise its uptake.
Any decision to revisit the approach to remuneration after the digital pound is 
introduced would be preceded by a review with full consultation. 
Were the approach to remuneration to change after the digital pound was introduced, it would 
follow consultation and the Bank would provide adequate lead time, so that holders of digital 
pounds were able to exit from, or enter, the system in an orderly manner, if they wished to.
That would allow them to switch their funds held in digital pounds into other forms of money 
such as commercial bank deposits and cash.
Page 80
The Bank would place some limits on holdings of digital pounds, at least during its 
introductory period. An individual limit of between £10,000 and £20,000 is proposed.
Although the digital pound should be widely available for retail use to achieve its objectives
(Part B), it must also be designed in a way that manages any risks to financial and monetary 
stability. As set out in Part C, those risks largely stem from any large and rapid outflows from 
bank deposits into digital pounds, and from wholesale use disrupting the function of critical 
money markets. These risks would depend on uptake of the digital pound, which is difficult to 
predict and may vary during the introductory period and times of stress. 
A limit on individual holdings would be intended to manage those risks by constraining the 
degree to which deposits could flow out of the banking system. That is important during the 
introductory period as we learn about the impact of the digital pound on the economy. 
That limit would, however, be set in a way that supports wide usability of the digital pound. 
For example, users may want to use their digital pound wallet to receive their salary, which 
may vary over time and may include bonuses or overtime payments. Any limit would also 
need to consider the roll-over of any balances from the previous month. So the limit should 
be set in a way that ensures there is enough headroom to accommodate these, as well as
supporting transactions. Technical solutions will also be required to ensure that incoming 
payments that would otherwise breach these limits do not fail. For example, one mechanism 
might be functionality for incoming funds that would take a user’s holdings of digital pounds 
above the limit to be automatically ‘swept’ into a nominated account where it can be held in 
another form of money, such as a commercial bank deposit.
We judge that a limit of between £10,000 and £20,000 per individual is likely to strike an 
appropriate balance between managing risks and supporting wide usability of the digital 
pound.
Chart D.9 combines monthly data on income distributions and estimates of potential variation 
in non-regular incomes and roll-over balances, to show how various limits on digital pound
holdings could affect usage depending on users’ income.
For example, a limit of £10,000 would allow 75% of UK income earners to hold their salary, 
pre-existing balances as well as an illustrative 10% bonus or overtime payment. Incomes 
vary by region, age, and gender, so a limit could be more restrictive for some individuals than 
others. A £20,000 limit would allow 95% of income earners in the UK to use their digital 
pound wallet to receive their salary without regularly reaching their holding limit. That would
improve usability but be less effective at curbing outflows from bank deposits.
We seek feedback on the proposed holding limit of £10,000–£20,000 per individual. We also 
recognise the limit may vary over time to take account of developments in the period leading 
up to, and after, any launch.
Page 81
Chart D.9: A limit between £10,000 and £20,000 would allow most people to receive 
their pay in digital pounds (a)
Sources: Office for National Statistics, XpertHR and Bank calculations.
(a) Monthly disposable (post-tax) income from the Household Finances Survey (HFS) (April 2019 – March 
2020); an illustrative bonus of 10% of annual salary (based on a salary survey from 2017) is applied across the 
entire income distribution; bonus assumed to be paid as a lump-sum in a single month; the monthly roll-over 
balance is estimated from monthly income less expenditure. 
We also welcome views on a lower limit, such as £5,000. 
A lower limit, such as £5,000, would be more effective at curbing the potential for large and 
rapid bank deposit outflows. That would provide a stronger safeguard against risks to 
financial stability, including those which could arise were there also other new forms of digital 
money, such as stablecoins, to which deposits could flow out to at the same time.
But a limit of £5,000 could prove less useful, as only about one third of people would be able 
to comfortably receive their salary and bonus as digital pounds.
We welcome feedback from respondents to this consultation on the optimal holding limit for 
the digital pound, to reach an informed decision in future.
Page 82
Limits would be in place at least during transition. They could be amended in future.
Limits would be in place at least during the transition period. That period, which may last 
several years, is when uncertainty about demand for the digital pound would be highest and 
the Bank would be learning about how the economy reacts to its introduction. 
Any future changes to limits would follow consultation and include an assessment against our 
guiding principles of: adoption and use of the digital pound; developments in the UK 
payments landscape; and whether other means of managing financial stability risks could be 
used instead. 
Moving between digital pounds and other types of money must be fast and easy.
Households and businesses currently use a mix of bank deposits and cash and can move 
between them with relative ease. It must also be simple, fast and convenient to move 
between the digital pound and other forms of money, in particular cash and bank deposits.85
Interoperability is supported today by infrastructures, for example LINK and ATMs for 
switching between cash and bank deposits.86 As we continue our in-depth technology 
research, we will review the extent to which existing and prospective infrastructures, including 
the renewed RTGS service and the New Payments Architecture (NPA) can support 
interoperability for the digital pound.
The Bank’s accompanying Technology Working Paper discusses the options for enabling 
interoperability between the digital pound and cash, and the digital pound and bank deposits 
respectively. 
85 The physical nature of cash makes moving between it and other forms of money more challenging than digital 
money, but it is important that the aim remains to achieve simple, fast and convenient movement. This is likely 
to require working with existing cash distribution market participants.
86 LINK.
Page 83
Box I: Corporates and the digital pound
The digital pound is designed for use by households and businesses. Most of the user 
experience set out in Part D reflects the likely use by individuals, rather than businesses. 
Corporate use of the digital pound is still being explored and would particularly benefit 
from further input from stakeholders on the issues set out in this box.
The principles for corporate use of the digital pound are similar to that of individuals. 
That is, the digital pound should be used for everyday payments, it should be fast and 
easy to use and to move between other forms of money.
How many digital pounds should corporates be able to hold?
Similar to individuals, there would be limits on the amount of digital pounds that 
corporates can hold but the proposed amount is still being explored.
For retail payments, businesses would need to be able to accept any payments made by 
their customers in digital pounds. As with individuals, though, there would need to be 
restrictions on corporates. That would safeguard against risks to monetary and financial 
stability from switching of wholesale deposits currently held with banks and diversion of 
corporate funds that would otherwise be invested in other financial assets.87
Given the larger size of corporate balance sheets, any limits would need to be 
significantly larger than the £10,000–£20,000 proposed for individuals. But corporates 
also vary in size and in the volume of transactions they undertake. That makes it more 
challenging to design a one-size-fits-all limit for corporates. It may be necessary to set a 
relatively high limit to ensure they can receive payments at peak times. 
Technology solutions might support a lower corporate limit, safeguarding against risks to 
financial and monetary stability, while not impairing corporates’ ability to make and 
receive payments. For example, holdings above the level of the limit might be 
automatically ‘swept’ into a nominated bank account. This might occur at a set 
frequency, for example, at the end of, or at regular intervals during, the day. Or, if the 
transfer to bank deposits was near-instantaneous, on any incoming balance that would 
breach the limit. That might allow for a low limit for corporates, even towards zero. 
Whether such automated transfers are both desirable and feasible will be an area for 
further research.
87 This would also avoid individuals registering as a corporate to avoid the individual holding limit.
Page 84
Which types of corporate should have access to the digital pound? 
The digital pound is for retail payments and not for financial market activity. The most 
direct way of maintaining a retail focus would be to restrict which types of business could 
hold digital pounds. For example, financial firms’ access could be restricted to prevent 
wholesale financial activity being conducted in digital pounds given the disruptive impact 
this could have on core financial markets.
In practice, distinguishing which type of business should or should not have access to 
the digital pound is challenging. Large non-financial firms may still be active in financial 
and money markets which could be deemed to be ‘wholesale’ activity. And financial 
firms may need to make payments considered to be ‘retail’, such as paying their staff or
paying out insurance claims to customers.
The Bank will explore this issue through a combination of research and engagement 
with private sector firms.
Non-resident individuals would have access, but whether, and to what extent, 
non-resident corporates have access to the digital pound will also be subject to further 
work.
Page 85
Box J: Financial inclusion
Tackling financial exclusion, particularly as financial services become more 
digital, is a priority for the Government.
Financial inclusion means that everyone, regardless of their background or income, has 
access to useful and affordable financial products and services such as banking, 
payment services, credit, insurance, and the use of financial technology.
Tackling financial exclusion across the UK is an important priority for the Government. It 
means ensuring that people can access useful, affordable financial products and 
services whatever their income or background and at all stages in their financial lives. 
Advancements in technology, societal changes and economic trends foster innovation 
and provide opportunities to make products and services more inclusive and accessible. 
However, they may also result in new risks for consumers – especially those who are 
vulnerable. These risks need to be mitigated by adequate and flexible policy 
development, effective regulatory frameworks and consideration of inclusive product 
design.
The Government works closely with regulators, industry and the third sector to advance 
financial inclusion. And it recognises that fair and affordable access to relevant financial 
products and services is vital in people’s everyday lives, whether that is opening a bank 
account to receive an income, accessing credit, securing insurance, or retirement 
planning. 
Building people’s financial capability so they can use and maximise their use of financial 
products and services is also important. Government policy on financial capability 
focuses on ensuring that people can access the guidance and advice they need and 
have the confidence and skills to successfully engage with their personal finances. 
Government initiatives have continued to make progress on financial 
inclusion.
Over the last year, the Government has continued to make significant progress on 
financial inclusion. The UK has a vibrant financial services sector and levels of financial 
inclusion are high compared to many of its international counterparts. 
For example, the Government’s work on access to banking and bank accounts is critical 
to allow people to manage their money effectively, securely, and confidently. The nine 
largest personal current account providers in the UK are legally required to offer basic 
bank accounts to customers who do not have a bank account or who are not eligible for 
a bank’s standard current account. As of 30 June 2021, there were over 7.2 million basic 
bank accounts open at the nine designated institutions.88
88 Gov.UK (2022) – Basic bank accounts: July 2020 to June 2021.
Page 86
In the longer-term, access to cash is key to the Government’s work on financial 
inclusion. The Government is legislating to protect access to cash and ensure that the 
UK’s cash infrastructure remains sustainable. Covid-19 has increased the pace of 
digitisation and the adoption of alternative ways of making payments, but the 
Government recognises that millions of people continue to use cash across the UK, 
particularly those in vulnerable groups. 
Other examples of the Government’s recent work on financial inclusion include the 
legislation that has been introduced to enable credit unions to offer a wider number of 
products and services and the piloting of a No-Interest Loan Scheme.
The digital pound could provide an extra option for some financially 
excluded groups.
There are multiple factors that contribute to financial exclusion and those who are 
financially excluded are typically less engaged with the financial services industry. It is 
therefore challenging to determine the likely level of appetite for the digital pound among 
this group. But the introduction of the digital pound has the potential to encourage 
innovative approaches from industry to tackle some existing financial inclusion issues.
For example, consideration of how to get payments to people who do not have a bank 
account. It could also provide greater functionality for those with specific vulnerabilities 
and greater product diversity in the market.
CBDCs have been launched in some other countries with a view to tackling financial 
inclusion issues around access to payments. But these benefits are unlikely to present 
themselves in the same way in the UK, given our established and well-functioning 
payments infrastructure. 
Adoption among the financially excluded could be hampered by an 
unwillingness or inability to use digital payments. Digital inclusion therefore
needs to be promoted alongside financial inclusion.
With the ever-increasing digitisation of financial services, it has become clear that some 
financial exclusion is ultimately driven by digital exclusion. Some individuals may not 
have the digital skills or access to the right technology required to navigate and access 
financial services and products such as online banking or payments. It is estimated that, 
in February 2020, 4.7 million adults were digitally excluded, representing almost 10% of 
the population (Chart D.10).89 The link between a lack of digital skills and connectivity 
and financial exclusion was further demonstrated by the Covid-19 pandemic which 
highlighted the need for access to digital infrastructure and skills necessary to fully 
participate in society and the economy. 
89 Financial Conduct Authority (2020) – Financial Lives Survey.
Page 87
The digital pound should be designed in a way which can provide for those who are 
digitally excluded to avoid driving further exclusion of this population from innovative and 
valuable new financial services.
Chart D.10: Almost 10% of the population are classified as being digitally 
excluded
The digital pound must be simple and straightforward to use, using familiar 
methods and devices. And it must be understood and trusted as a form of 
money.
The digital pound may have limited potential to accelerate financial inclusion in the UK. 
But it is a way to provide another option for certain financially excluded groups and could 
lead to innovative approaches that improve access to financial products and services.
There are several challenges that need to be overcome for the digital pound to be 
accessible to those that are most financially and digitally excluded, which are being 
considered as a part of its design. For example: 
• It will need to be as simple and straightforward to use as possible.
• As a new form of money, understanding and trust among the public is crucial. The 
roles of Government, the central bank and industry will need to be set out clearly.
• Because the digital pound might be harder to access for those without the internet 
or smartphones, offline capabilities or other solutions are being explored.
• In line with the current approach to basic bank accounts, the application process, 
access points, and means of identification need to be designed to help people 
access services.
Page 88
The needs of vulnerable people are being considered in the design of the
digital pound.
Financial inclusion and the needs of vulnerable people are being considered by 
HM Treasury and the Bank from the initial design stage of the digital pound. Our aim is 
that it should be designed, developed and implemented carefully so it contributes to 
financial inclusion to the extent it can, by seeking to ensure the needs of all users, 
including vulnerable individuals, are explored throughout.
Cash is expected to continue to play a role in society, particularly for those who are older 
or more vulnerable, for some time. In February 2020, the FCA found that 5.4 million 
adults relied on cash to a very great or great extent in their day-to-day lives.90 The digital 
pound would not seek to replace cash or cause further financial exclusion for groups 
who rely on and prefer physical financial services infrastructure. 
Further design considerations for the digital pound could include the use of tiered 
wallets, explored above, which may offer an opportunity to tackle some of the financial 
inclusion issues driven by ID requirements. Using tiered wallets, users with limited forms 
of ID could open basic digital pound wallets allowing limited, low-value payments. This 
could provide a more accessible gateway into digital payments for some of the 
financially excluded.
90 FCA (2021) – Financial Lives Survey, page 36.
Page 89
Box K: Lessons learnt from our engagement with civil society 
groups
Throughout the exploration phase we have engaged with multiple civil society groups,
both bilaterally and in different multilateral fora such as the CBDC Engagement Forum
and ad hoc roundtables. The purpose has been to identify drivers of financial exclusion 
and explore whether the digital pound could present opportunities to mitigate them.
• We heard that, for many people, the physical nature of cash is a key feature for 
budgeting purposes, so digital alternatives like the digital pound could struggle to 
deliver the same functionality.
• We discussed how trust and familiarity were key reasons to use cash for certain 
groups of people – the role of trusted intermediaries was identified as very 
important for a potential roll out of the digital pound, as especially vulnerable 
individuals would need support from trusted third parties to become comfortable 
with a new payment method; we discussed the possibility of civil society groups 
becoming wallet providers (Payment Interface Providers) for vulnerable groups.
• Consumer protection was considered crucial for adoption of the digital pound by 
vulnerable groups, as they could be at risk when using a new payment method.
• Overall, civil society groups thought the digital pound was not necessarily the only 
way to tackle financial exclusion and that existing policies could be improved to 
achieve some of the inclusion goals.
Page 90
Box L: Lessons learnt from the Engagement Forum 
As part of our strategy to engage with industry and consumers, in 2021 the Bank and 
HM Treasury set up the CBDC Engagement Forum. The objective of the Engagement 
Forum is to gather input from a diverse cross-section of expertise and perspectives to 
inform the Bank’s exploration of the challenges and opportunities of CBDC. The Forum 
membership includes financial institutions, technology and fintech firms, academics, civil 
society, merchants and consumer groups.
The Forum has discussed a range of topics, including potential use cases for a retail 
CBDC, opportunities to tackle financial exclusion and co-existence with other forms of 
money.91 Themes from these discussions have been considered in this CP.
Some Forum members were sceptical about the current need for a retail CBDC in the 
UK, which they considered to already have an efficient payments system. However, 
members recognised its potential to spur innovation and largely supported the idea of 
CBDC as a basic but extensible platform to allow the private sector to innovate. They 
agreed a flexible platform should allow innovators to shape and accommodate future 
use cases that could be difficult to anticipate today. The Forum has also emphasised the 
need for clarity around policy choices and the technical and regulatory parameters 
authorities would put in place for CBDC for the private sector to start identifying potential 
use cases and commercial opportunities within the CBDC ecosystem.
The Forum also reflected on the opportunities that CBDC could offer for 
person-to-business (P2B) payments and the conditions that would need to be in place 
for a retail CBDC to be adopted by consumers and merchants. It was argued that 
achieving widespread adoption of new payment methods was very complex, but 
programmability, smart contracts or micropayments could drive demand for CBDC 
payments.
Financial and digital inclusion has also been a topic of interest for Forum members, who 
discussed the obstacles that some individuals face to access basic banking and 
payment services, especially in an increasingly digital economy. Members looked at 
some of the main drivers of exclusion and discussed how CBDC as a new payment 
system could tackle those. While the Forum identified opportunities, it also 
acknowledged that a CBDC would not be a ‘silver bullet’ and that its effectiveness to 
tackle exclusion would depend on a range of policy and regulatory questions that would 
need to be addressed by the Bank and the Government.
91 Minutes from the meetings can be found on the Bank’s website.
Page 91
Consultation questions
6.Do you have comments on our proposal that in-store, online and person-to-person 
payments should be highest priority payments in scope? Are any other payments in 
scope which need further work?
7.What do you consider to be the appropriate level of limits on individual’s holdings in 
transition? Do you agree with our proposed limits within the £10,000–£20,000 range? Do 
you have views on the benefits and risks of a lower limit, such as £5,000?
8.Considering our proposal for limits on individual holdings, what views do you have on 
how corporates’ use of digital pounds should be managed in transition? Should all 
corporates be able to hold digital pounds, or should some corporates be restricted? 
9.Do you have comments on our proposal that non-UK residents should have access to 
the digital pound, on the same basis as UK residents?
10. Given our primary motivations, does our proposed design for the digital pound meet 
its objectives?
11. Which design choices should we consider in order to support financial inclusion?
12. The Bank and HM Treasury will have due regard to the public sector equality duty, 
including considering the impact of proposals for the design of the digital pound on those 
who share protected characteristics, as provided by the Equality Act 2010. Please 
indicate if you believe any of the proposals in this Consultation Paper are likely to impact 
persons who share such protected characteristics and, if so, please explain which 
groups of persons, what the impact on such groups might be and if you have any views 
on how impact could be mitigated.
Page 92
Conclusion
The Bank and HM Treasury judge it is likely that the digital pound will be needed in the future 
and that it would offer benefits. The digital pound could sustain retail access to central bank 
money, support confidence in the different forms of money used for day-to-day payments, 
and promote innovation, choice, and efficiency in payments in an increasingly digital world. 
The digital pound, as described in this paper, would have much in common with cash. Like 
cash, the digital pound would be provided by the Bank; safe, simple, convenient to use;
widely accepted; and easily understood. It would be designed for everyday payments, rather 
than savings and so, like cash, it would not pay interest. 
The case for introducing the digital pound depends to a significant degree on how the 
payments landscape evolves in coming years. In particular, the extent to which cash use 
further declines, whether new forms of privately-issued digital money emerge and how they 
interact with existing forms of money and payments.
Page 93
It is too early to take a decision on whether to build the infrastructure for the digital pound. At 
the current time, while we judge the digital pound is likely to be needed, we cannot know this 
with certainty. 
As such, the Bank and HM Treasury judge it is important we move to the next stage of our 
development of the digital pound. We will invest in the ‘design phase’ of our roadmap, 
meaning that, while no firm decision has been taken on whether to build the digital pound, we 
will step up our development work, build the necessary skills and put in place the technical 
capability to introduce the digital pound in a timely manner, in the event a decision is made in 
future to do so. And, even if we decide not to proceed to build a digital pound, our technology 
explorations, and collaboration with the private sector will present benefits to the wider UK 
fintech community.
The next stage will involve the development of a comprehensive architecture for the digital 
pound, and associated experimentation and proofs of concept in partnership with the private 
sector. We expect at the end of the design phase that the Government and the Bank will 
decide whether to proceed to build the digital pound. The legal basis for the digital pound will 
be determined alongside consideration of its design.
Responses to this consultation will inform the next stage of work and constitute an important 
step towards making a final decision on whether to build a digital pound. The Bank and 
HM Treasury welcome feedback on the questions posed in this CP by a range of 
stakeholders. 
Page 94
Consultation process
The Bank and HM Treasury invite views on the questions listed below. Respondents should 
provide answers by 30 June 2023.92 After this, the Bank and HM Treasury will assess the 
responses. These responses will inform our future work and exploration of the digital pound.
Consultation questions
1. Do you have comments on how trends in payments may evolve and the opportunities 
and risks that they may entail?
2. Do you have comments on our proposition for the roles and responsibilities of private 
sector digital wallets as set out in the platform model? Do you agree that private sector 
digital wallet providers should not hold end users’ funds directly on their balance 
sheets?
3. Do you agree that the Bank should not have access to users’ personal data, but 
instead see anonymised transaction data and aggregated system-wide data for the 
running of the core ledger? What views do you have on a privacy-enhancing digital 
pound?
4. What are your views on the provision and utility of tiered access to the digital pound 
that is linked to user identity information?
5. What views do you have on the embedding of privacy-enhancing techniques to give 
users more control of the level of privacy that they can ascribe to their personal 
transactions data?
6. Do you have comments on our proposal that in-store, online and person-to-person 
payments should be highest priority payments in scope? Are any other payments in 
scope which need further work?
7. What do you consider to be the appropriate level of limits on individual’s holdings in 
transition? Do you agree with our proposed limits within the £10,000–£20,000 range? 
Do you have views on the benefits and risks of a lower limit, such as £5,000?
8. Considering our proposal for limits on individual holdings, what views do you have on 
how corporates’ use of digital pounds should be managed in transition? Should all 
corporates be able to hold digital pounds, or should some corporates be restricted? 
9. Do you have comments on our proposal that non-UK residents should have access to 
the digital pound, on the same basis as UK residents?
92 On 1 June 2023, the original deadline was extended to 30 June 2023 due to the omission of question 9 of this 
Consultation Paper from the online response form. 
Page 95
10.Given our primary motivations, does our proposed design for the digital pound meet its 
objectives?
11.Which design choices should we consider in order to support financial inclusion?
12.The Bank and HM Treasury will have due regard to the public sector equality duty, 
including considering the impact of proposals for the design of the digital pound on 
those who share protected characteristics, as provided by the Equality Act 2010. 
Please indicate if you believe any of the proposals in this Consultation Paper are likely 
to impact persons who share such protected characteristics and, if so, please explain 
which groups of persons, what the impact on such groups might be and if you have 
any views on how impact could be mitigated.
Who should respond?
The Bank and HM Treasury welcome responses to any of the questions, but do not expect 
respondents to provide an answer to every question. We are keen to hear from a wide range 
of stakeholders, which includes community or charitable-focused organisations, the 
payments industry, businesses, and the general public. 
You can respond to this survey through this web form for all questions apart from 
question 9, and this additional web form for question 9.93
By email: 
Digitalpoundconsultation2023@bankofengland.co.uk or CBDC@HMTreasury.gov.uk
By post: 
Digital Pound Consultation 
CBDC Unit
Bank of England 
Threadneedle Street
London
EC2R 8AH
Or 
CBDC
HM Treasury
1 Horse Guards Road
London
SW1A 2HQ
93 The additional web form was created on 1 June to accept responses to question 9, which was previously 
omitted from the online response form.
Page 96
By telephone: 020 3461 4878 (Bank of England)
Should you have any additional requirements, please contact us through one of the above 
channels and we can provide this in accessible formats.
Privacy notice: Bank of England 
By responding to this consultation, you provide personal data to the Bank of England (the 
Bank). This may include your name, contact details (including, if provided, details of the 
organisation you work for), and opinions or details offered in the response itself.
The response will be assessed to inform the Bank’s work as a monetary authority, as a 
supervisor of financial services firms and as the central bank of the United Kingdom, both in 
the public interest and in the exercise of the Bank’s official authority. The Bank may use your 
details to contact you to clarify any aspects of your response.
We will retain all responses for the period that is relevant to supporting ongoing financial 
services law and policy developments and reviews. To find out more about how we deal with 
your personal data, your rights or to get in touch please visit Privacy and the Bank of 
England.
Information provided in response to this consultation, including personal information, may be 
subject to publication or disclosure to other parties in accordance with access to information 
regimes including under the Freedom of Information Act 2000 or data protection legislation, 
or as otherwise required by law or in discharge of the Bank’s functions.
Please indicate if you regard all, or some of, the information you provide as confidential. If the 
Bank receives a request for disclosure of this information, we will take your indication(s) into 
account but cannot give an assurance that confidentiality can be maintained in all 
circumstances. An automatic confidentiality disclaimer generated by your IT system on 
emails will not, of itself, be regarded as binding on the Bank.
Page 97
Privacy notice: HM Treasury
Data subjects
This privacy notice relates to the use of personal data of any individuals identifiable from 
information provided in the consultation responses.
The data we collect (data categories)
Personal data collected is likely to include individuals’ names and email addresses. It is 
possible that respondents may also volunteer additional information that identifies them or 
third parties.
Legal Basis for processing 
Article 6(1)(e) – the processing of this personal data is necessary for the performance of a 
task carried out in the public interest or in the exercise of official authority vested in 
HM Treasury. For the purpose of this consultation, the task is consulting on departmental 
policies or proposals or obtaining opinion data in order to develop effective government 
policy. 
The personal data is processed for the purpose of obtaining the opinions of members of the 
public and representatives of organisations and companies, about departmental policies, 
proposals, or generally to obtain public opinion data on an issue of public interest. 
HM Treasury will use your personal data to record your comments and views and take your 
reply into account – as far as possible with all other replies – when decisions are being made 
because of the consultation. Your personal data may also be used to contact you about your 
response to the consultation if needed. 
Purpose
The personal data is processed for the purpose of obtaining the opinions of about 
government policies, proposals, or an issue of public interest. 
HM Treasury will use your personal data to record your comments and views and take your 
reply into account – as far as possible with all other replies – when decisions are being made 
because of the consultation. Your personal data may also be used to contact you about your 
response to the consultation if needed. 
Who we share your data with?
The personal data will only be made available to those with a legitimate need to see it as part 
of the consultation process. 
Page 98
As the personal information is stored on HM Treasury IT infrastructure, it will be accessible to 
HM Treasury’s IT contractor. HM Treasury’s IT contractor will only process this data for our 
purposes and in fulfilment with the contractual obligations they have with us.
Information provided in response to this consultation may be published or disclosed in 
accordance with the access to information regimes. These are primarily the Freedom of 
Information Act 2000 (FOIA) and the Environmental Information Regulations 2004 (EIR). 
How long we will hold your data (retention)?
Information in responses to consultations will generally be published and therefore retained 
indefinitely as a historic record under the Public Records Act 1958. HM Treasury will not 
include any personal data when publishing information in response to this consultation. 
Personal information in responses will be retained for three calendar years after the 
consultation has concluded.
Your rights
• You have the right to request information about how your personal data are processed 
and to request a copy of that personal data. 
• You have the right to request that any inaccuracies in your personal data are rectified 
without delay. 
• You have the right to request that your personal data are erased if there is no longer a 
justification for them to be processed. 
• You have the right, in certain circumstances (for example, where accuracy is 
contested), to request that the processing of your personal data is restricted. 
How to submit a Data Subject Access Request (DSAR)
To request access to personal data that HM Treasury holds about you, contact:
HM Treasury Data Protection Unit
1 Horse Guards Road 
London 
SW1A 2HQ
dsar@hmtreasury.gov.uk
• You have the right to object to the processing of your personal data where it is 
processed for direct marketing purposes. 
• You have the right to data portability, which allows your data to be copied or 
transferred from one IT environment to another. 
Page 99
Complaints
If you have any concerns about the use of your personal data, please contact us via this 
mailbox: privacy@hmtreasury.gov.uk.
If we are unable to address your concerns to your satisfaction, you can make a complaint to 
the Information Commissioner, the UK’s independent regulator for data protection. 
The Information Commissioner can be contacted at: 
Information Commissioner's Office
Wycliffe House
Water Lane
Wilmslow
Cheshire
SK9 5AF
0303 123 1113
casework@ico.org.uk
Any complaint to the Information Commissioner is without prejudice to your right to seek 
redress through the courts.
Public Sector Equality Duty
HM Treasury and the Bank, in the exercise of its public functions including its banknote 
issuance and other functions relating to the proposals in this paper, is subject to a statutory 
duty set out in the Equality Act 2010 (Equality Act) to ‘have due regard’ to equality 
considerations, comprising the need to: (a) eliminate discrimination, harassment, 
victimisation and any other conduct that is prohibited by or under the Equality Act; (b) 
advance equality of opportunity between persons who share a relevant protected 
characteristic under the Equality Act and persons who do not share it; and (c) foster good 
relations between persons who share a relevant protected characteristic and persons who do 
not share it (the Public Sector Equality Duty or PSED). For the purposes of issuance of the
digital pound, there are significant policy and technological decisions which would need to be 
taken to ensure fair and equitable access. As part of the policy development process, the 
Bank and HM Treasury will have due regard to the equality considerations set out in the 
PSED, including conducting Equality Impact Assessments.
Page 100
Annexes
Annex 1: The digital pound and international risks
The digital pound might improve cross-border payments. But it may also increase the 
UK’s exposure to economic shocks from abroad.
The UK, as an open economy, could benefit from a digital pound that improved cross-border 
payments (for example, cheaper or faster payments for international trade or remittances)
(Box D). But a digital pound, or a new form of privately-issued sterling digital money, could 
change the structure of the financial system in a way that increases the UK’s exposure to 
foreign shocks. 
First, it could make UK banks more reliant on wholesale funding. The availability and cost of 
that funding could be more susceptible to foreign economic shocks because it could be 
provided by foreign investors or denominated in foreign currency.
94
Second, an increase in UK bank funding costs could increase the cost, or reduce the 
availability, of their lending to the UK real economy. This could prompt households and 
businesses to borrow more from abroad. That could include borrowing from foreign banks, 
foreign non-banks, or UK non-banks that might be funded by non-UK investors or hold 
portfolios of global assets.
95 Reliance on such institutions for funding the UK real economy 
would also make it more vulnerable to foreign shocks.
Non-residents’ access to the digital pound could amplify capital flow volatility, but the
impact would probably be limited.
Non-residents’ holdings of the digital pound over and above non-residents’ existing holdings 
of sterling assets, could amplify capital flow volatility. That is because the digital pound might
be vulnerable to sharp inflows or outflows in response to shocks from abroad. The magnitude 
of movements in such holdings and their impact would probably be limited, however. 
First, a digital pound restricted to ‘retail’ uses would likely not have a significant impact on 
capital flow volatility. That is because capital flows into and out of the UK are dominated by 
much larger and more volatile flows between financial institutions. 
94 Ivashina et al (2015) found that banks with greater reliance on wholesale funding cut their lending by more 
during the euro-area sovereign debt crisis.
95 Hoggarth et al (2013) discuss how lending to the UK economy by foreign bank branches resident in the UK 
was more volatile than that by UK-incorporated banks around the time of the global financial crisis.
Page 101
Second, there could be an offsetting channel, if non-residents held digital pounds instead of, 
for example, UK bank deposits. This could reduce the impact on UK credit conditions of 
shocks to foreign demand for sterling assets. For example, lower foreign demand for UK 
assets would be in part absorbed by lower foreign demand for digital pounds so the fall in 
foreign demand for UK bank deposits (and thus their lending) would be lower.
Widespread use of non-sterling digital money could compromise the UK’s monetary 
and financial sovereignty.
If a new form of non-sterling digital money were used for a significant amount of retail 
transactions in the UK, it could compromise the UK’s monetary and financial sovereignty –
the UK authorities’ ability to achieve price stability through monetary policy, and to regulate 
financial institutions and payments systems that are systemically important in the UK. 
Widespread use of non-sterling digital money could compromise monetary sovereignty 
because if sterling were no longer the unit of account for a significant portion of UK retail 
transactions, monetary policy would affect a lower proportion of money in the UK and 
become less effective at achieving the inflation target.
Financial sovereignty might also be compromised if the Bank were not able to co-operate 
sufficiently with the lead supervisor of foreign-operated private digital money. That might 
prevent the UK authorities from regulating and supervising such a systemically important 
non-UK payment system. 
Widespread adoption of a non-sterling digital form of money in the UK is unlikely but 
its impact would be very significant and be beyond the tolerance of UK authorities.
Digital payments in the UK are already widespread, so it is judged unlikely that UK 
households and businesses would see a compelling case for switching to non-sterling digital 
payments services, especially since this would carry foreign exchange risks. Furthermore, G7 
Finance Ministers and Central Bank Governors pledged in 2021 that ‘CBDCs should be 
designed to avoid risks of harm to the international monetary and financial system, including 
the monetary sovereignty and financial stability of other countries.’ So, any future CBDC 
issuers, at least in G7 countries, have committed to design them in such a way that would 
avoid the risk of currency substitution in other countries. 
It is possible, however, that non-sterling digital money would offer attractive new functionality 
in the future. Non-sterling digital money could become widely adopted if it tapped into existing 
digital networks to offer new propositions. That is judged unlikely but, if it materialised, the 
impact would be very significant and so this scenario is beyond UK authorities’ risk tolerance.
Page 102
By reinforcing the use of sterling for UK payments and enabling new payments functionality, 
the digital pound could pre-emptively reduce the chance of widespread adoption of 
non-sterling digital money in the UK. That would help preserve the UK’s monetary and 
financial sovereignty.
The UK’s strong macroeconomic policy framework – including an independent, 
inflation-targeting central bank – also reduces the risk that non-sterling money might come to 
be used widely for payments in the UK.
Page 103
Annex 2: Impact of the digital pound on the Bank’s balance 
sheet
The digital pound could make the Bank’s balance sheet larger and affect the level of 
central bank reserves, with potential implications for the volatility of short-term 
interest rates. This can be managed by deploying the tools available to the Bank to 
ensure the demand for its liabilities is met.
The Bank’s balance sheet plays a central role in the delivery of the Bank’s statutory policy 
objectives to maintain monetary and financial stability. The Bank’s balance sheet is used to
implement monetary policy by ensuring market interest rates are aligned with Bank Rate, to 
purchase assets for monetary policy or financial stability purposes, and in the provision of 
liquidity insurance.96 These actions affect the size and composition of assets and liabilities on 
the balance sheet.
Today, most of the Bank’s liabilities consist of on-call wholesale balances held by eligible 
firms (mainly banks) known as reserves (we use the term ‘banks’ hereon to refer to all eligible 
firms for simplicity). Banks hold reserves to make wholesale payments in sterling and to meet 
their regulatory liquidity requirements. 
The aggregate supply of reserves and their price is controlled by the Bank and is central to 
the implementation of monetary policy. The Bank supplies sufficient reserves so that
commercial banks have little need to bid up money market rates above Bank Rate to borrow 
reserves. At the same time, remuneration of reserves at Bank Rate means that banks have 
no incentive to lend excess reserves at a lower rate (Diagram E.1). 
Were households to switch commercial bank deposits to the digital pound, they would be
exchanging one asset for another. For the Bank’s balance sheet, this will initially affect the 
composition of its liabilities: it will reduce the amount of reserves on the Bank’s balance sheet 
but increase the level of digital pounds by the same amount.
The ultimate impact of this switch on the Bank’s balance sheet will depend on where this 
leaves the quantity of reserves relative to banks’ demand for them. As long as reserves 
remain above the minimum level demanded by banks at the prevailing level of Bank Rate
(Diagram E.1), the switch from commercial bank deposits to the digital pound would change 
the type of liabilities on the Bank’s balance sheet. But it would leave the overall size of the 
Bank’s balance sheet unchanged, as all demand for the Bank’s liabilities would be met.
96 Bank of England– Understanding the central bank balance sheet. See Hauser (2022) for further detail on 
how the balance sheet can support the Bank’s monetary and financial stability objectives.
Page 104
Diagram E.1: The demand curve for reserves
If demand for the digital pound caused reserves to fall below the minimum level 
demanded by banks, the Bank would intervene to provide more reserves, resulting in 
a larger balance sheet.
The switch from commercial bank deposits to the digital pound could cause the amount of 
reserves in the system to fall below the minimum level demanded by banks (Diagram E.1).
All else equal, banks are likely to respond by seeking to borrow reserves in money markets, 
increasing the rates they are willing to pay to do so and thereby causing short-term rates to 
rise relative to Bank Rate. In this scenario, and under the current monetary policy framework, 
the Bank would increase the supply of reserves to the banking system through its Short-Term 
Repo Facility to ensure banks’ demand is met and therefore that short-term market rates 
remain close to Bank Rate.
97
Alternatively, the Bank may choose to deploy longer-term lending operations. In either case, 
the creation of reserves would result in an increase in liabilities on the Bank’s balance sheet. 
This would be matched by an equivalent increase in the assets held by the Bank, leading to 
an overall increase in the size of the Bank’s balance sheet (see Diagram E.2).
97 In pursuit of monetary stability, the Bank would stand ready to supply reserves on demand to move total 
reserves further to the right in Diagram E.1 and move market rates closer to Bank Rate. 
Page 105
Small changes in the level of reserves are not a new challenge for the Bank to manage. 
Banknotes, for example, also have the potential to absorb reserves or affect the size of the 
balance sheet. The Bank has several mitigants in place to manage these balance sheet 
changes, as it would do for the digital pound. The post-QE monetary policy framework would 
continue to be robust to changes in the level of reserves.98
Diagram E.2: Illustrative central bank balance sheet with the digital pound (a)
Source: Bank of England.
(a) This chart is purely illustrative. The steady state composition and size of the balance sheet, at the point 
where the digital pound is introduced, is highly uncertain.
98 The Bank recently published an Explanatory Note setting out its framework for ensuring short-term market 
interest rates remain close to Bank Rate as the APF is unwound and reserves begin to fall.
Page 106
Annex 3: Market research
In early 2022, the Bank commissioned YouGov and London Economics to carry out market 
research on payment preferences and behaviours. This research comprised quantitative 
surveys to consumers and small and medium-sized enterprises, and a consumer-focused 
forum where respondents completed payment diaries, questionnaires and tasks. There were 
also in-depth telephone interviews with individuals who lacked digital confidence or access to 
the internet. The results were categorised into three main topics: attitudes and current 
payment behaviour; how people pay and store money; and the future of money.99
Attitudes and current payment behaviour
Participants had a range of confidence levels in managing their finances. Most (87%) relied 
upon established traditional financial institutions with which they regularly interacted, rather 
than newer digital banks or cryptoassets. This was the same across both online surveys and 
telephone interviews. Those who indicated low confidence with technology preferred physical 
bank branches over digital methods for accessing banking services.
Participants expected to be able to use a variety of payment methods and were frustrated
when unable to do so. Safety and convenience were the most important factors when 
choosing new payment methods or a new current account. Debit cards were the favoured 
method for online and in-store purchases, as they were considered convenient, fast, and 
easy to track. While cash use has declined, it was still used by a significant number of 
consumers in our research – around 40% used cash at least once a week. The safety and 
control, its physical presence and familiarity made cash the most trustworthy form of payment 
for some participants.
How people pay and where they save money
While consumers often used a mixture of different payment methods for their day-to-day 
spending, security and convenience were the most important factors when deciding which 
payment method to use. Their preferred method was also influenced by the value of the 
purchase and whether it occurred in-store or online.
99 Research conducted in February/March 2022. Nationally representative sample of 2,022 consumers (1,922 
online and 100 by phone) and 1022 SMEs (all online). Seventy two consumers participated in the online 
qualitative study.
Page 107
Those who used the internet less often were more likely to use cash regularly. These 
participants were also less likely to switch to another payment method. When they did, they 
valued recommendations from family and friends. Many, most notably during telephone
interviews, feared that online banking and mobile payments could be hacked. These 
participants preferred the physical safety cash provided them with. 
Future of money and cryptoassets
There was a broad negative reaction to cryptoassets across consumers. Very few found 
them to be safe or trustworthy. There was also some scepticism towards Big Tech 
companies, especially with regards to data protection. When offered the choice between a 
publicly provided form of digital money (similar to the digital pound) and one provided by a 
technology firm, there was a slight preference towards the public offering.
Initial attitudes towards the digital pound
The market research used the terms ‘e-GBP’ or CBDC to describe a digital form of money 
with similar features to the digital pound outlined in this paper. Those features tested (safety 
of funds, widely accepted and easy to use) generally appealed to consumers. But there was 
uncertainty around the role an ‘e-GBP’ would play alongside existing payment methods and
how it differed to cryptoassets. There was also some confusion as to whether ‘e-GBP’ was to 
be used for savings, investments or payments. Like the results around current financial 
products, those who were more confident with technology found it more appealing than other 
participants. 
Participants were also introduced to a hypothetical digital money account.100 They were 
asked how they felt about this digital money account and to react to its features using a 
‘thumbs up’ or ‘thumbs down’ feature (Diagram E.3).
100 This study was conducted with 72 participants. Participants were able to give positive, negative or 
neutral/unsure reactions to any of the features and visuals in the exercise as indicated in Diagram E.3. 
Participants who gave at least one negative reaction also gave at least one positive reaction.
Page 108
Diagram E.3: Feelings about the features of a hypothetical digital money account
Most reactions were positive. Participants generally liked that it was provided by the Bank,
that it was fully protected, and that it was a widely accepted means of payment. 
Overwhelmingly, the only feature disliked was the fact it did not pay interest.
Thirty per cent of participants said they would be likely or very likely to use the account. And 
some who were not likely to use it said they would be more likely to use it if it became 
popular among friends and family, or if more retailers accepted it as a means of payment. 
Generally, the participants unlikely to use it were those who did not want to use digital money
at all. 
Participants were also asked to name up to five features they would find appealing if this 
account were to be offered. The most mentioned were perks, rewards, discounts or a high 
interest rate. Some cited speed and visibility of transactions, budgeting tools and ease of use 
as other desirable options. 
In a separate exercise, the same participants were asked to react to the idea of a CBDC after 
reading a short explainer. Around 20% said that they found CBDC appealing or very 
appealing, especially if it was offered alongside other payment methods rather than replacing 
them. Some (42%), however, were unsure, citing misunderstanding or lack of information 
about how it worked. A third of the group had concerns about money becoming less physical 
and being more reliant on the internet. 
Page 109
Additional qualitative research was undertaken to identify whether consumers distinguished 
between public and private forms of money and how they defined these concepts. The study 
revealed a strong consensus about the current importance of physical currency (banknotes 
and coins) in society. However, understanding of the difference between public and 
privately-issued forms of money was generally low. The ultimate issuer of money was 
considered less important than other features such as universal acceptance, safety or 
familiarity.101
When presented with hypothetical scenarios, participants appeared to prefer uniformity in 
money, prioritising wide acceptance as a form of payment. This could be associated with 
some of the characteristics of public money. General sentiment towards the Bank of England 
was broadly positive, with most considering it to be a trustworthy institution. Initial reactions to 
Big Tech firms introducing financial services in retail payments were mostly negative. Those 
who self-identified as not being digitally confident appeared less concerned by whether 
money was public or private, as long as there was a physical option (like banknotes) 
available to them. 
In the design phase the Bank will consider using consumer research projects where they may 
best contribute to the design phase of the digital pound.
101 Additional research with YouGov involved six text-based focus groups and 10 in-depth telephone interviews. 
This exercise explored whether attitudes to public and private money differed according to social group, age 
range, geographical location, and digital confidence. 
Page 110
Annex 4: Lessons learnt from our engagement with major 
financial institutions 
Given the importance of banks for the financial system, the Bank and HM Treasury have 
engaged extensively with them on the opportunities, risks and design choices for the digital 
pound.
For the most part, financial firms sought further clarity from the Bank and HM Treasury on the 
public policy case for the digital pound and the commercial opportunities it could enable. 
While banks recognised the potential of the digital pound to enable innovation, make certain 
processes more efficient, and improve cross-border payments, they questioned whether 
those features were exclusive to a central bank-issued digital currency, or could be also 
achieved via private sector innovations and improving existing payments infrastructure.
Some UK banks have already started thinking about the future of the payments landscape 
and many are actively exploring how to interact with new forms of digital money and 
decentralised finance (DeFi). Banks with a large international footprint have presence in 
markets where CBDCs are being piloted and have shared insights from those projects with 
the Bank and HM Treasury.
Banks noted the outflow of retail deposits into digital pounds would need careful 
management, especially in transition. Banks warned about the risks of relying too much on 
wholesale funding to replace consumer deposits flowing into the digital pound. The 
assessment of these risks varied between financial institutions, and between traditional and 
the newer digitally native institutions. To address these concerns, some are looking into 
options to manage potential disintermediation risks, such as exploring how digital pound 
deposits might be recycled back into the banking sector.
Some banks discussed risks that stablecoins pose to the financial sector, such as limited 
interoperability with other forms of money, and within DeFi. They considered that the digital 
pound could be a way to mitigate those risks. Some also saw the potential of the digital 
pound to enable innovation and improve efficiency in payments. Banks also mentioned the 
possibilities of CBDCs improving cross-border payments. 
Generally, banks anticipated being involved as providers of pass-through wallets to give their 
customers a full set of payment options.
We will continue to engage with financial institutions throughout the next phase of work on 
the digital pound, both bilaterally and through multilateral outreach with specific industry 
groups.
Page 111
Glossary and abbreviations 
AML – Anti-Money Laundering.
APF – Asset Purchase Facility.
API – Application Programming Interface.
APP – Authorised Push Payment.
ATM – Automated Teller Machine.
BIS – Bank for International Settlements.
CBDC – central bank digital currency.
CFT – Combatting the Financing of Terrorism.
CHAPS – Clearing House Automated Payment System.
CP – Consultation Paper.
CRD – Cash Ratio Deposit.
DeFi – decentralised finance.
DLT – distributed ledger technology.
ELB – effective lower bound.
ESIP – External Service Interface Provider.
FCA – Financial Conduct Authority.
FPC – Financial Policy Committee.
FX – Foreign Exchange.
G7 – Group of Seven.
G20 – Group of Twenty.
GDPR – General Data Protection Regulation.
HFS – Household Finances Survey.
HQLA – High Quality Liquid Assets.
ICO – Information Commissioners Office.
ID – identification.
Page 112
IoT – Internet of Things.
KYC – Know Your Customer.
LINK – the UK’s largest cash machine network connecting virtually all the UK’s ATMs.
NPA – New Payments Architecture.
ONS – Office for National Statistics.
P2B – person to business.
P2P – person to person.
PET – Privacy-Enhancing Technologies.
PIP – Payment Interface Provider.
PoC – Proof of Concept.
PoS – Point-of-sale.
PRA – Prudential Regulation Authority.
PSED – Public Sector Equality Duty.
PSR – Payment Systems Regulator.
RTGS – Real Time Gross Settlement.
SME – Small and medium-sized enterprise.

E02859564




Response to the Bank of England 
and HM Treasury Consultation Paper: 
The digital pound: a new form of 
money for households and businesses?
Consultation Response
January 2024

Response to the Bank of England 
and HM Treasury Consultation 
Paper: The digital pound: a new 
form of money for households and 
businesses?
Presented to Parliament by the Economic Secretary to the Treasury
by Command of His Majesty
January 2024
CP 970
© Crown copyright 2024
This publication is licensed under the terms of the Open Government Licence v3.0 except 
where otherwise stated. To view this licence, visit nationalarchives.gov.uk/doc/opengovernment-licence/version/3.
Where we have identified any third party copyright information you will need to obtain 
permission from the copyright holders concerned.
This publication is available at www.gov.uk/official-documents.
Any enquiries regarding this publication should be sent to CBDC@bankofengland.co.uk or 
CBDC@HMTreasury.gov.uk. 
ISBN 978-1-5286-4680-2
E03063907 01/24
Printed on paper containing 40% recycled fibre content minimum
Printed in the UK by HH Associates Ltd. on behalf of the Controller of His Majesty’s 
Stationery Office
Contents
Foreword 4
Summary 6
Introduction and key messages 7
1: Why the Bank and HM Treasury consulted on the digital pound 13
2: Methodology 20
Overview of respondents 20
The approach to reviewing responses 21
3: Users’ rights, privacy, and protections 23
Decision-making and the role of Parliament 24
Privacy and data protection 25
Programmability and users’ control over their money 29
Safeguarding access to cash 31
4: Feedback on the design of the digital pound 34
Future payments landscape 34
Platform model and public-private partnership 38
Privacy and data protection 41
Payments in scope 44
Holding limits and access 47
Financial inclusion and Public Sector Equality Duty 52
Proposed design 56
5: Next steps 60
Experiments and proofs of concept 63
Blueprint and design principles 63
National conversation on the future of money 66
Assessment 67
Conclusion 68
Page 3
Foreword
Money is central to our daily lives and is at the heart of how the economy works.
Last year, the Bank of England and HM Treasury took a major step in the national
conversation on the future of our money, with a Consultation Paper on a proposal for a UK
retail central bank digital currency (CBDC). This would be a new form of digital money for use
by households and businesses in the UK, known as the digital pound and issued by the Bank
of England.
The UK’s financial services sector is world-leading, open, and technologically advanced. Our
work on a digital pound is just one part of the Government and Bank of England’s efforts to
ensure that the UK remains at the forefront of innovation in money, payments and digital
finance. The process of developing the design for a digital pound over the coming years will
present enduring benefits for the UK’s digital economy, fostering knowledge-sharing and
technical collaboration between the public and private sectors. These efforts are valuable,
regardless of whether a decision is ultimately taken to introduce a digital pound.
Today we can pay for transactions and pay each other in many different ways, and that choice
is important. People choose what is best for them in that moment. A digital pound issued by
the Bank of England would not replace those existing forms of money – cash and the money
in our bank accounts – and the means of payments we already use, like debit and credit
cards. Indeed, last year the Government enacted legislation to safeguard access to cash
across the UK. That said, a digital pound would provide an additional choice for making
payments in a way that is safe and secure and fit for the future, whether in person or online or
to each other. And building the platform on which a digital pound would operate could unlock
opportunities for companies, big and small, to develop innovative ways to pay, ensuring the
public has access to leading technologies that make our lives easier. This could make day-today payments more convenient, while reducing costs for the businesses who accept them.
The Consultation Paper received over 50,000 responses from members of the public,
businesses, civil society and academia. The volume of responses is evidence of how
important questions on the future of our money are for individuals and industry alike. We are
grateful to everyone who took the time to consider and submit a response. Some of those
responses were about our proposed design for a digital pound, and how a digital pound would
fit alongside existing and emerging forms of money and payments in the economy. Others
raised concerns about important issues such as the potential impact on privacy, access to
cash and freedom of choice. The feedback clearly illustrated that, just as with other forms of
money, ensuring trust in a digital pound issued by the central bank would be essential.
Page 4
This publication sets out how that feedback will guide the Government and the Bank of
England’s priorities during the design phase of our work on the digital pound, and the further
steps we are taking to address the concerns that have been raised. The Government has
committed to introducing primary legislation with a vote in both Houses of Parliament before
any launch of the digital pound, ensuring full Parliamentary scrutiny. This legislation would
guarantee both users’ privacy and that neither the Bank of England nor the Government
would control how you spend your money.
We are also strongly committed to maintaining an open and collaborative approach
throughout this design phase. The consultation was not the only chance to have your say. Our
organisations will be increasing structured engagement with experts from industry, civil
society, academics and technical specialists, including open requests for input on a range of
important topics, in order to inform what the best design for a digital pound would look like.
The Bank of England will undertake experiments with companies to test how a digital pound
could work in the real world. We are also committing to further public consultation prior to
legislation being introduced.
This publication marks the latest stage in our national conversation on the future of our money
– and it is far from the last. At this exciting time of innovation in money and payments, the
Bank of England and HM Treasury look forward to working with the private sector, civil society,
academia and the public to develop our proposals for a digital pound issued by the Bank of
England, so that we stand ready should a decision to build it be taken in the future.
Bim Afolami MP, Economic Secretary to the Treasury
Sarah Breeden, Deputy Governor for Financial Stability, Bank of England
Page 5
Summary
In February 2023, the Bank of England (the Bank) and His Majesty’s Treasury (HM Treasury)
published a Consultation Paper to seek feedback from the public on the design of a ‘digital
pound’, a potential UK central bank digital currency (CBDC) for use by households and
businesses for their everyday payment needs. The Consultation Paper set out that the Bank
and HM Treasury judged it likely that a digital pound would be needed in the future, and so
further preparatory work was justified.
The Bank and HM Treasury received over 50,000 responses to the consultation,
demonstrating widespread interest in a digital pound and engagement with the proposals.
Many respondents to the Consultation Paper raised concerns about the implications of such a
digital pound for access to cash, users’ privacy, and control of their money. Recognising the
critical importance of building the public’s trust in a digital pound, this Consultation Response
seeks to assure respondents of the steps the Bank and HM Treasury are taking to put in place
safeguards in the design of a digital pound before any decision is made.
Since the Consultation Paper was published, the Government has committed to introducing
primary legislation before launching such a digital pound, ensuring Parliamentary input into
any decision to proceed. Reflecting respondents’ feedback to the Consultation Paper, this
response makes clear that legislation introduced by the Government for a digital pound would
need to provide protections to guarantee users’ privacy and control of their money. The Bank,
the Government, the Financial Conduct Authority (FCA), and the Payment Systems
Regulator (PSR) will continue to safeguard access to cash, given the vital role it plays for
individuals and in communities.
Respondents will have further opportunities to share their thoughts on a digital pound. In
particular, there would be further public consultation prior to the introduction of primary
legislation by the Government. And future work and decisions on a digital pound will continue
to be informed by dialogue with the public, business, civil society, Parliamentarians, and
experts, as the Bank and HM Treasury continue to develop its design. The Consultation Paper
was a major milestone in the UK’s national conversation on the future of money. This
Consultation Response continues that conversation and sets out the steps that will follow
during the design phase.
Page 6
Introduction and key messages
The way payments are made, and the type of money used to make them, is changing. Cash
is, and will continue to be, important for a large cross-section of society. That is why the Bank,
the Government, the FCA and the PSR will continue to safeguard access to cash. At the same
time, as the UK economy becomes more digital, electronic payments are increasingly
widespread and are now the most prevalent payment method. And new technologies are
emerging, often outside the traditional finance sector, with the potential to support new
payment services and new forms of money in the future. In that context, since 2020 the Bank
and HM Treasury, alongside public authorities in many other countries, have been exploring
the concept of retail CBDC. In the UK this would be ‘the digital pound’, issued by the Bank. It
would complement physical cash and other payment mechanisms as a new form of digital
money for use by households and businesses for their everyday payment needs.
Such a digital pound would help to ensure that central bank money remains available and
useful in an ever more digital economy, continuing to support UK monetary and financial
stability. It would also provide a public platform for private-sector innovation, promoting further
competition, efficiency and choice in payments.
In February 2023, the Bank and HM Treasury published a Consultation Paper to seek
feedback from the public on a set of design proposals for a digital pound. In that paper, the
Bank and HM Treasury judged it likely that a digital pound would be needed in the future.
Rather than assessing that question against the status quo of payments today, it is vital to
consider how a digital pound could fit into a future payments ecosystem. That ecosystem will
be increasingly digital, with opportunities to harness innovation, but could also be fragmented,
if users are tied into particular digital platforms. In light of this, the Consultation Paper
explained that, if current trends in payments continue, a digital pound could be a ‘solution’ to
two ‘problems’: first, risks to the ‘uniformity’ or ‘singleness’ of money, and second, risks to
competition in payments.
To keep pace with future payment needs, such a digital pound would provide an open and
flexible platform for the development of future retail payments services by the private sector. It
would support continued innovation, allowing the private sector to shape future use cases that
could be difficult to anticipate today, for the digital pound and other digital payments.
It is too early to decide whether to introduce a digital pound, but the Bank and HM Treasury
judge that further preparatory work is justified to enable us to respond to developments in the
payments landscape and to reduce materially the lead time if there is a future decision to
introduce a digital pound. The publication of the Consultation Paper marked the start of the
design phase of the project. Respondents’ feedback will help to inform the work on the design
Page 7
of a digital pound, in both technology and policy terms. On completion of the design phase
around the middle of the decade, the Bank and the Government will decide whether to
proceed to build a digital pound. If the decision was taken to do so, a digital pound would only
be introduced once both Houses of Parliament had passed the relevant legislation.
Ongoing work on a digital pound helps to put the UK at the cutting edge of the future
payments landscape. Even if the Bank and the Government decide not to launch a digital
pound, the preparatory work being undertaken during the design phase is critical to
understand and prepare for future changes in the payments landscape.
The Bank and HM Treasury received over 50,000 responses to the Consultation Paper from a
combination of individuals, private firms, industry representative organisations, civil society
groups and academics.
The widespread interest in the digital pound project and the extent of thoughtful and
considered engagement provided by the large number of respondents are welcome. Effective
public engagement is essential to ensure that any future decisions for a digital pound are
robust.
The majority of the responses commented on the broader societal implications of introducing
a retail CBDC, such as the future of cash, and the privacy and rights of users of a digital
pound.
Trust is a prerequisite for a digital pound. The Bank and HM Treasury sought to provide
assurances in the Consultation Paper that measures would be put in place to ensure the
public would have confidence in using a digital pound. For example, the Bank, as operator of
the core infrastructure, would not have access to personal data. Private-sector digital pound
wallet providers, Payment Interface Providers (PIPs), would anonymise personal data before
transactions are processed and settled by the Bank. The Bank and HM Treasury would also
not pursue government or central bank-initiated programmable functions.
Respondents’ feedback has highlighted that concerns remain. The Bank and HM Treasury are
committed to providing the public with the further reassurance they seek. To that end, this
Consultation Response sets out a range of measures that would govern a digital pound, if the
decision were made to introduce it:
Page 8
This initial consultation has demonstrated the high level of interest in the digital pound, even
at this early stage. There would be further public consultation were the Government to
introduce primary legislation in the future.
The majority of feedback received to the Consultation Paper was general, providing views
on a handful of aspects on the possible societal implications of a retail CBDC. Fewer
respondents chose to provide feedback on a question-by-question basis. For some specific
questions, there was a range of views on the design proposal for a digital pound set out in the
Consultation Paper. But on balance, and as set out in this paper, these responses confirmed
that the proposed design choices were seen as reasonable and well-grounded.
The Bank and HM Treasury judge that the design proposition in the Consultation Paper
remains the right basis for further exploration of a digital pound during the design phase,
although significant further work is required to flesh out a detailed proposition. To that end, the
Bank and HM Treasury have developed a set of design principles (Diagram 1) that will guide
the work in coming years, alongside continued engagement with stakeholders. These
principles have been informed by the responses received to the Consultation Paper.
Before any launch of a digital pound, the Government has committed to introducing primary
legislation. This means that a digital pound would only be launched once both Houses of
Parliament had passed the relevant legislation.
Privacy would be a core design feature of a digital pound:
The Bank and the Government would not access users’ personal data – and legislation
introduced by the Government for a digital pound would guarantee users’ privacy.
The Bank commits to exploring technological options that would prevent the Bank from
accessing any personal data through the Bank’s core infrastructure.
The Bank and the Government would not program a digital pound – and legislation
introduced by the Government for a digital pound would guarantee this.
The Government has legislated to safeguard access to cash, ensuring that it would remain
available even if a digital pound were launched.
Page 9
The Bank and HM Treasury acknowledge the importance of clearly articulating to the public
why a digital pound might be necessary in the future. In addition, the conversation on use
cases must be broadened out to consider the specific and applied benefits that a digital pound
would bring to consumers, intermediaries and merchants.
The Bank and HM Treasury have also agreed further steps to continue our engagement with
stakeholders across society during the design phase, building on the CBDC Engagement
Forum (with members from industry and civil society) and the CBDC Technology Forum
(with technical specialists) set up in 2021. Last year, the Bank and HM Treasury set up a
CBDC Academic Advisory Group (AAG) and launched Digital pound working groups,
following the publication of Requests for Information, to explore particular topics in detail.
This external engagement will help to guide the work and decision-making during the design
phase. The design phase (Diagram 2) consists of four related workstreams:
Diagram 1: Design principles for a digital pound
Building on work to date, the blueprint for a digital pound will be developed further, based
on the design principles in Diagram 1. This blueprint will develop the core product and
technology propositions for intermediaries, merchants and end-users.
Proofs of concept and experimentation with private-sector support will inform this
blueprint.
As part of the national conversation on the future of money, engagement with the general
public, businesses and wider stakeholders will continue, to ensure that debate around the
digital pound considers all views, recognising the links to initiatives on protecting cash, and
emerging new forms of money such as stablecoins.
Page 10
Throughout the design phase, the Bank and HM Treasury remain committed to engaging with
Parliament and reporting periodically on progress.
This document sets out a detailed summary of the responses received to the consultation and
the Bank and HM Treasury’s response to them.
Section 1 explains why the Bank and HM Treasury consulted on the digital pound, setting out
the backdrop of a rapidly changing payments landscape, and the key points of the
Consultation Paper.
Section 2 describes the composition and nature of the responses received, as well as the
methodology used to review and assess them.
Section 3 sets out users’ rights, privacy, and protections with the digital pound: safeguarding
access to cash, guaranteeing user privacy, data protection, and control of their money, and
committing to a robust decision-making process.
Section 4 summarises the feedback received from respondents on the design of the digital
pound consulted upon in the Consultation Paper as the basis for the Bank and HM Treasury’s
future work.
An assessment of the costs and benefits of introducing a digital pound will be
conducted, to inform the decision on whether to proceed to the build phase.
Diagram 2: Workstreams of the design phase
Page 11
Section 5 sets out the next steps for the digital pound project, in light of the responses
received and continued engagement with stakeholders. These will focus on experimentation
and proofs of concept with the private sector, developing a blueprint for a digital pound based
on a set of design principles, engaging with all stakeholders in a national conversation on the
future of money, and conducting an assessment of the costs and benefits of the digital pound.
Page 12
1: Why the Bank and HM Treasury consulted on the
digital pound
Individuals and businesses in the UK use two main forms of money for day-to-day spending –
‘private money’, issued by commercial banks, and ‘public money’, issued by the Bank of
England. Private money is typically a claim on a private commercial bank in the form of
electronic bank deposits held by households or businesses. Private money is underpinned by
the regulation and supervision of commercial banks. Public money or ‘central bank money’, by
contrast, is a claim on the Bank, currently available to the public only in the form of physical
cash. The words ‘I promise to pay the bearer on demand the sum of five/ten/twenty/fifty
pounds’ appear on all banknotes issued by the Bank. Central bank money is financially riskfree in the sense that there is no credit, market or liquidity risk.
A core feature of the UK monetary system is the ‘uniformity’ or ‘singleness’ of money.
Uniformity or singleness means that all forms of money – both public and private, bank
deposits and cash – are valued equally (‘at par’ or ‘face value’), denominated in a common
currency (sterling) and interchangeable with each other. Access to public money supports the
uniformity of money. That ensures that households and businesses can be confident in the
value of money, regardless of its form and issuer. The ability of individuals to convert their
private money holdings into financially risk-free cash – central bank money – on demand, and
without loss of value, is the acid test that commercial bank money is safe.
Digital innovation in payments, such as contactless technology, the use of smart phones and
digital wallets, has shifted the balance of public and private money used to make payments.
Around 95% of the funds held by individuals to make UK payments today are private money,
held as commercial bank deposits, and typically spent electronically, such as by bank transfer
or debit card. As spending has become more digital, the use of cash for payments has
declined, falling from 55% of transactions to 14% over the past decade.[1]
The Bank, the Government, the FCA, and the PSR are committed to preserving access to
cash for those who wish to use it. The Government legislated to protect access to cash for
people and businesses, and ensure the resilience of the UK’s wholesale cash distribution
infrastructure, in the Financial Services and Markets Act (FSMA) 2023. But cash cannot be
used in electronic transactions in an increasingly digitalised world.
At the same time, new technologies are emerging that have the potential to affect significantly
the nature of money and how it is used for payments – for example, blockchain technology (a
network of ledgers organised in a series of ‘blocks’ containing data), smart contracts (which
Money and payments are changing.
Page 13
carry out specific actions based on pre-defined terms and conditions), and atomic swaps
(where the transfer of one asset occurs if and only if the transfer of another asset also
occurs). These new technologies are often being developed by firms outside of the traditional
financial sector and are allowing new entrants into the payments market. This innovation in
payments means that these technologies may also promote the issuance of new forms of
digital money, including by private-sector firms outside of the banking sector, such as ‘Big
Tech’ firms.[2] These new forms of privately issued digital money might be in sterling or, if
issued abroad but available in the UK, in a non-sterling currency.
Examples of new forms of private digital money might include stablecoins (which aim to
maintain a stable value against existing fiat currencies or other assets, typically by holding
backing assets) and tokenised bank deposits (tokens issued on the blockchain which are
digital representations of bank deposits).
These new forms of money are being regulated to make them safe and suitable for day-to-day
payments. Legislative changes under the FSMA 2023 allowed HM Treasury to bring ‘digital
settlement assets’ such as stablecoins into the regulatory framework. That legislative change
will allow UK regulators, including the Bank, to regulate a broad range of digital asset
instruments for everyday payments. In October 2023, HM Treasury published a document that
provides an update on the Government’s policy concerning the regulation of fiat-backed
stablecoins.[3]
In November 2023, the Bank, the FCA and the Prudential Regulation Authority (PRA)
published a cross-authority roadmap on innovations in payments and money. The Bank
published a Discussion Paper on the regulatory regime for systemic payment systems using
stablecoins. The FCA published a Discussion Paper on its proposed regulatory framework
for stablecoins that fall under its remit. And the PRA also sent a letter to bank CEOs that set
out expectations for banks issuing different forms of money, including tokenised deposits.
It is difficult to predict how the digital economy and payments landscape might evolve in
coming years, and what future payments needs might be. And the emergence and take-up of
these new forms of private digital money is uncertain.
The Bank and the Government must be prepared for future changes in money and payments,
to ensure that the UK remains at the forefront of innovation. In the future, it is possible to
envisage an economy with a range of different payment methods and forms of money
coexisting and complementing one another, as is the case today.
Page 14
In the context of a changing payments landscape, the UK, like many other countries, is
exploring the potential for a retail CBDC. In the UK this would be ‘the digital pound’. It would
have two core features: first, as a new form of central bank money for use in person and in a
digitalised world, and second, as a new payment system delivered as a public-private
partnership.
A digital pound would be issued by the Bank and denominated in sterling, for use by
households and businesses. £10 of digital pounds would always have the same value as, and
be interchangeable with, a £10 banknote. A digital pound would be used like a digital
banknote, available to make retail payments both in-person and online. Unlike a bank deposit,
a digital pound would be a direct claim on the Bank, rather than on a private commercial bank.
A digital pound would be a secure and stable form of money for everyday spending, unlike the
high-risk, volatile and speculative cryptoassets that are commonly traded today.
To enable a digital pound to operate as a payment system, the Bank would provide the core
infrastructure, including a ledger. Private-sector companies – which could be banks or
approved non-bank firms – would be able to integrate into the central digital pound
infrastructure and provide the interface between the Bank and users. This means that a digital
pound ecosystem would be facilitated by the private sector – while the Bank would operate
the core infrastructure, it would not be actively involved in the day-to-day end-user experience
of a digital pound. Private-sector firms would deal with all user-facing interactions and be able
to develop and offer innovative services using the digital pound.
In March 2020, the Bank published a Discussion Paper on CBDC. From mid-2021 to end2022, the Bank and HM Treasury undertook the first phase of the digital pound project, which
focused on research and exploration. A joint Bank of England-HM Treasury CBDC Taskforce
was announced in April 2021 to ensure a strategic and coordinated approach to CBDC
exploration by UK authorities, in line with their statutory objectives. This was complemented
by engagement with a range of stakeholders. The CBDC Engagement Forum sought input
from senior members drawn from financial institutions, civil society groups, merchants,
business users and consumers. The CBDC Technology Forum drew input from experts on
all technology aspects of CBDC.
The digital pound would be a UK retail CBDC.
The Bank and HM Treasury have been exploring the case for a digital pound since
2020.
Page 15
The culmination of the research and exploration phase was the publication of a joint Bank-HM
Treasury Consultation Paper on the digital pound in February 2023. The Consultation Paper
explained that, if current trends in payments continue, a digital pound could be a ‘solution’ to
two ‘problems’: first, risks to the uniformity of money, and second, risks to competition in
payments.
First, without such a digital pound, the general public’s access to, or use of, central bank
money could diminish. Moreover, with the emergence of new forms of privately issued digital
money, payments could become fragmented if current and future forms of money are not fully
interchangeable. That would happen if money used on one digital platform could not be easily
used on other platforms or converted into other forms of digital money, locking users into socalled ‘walled gardens’ or ‘closed loop systems’. Those developments could threaten the
uniformity of money in the UK and pose a risk to monetary and financial stability, which could
undermine trust in money.
Second, markets for digital money present several characteristics that may lead to
concentration, such as network effects, economies of scale and scope, and data advantages.
These features mean that the emergence of new forms of privately issued digital money could
result in the payments landscape being dominated by a small number of firms. That might be
benign if it reflects the efficiency of successful firms. But it could also pose a risk to
competition, harming consumer choice and the ability of new firms to enter the marketplace.
Over the longer term, firms with entrenched market positions might have fewer incentives to
innovate.
It is too early to make a decision now on whether to introduce a digital pound because that will
depend on how the retail payments landscape evolves in coming years, both in the UK and
abroad. But the Bank and HM Treasury consider that a digital pound is likely to be needed in
the future to safeguard the UK economy against risks to uniformity and competition in
payments, as a complement to regulation.
If introduced, such a digital pound would help to maintain public access to financially risk-free
central bank money, ensuring its role as an anchor for confidence and safety in the monetary
system, thereby supporting monetary and financial stability, and sovereignty. And by acting as
a public-private partnership (with low barriers to entry for the private sector to provide userfacing services), a digital pound could support innovation, choice and efficiency in payments
(Diagram 3).
The February 2023 Consultation Paper explained that the Bank and HM Treasury
judge that a digital pound is likely to be needed in the future, such that further
preparatory work is justified.
Page 16
To keep pace with future payment needs, and support continued innovation, a digital pound
would provide an open and flexible platform for the development of future retail payments
services by the private sector. This would allow innovators to shape and accommodate future
use cases for digital payments that could be difficult to anticipate today. Such innovation could
drive further efficiency in the provision of transaction services to merchants and households,
enhance users’ payments experience and widen access to services.
Advances in technologies and how they are deployed by the private sector will determine the
use cases and functionalities that a digital pound would offer. The Bank and HM Treasury do
not seek to prescribe or determine what future use cases for a digital pound might be,
although there needs to be confidence that they will emerge.
The experiments carried out over the past year by the London Centre of the Bank for
International Settlements (BIS) Innovation Hub in collaboration with the private sector under
Project Rosalind give some sense of the variety of functionalities that could be offered to
end-users. Examples are ‘Payment on Delivery’, when a buyer pays for goods or services
once they are received, and wallet-linking features, to facilitate payment for consumers to
enable subscriptions on merchant websites or make recurring bill payments with ‘one-click’
checkouts.
Diagram 3: The Bank and HM Treasury’s primary motivations for a digital pound
The private sector would take the lead in generating innovative use cases.
Page 17
While no decision has been taken on whether to introduce a digital pound, the development
work during the design phase will allow the Bank to build the necessary skills and put in place
the technical capability to introduce a digital pound in a timely manner, were the decision
made to do so in the future. Importantly, even if a decision is taken not to proceed to build a
digital pound, collaboration with the private sector and technology explorations during the
design phase will be beneficial. They will present opportunities for business-model innovation
and help to build technology capability in the UK fintech sector. Collaboration with the private
sector will also help to inform authorities’ regulation of private digital money, such as
stablecoins and tokenised bank deposits. The technology explorations will also deepen the
Bank and HM Treasury’s understanding of how such technologies might be deployed in
wholesale payments and settlements. Given that digital currency technologies are likely to be
significant in shaping the future of finance, the benefits of the design phase can be expected
to endure even if a decision is taken not to introduce a digital pound.
On publication of the Consultation Paper, the digital pound project progressed to phase two,
the design phase. The work in the design phase will allow the Bank and HM Treasury to
evaluate comprehensively the technological feasibility of a digital pound, determine the
optimal design and technology architecture, and deepen the Bank’s technology capabilities.
It would not be feasible or practical to explore multiple designs for a digital pound in the
current design phase. The focus of the February 2023 consultation was therefore to seek
feedback on the core design of a digital pound.
To that end, the Consultation Paper set out various proposed features for a digital pound in
relation to a) the platform model and public-private partnership, b) data protection and privacy
and c) user experience. These are summarised below in Diagram 4, as set out in the
Consultation Paper.
During the design phase, ongoing collaboration with the private sector will present
opportunities for business-model and technological innovation, even if a decision is
taken not to introduce a digital pound.
The Consultation Paper sought feedback on the design of a digital pound.
Page 18
Diagram 4: The model for a digital pound
Page 19
2: Methodology
Overview of respondents
The consultation invited feedback on twelve questions. The questions generally related to the
design of a digital pound that the Bank and HM Treasury would be exploring in the design
phase of the project.
The Bank and HM Treasury received a total of 51,529 submitted responses to the
consultation. Recognising that individuals vary in their ability and willingness to use online
tools, a range of channels was set up for respondents to reply, according to their preference.
Responses were received through an online questionnaire, by email and by letter.
Within that total:
Those responding via the online questionnaire were able to identify whether they were
individuals or organisations: 40,330 (99%) of those respondents identified themselves as
individuals, while 555 (1%) identified as organisations.
Responses by organisations encompassed large firms, SMEs and sole traders. Organisations
using the online questionnaire were able to identify their industry sub-sector. For those that
chose to do so, civil society, technology, consultancies and financial services firms
represented the largest portion of organisational responses (Chart 1).
Of the 40,885 online questionnaire responses submitted, 566 (1.4%) did not provide an
answer to any of the questions and only provided identifier information such as name or email
address.
The online questionnaire tool identified that a number of forms were not submitted. Only
online questionnaire response forms that respondents formally submitted were included in the
review process. Accordingly, unsubmitted forms were not included in the review process.
The Bank and HM Treasury received a large number of responses to the consultation,
the majority of which were from individuals.
40,885 responses were received via the online questionnaires.[4]
10,603 were received by email.
41 were received by letter.
Page 20
The approach to reviewing responses
The Consultation Paper sought feedback on both open and closed questions. As a result,
responses varied in terms of their length and complexity. A methodology was developed to
meet several criteria:
In light of these criteria, it was judged that a combination of manual and computational
techniques provided the most appropriate review methodology.
Manual review consisted of a detailed reading of responses by Bank and HM Treasury
specialists. Computational techniques involved the use of industry-standard computational
models which process text in a systematic way. Text mining or natural language processing
(NLP) techniques were deployed through the use of: (i) counting; (ii) filtering; and (iii) grouping
of keywords and phrases.[5] Additionally, techniques were also deployed to support the
grouping of topics and the identification of themes and patterns.
Chart 1: Organisations that responded to the Consultation Paper online questionnaire
The Bank and HM Treasury deployed a combination of manual and computational
techniques to review responses.
Fair and conscientious review of all feedback received
Robust and rigorous review to capture insights in an objective and consistent way
Efficient review to ensure a timely response by the Bank and HM Treasury
Page 21
Manual reviews were carried out on all responses received via email and letter and a large
portion of online responses. Computational techniques were applied to all online
questionnaire responses. At no point were the computational models used to remove or
exclude responses.
Manual review can be used to identify details and nuances in the responses. It is particularly
useful to review complex responses. Manual review also serves to cross-check and validate
the results of the computational techniques. This means that no interpretation of the feedback
or conclusions drawn from it were solely derived from the outputs of the computational
models.
Computational techniques, by contrast, can process text far more quickly than a person would
be able to. They are more systematic and thorough in processing a large volume of text in a
consistent manner than purely human review. Computational techniques can also extract
meaning from text that may be missed by human readers due to error or subjectivity.
Computational techniques help to ensure that data is analysed in a fair and objective manner
and enable the processing of a large volume of data in an optimal way. The findings from
computational review were validated by manual review.
The computational models were subject to thorough scrutiny and challenge internally. An
independent external review was also commissioned, and the models deployed were found to
be fit for purpose.
Manual review and computational techniques are complementary. Using them in
parallel allowed the Bank and HM Treasury to take advantage of the benefits of both
techniques.
Page 22
3: Users’ rights, privacy, and protections
The extent of engagement during the consultation period is a testament to the public’s interest
and concern about the possible implications of the introduction of a digital pound. All of the
feedback provided is valuable and will support further work in the design phase, by helping
the Bank and HM Treasury to identify the issues that matter to the public.
Most of the responses described general sentiment towards a retail CBDC, and perspectives
on its perceived impact by the public, rather than detailed feedback on the proposed design
for a digital pound set out in the Consultation Paper. This detailed feedback is summarised
in the next chapter ‘Feedback on the design of the digital pound’.
Many respondents expressed concerns that a digital pound could encroach on their rights.
The Bank and HM Treasury recognise the strength of feeling on these matters and the need
to build public trust in a digital pound.
This chapter covers the actions and commitments to deliver that guarantee for users’ privacy
and control in the following areas (Diagram 5):
If a decision is taken to introduce a digital pound, protections would be put in place to
guarantee the public’s rights and privacy. The Government has committed to
introducing primary legislation with a vote in both Houses of Parliament before
launching a digital pound. Legislation would be preceded by a further public
consultation, and would guarantee users’ privacy, data protection, and control of their
money. The Bank and the Government, along with the FCA and the PSR, will continue
to safeguard access to cash.
Decision-making and the role of Parliament
Privacy and data protection
Programmability and user control of their money
Safeguarding access to cash
Page 23
Decision-making and the role of Parliament
While the Consultation Paper did not seek views on the role of Parliament, many respondents
agreed that Parliament should have the opportunity to consider and scrutinise the decision to
introduce a digital pound. This is consistent with feedback received from Parliamentarians.
Working with Parliament has been a priority for the Bank and the Government throughout the
first phase of work on a digital pound, which has been subject to numerous discussions in the
chambers and committees, including during the passage of the FSMA 2023.
The Consultation Paper noted that issuing a digital pound would require deep public trust in
this new form of money. To build that trust, the Bank and HM Treasury have initiated a
national conversation on the future of money – a dialogue involving a wide range of
stakeholders, experts, and the public. The introduction of a digital pound, should a decision be
taken to proceed, would be a significant undertaking, so it is crucial that Parliament plays a
major role in any decision to launch a digital pound.
In May 2023, the Chancellor committed to introducing primary legislation in both Houses of
Parliament before launching a digital pound. Parliamentary scrutiny is an essential part of
assessing the case for a digital pound. If a decision were taken to proceed, Parliament would
Diagram 5: Users’ rights and privacy
Parliament has a central role in scrutinising the Bank and HM Treasury’s work on a
digital pound.
Last year, the Government committed to introducing primary legislation before the
launch of a digital pound.
Page 24
have the opportunity to vote on the design and regulatory framework of a digital pound, during
the passage of primary legislation.
Important questions regarding the design of a digital pound still need to be answered before
legislation could be introduced. However, the consultation feedback demonstrated that strong
safeguards will be required to command users’ trust around key issues such as privacy and
programmability. That is why the Government is now committing to enshrining objectives for
privacy and programmability into legislation it would introduce for a digital pound.
There will be continued open and transparent engagement with Parliament during the design
phase as work progresses towards a decision on whether to introduce a digital pound. There
would be further consultation with the public on a digital pound before introducing primary
legislation.
Privacy and data protection
There is a difference between anonymity and privacy. The Consultation Paper described the
commitment to making a digital pound private. Given laws to fight financial crime, it would not
be anonymous.
Cash and anonymity
The physical nature of cash means that there is no digital record when it is used for payment,
so it can be an anonymous means of payment. Many people value the anonymity of cash and
prefer cash transactions for this reason, among others.
The anonymity of cash transactions means that, in some instances, criminals can seek to hide
behind it for money laundering and other forms of financial crime.
The UK Anti-Money Laundering (AML) and Combating the Financing of Terrorism (CFT)
Regimes take a risk-based approach to managing these potential harms, so that the
appropriate balance is struck between tackling any criminal activity and preserving freedom to
use cash.[6] For example, businesses making or receiving large value cash payments in
exchange for goods are subject to additional regulatory requirements, such as the undertaking
of due diligence to understand the nature of the transaction and identity of those involved.
The Bank and HM Treasury will continue to engage with Parliament as work
progresses during the design phase. The introduction of primary legislation would be
preceded by a further public consultation.
Page 25
Digital payments and privacy
Unlike cash, digital payments, for example all debit and credit card purchases, generate
personal data when used for transactions. Digital payments leave a digital footprint and so
cannot be anonymous like cash.
The AML and CFT regimes also apply to digital payments. And because the ability to identify
users is necessary to prevent financial crime, there are requirements for certain information to
be sent alongside payments, with the amount of information required reflecting the value and
perceived risk of the transaction.
Although digital payments are not anonymous, the privacy of the user’s identity and the data
generated by transactions are stringently protected through data protection laws passed by
Parliament.
It means that digital payments have built-in privacy safeguards, whereby law enforcement
only have access to users’ personal information in limited circumstances where there is a fair
and lawful basis.
The approach for the digital pound
The Consultation Paper set out that a digital pound would be subject to rigorous standards
of privacy and data protection, and that it would be at least as private as current forms of
digital money, like money in a commercial bank account or e-money.
The digital pound would not be anonymous because, just like bank accounts, the ability to
identify and verify users is necessary to prevent financial crime. This puts the digital pound on
a level playing field with digital payments today. A digital pound would not replace cash, so the
public would continue to have access to an anonymous payment option.
The Consultation Paper explained that anyone who chose to use the digital pound would not
engage directly with the Bank, but instead manage their digital pounds in wallets provided by
PIPs.
PIPs would be required to identify users to protect consumers against fraud and financial
crime, as is the case with commercial banks today. Just like opening a bank or other payment
account, some level of identity verification would be required when opening a digital pound
The Consultation Paper committed to making a digital pound at least as private as the
regime that applies to digital payments today. In addition, neither the Bank nor the
Government would have access to users’ personal data. A digital pound would not be
anonymous given the need to support enforcement against financial crime. But
personal data for that purpose would be held by the Payment Interface Providers
(PIPs) and would not be visible to the Bank and the Government.
Page 26
wallet. These requirements would be consistent with those that legally apply today and in the
future for financial and payments institutions. The UK Digital Identity and Attributes Trust
Framework, including the confidence levels outlined in Good Practice Guide 45, could be
used by PIPs and users to support access to a digital pound.[7]
The Consultation Paper also proposed that PIPs explore ways to allow users to choose from a
range of digital pound wallet services, based on tiered access with varying levels of
identification, to ensure the digital pound is accessible to all. The next chapter on ‘Feedback
on the design of the digital pound’ sets out respondents’ views on tiered access to digital
pound wallets.
All firms that process personal data within a digital pound system would be subject to robust
regulation and have to comply with UK data protection laws, such as UK General Data
Protection Regulation (GDPR).
The Bank and the Government would not have access to users’ personal data. The Bank
would be responsible for ensuring that payments between accounts are processed and
settled. To perform this function, the Bank would only require anonymised settlement data. To
run the core ledger, the Bank would not need to access users’ personal data, such as users’
names or what their digital pounds were spent on (Diagram 6). Law enforcement agencies
would only have access to users’ personal information in limited circumstances and where
there is a fair and lawful basis – as is the case today.
Diagram 6: Users’ privacy for a digital pound
Page 27
Feedback and the Bank and HM Treasury’s response
The involvement of central banks and governments in the provision of digital money has
understandably led to questions around whether a digital pound could be used for surveillance
and control of payments. The Bank and HM Treasury understand that privacy is critical to
preserving the freedom of how the public use money. Maintaining people’s right to privacy is a
top priority.
Respondents were in strong agreement with the proposal that neither the Bank nor the
Government should have access to personal data but were concerned that this would not be
adequately enforced.
In light of respondents’ feedback, the following actions will be taken forward:
A.1. The Bank and the Government would not access users’ personal data through the Bank’s
core infrastructure – and legislation introduced by the Government for the digital pound would
guarantee users’ privacy.
A.2. The Bank commits to exploring technological options that would prevent the Bank from
accessing any personal data through the Bank’s core infrastructure.
A.3. A commitment to launching a working group dedicated to privacy issues as part of the
design phase. This will involve an open call for information to ensure the working group is
represented by a diverse group of individuals and organisations.
Privacy for digital pound users means that users will have confidence in knowing exactly what
rules will govern who holds and can access their data. The Consultation Paper set out that a
digital pound could be privacy-enhancing by design, giving users greater control over the use
and value of the data generated by their transactions and held by PIPs, through the use of
Privacy-Enhancing Techniques (PETs). The next chapter on ‘Feedback on the design of the
digital pound’ summarises respondents’ views on further exploring PETs and also sets out
how the Bank is conducting experiments to assess the trade-offs of these technologies.
PIPs would operate within a robust legal and regulatory framework to support users’ control of
their personal data. As mentioned in the next chapter, more detail on the regulatory framework
that will govern this will be set out in the design phase. The Bank and HM Treasury will also
clarify the small number of scenarios where users’ data – held by PIPs – may be relevant for
authorities. Any scenarios where access is required will be governed by a clear and
transparent data framework, which will be presented to Parliament for approval.
Many respondents expressed concerns about privacy, which the Bank and HM
Treasury take very seriously. Legislation introduced by the Government for a digital
pound would guarantee users’ privacy.
This guarantee of privacy will include transparency and clarity on the role of data in a
digital pound ecosystem.
Page 28
The limited circumstances where personal data held by PIPs will be relevant to authorities will
always be for the benefit of the general public. In addition to law enforcement to fight crime
(operating via law enforcement agencies engaging with PIPs under rules already approved by
Parliament and not directly with the Bank), these are likely to be limited to:
The Bank and HM Treasury will work collaboratively with stakeholders to understand how to
mitigate these risks through governance and technological choices, while safeguarding the
principle of consent on how users’ data is managed. The approach to data in a digital pound
system will be subject to further consultation and designed in such a way that authorities will
minimise, and wherever possible eliminate, their reliance on personal data. If there were a
decision to proceed with a digital pound, the data framework would ultimately be determined
by Parliament.
Programmability and users’ control over their money
Programmability is a functionality that allows the setting of rules to make payments, for
example to limit spending on certain products, or to save automatically a small amount of
money after each purchase. This technology builds on existing, familiar applications like Direct
Debit, so most users already have some experience with programmable payments.
Programmability could enable the use of smart contracts, which carry out specific actions
based on pre-defined terms and conditions. For example, a smart contract could be set up to
allow a business owner to pay a supplier immediately on signed receipt of goods, rather than
having to wait for an invoice to be issued and then paid. Programmability could also enable
‘escrow functionality’, which can earmark funds with set conditions on when the funds can be
released. For example, in experiments run by the Bank with the private sector under Project
Rosalind, the instant refund of train tickets in the event of a train delay was shown to be
feasible.
The Consultation Paper emphasised that neither the Bank nor the Government would
program users’ money by embedding rules on how or when they could spend it. Nonetheless,
respondents raised concerns about the ability of future governments to program their money.
Managing the failure of a PIP so that users can be transferred to another PIP in as
seamless a manner as possible and resume access to their digital pounds.
Resolving payments disputes where they have not been solved via PIPs and as occurs
with the Financial Ombudsman Service today.
As set out in the Consultation Paper, neither the Bank nor the Government would
program the public’s money or control their spending.
Page 29
The purpose of a digital pound would be to provide the public with an additional means of
accessing central bank money in a landscape of increasingly digital payments; this would not
come at the expense of users’ control of their spending.
The Bank and HM Treasury are committed to continuing to discuss these concerns with the
public, industry, and Parliament to provide reassurance on this point during the design phase.
As explained below, actions are being taken to reassure the public, with the intention to put
appropriate safeguards in place to preclude a digital pound from being made programmable
by the Bank or the Government in the future.
The public would have the option to use the digital pound, and they would be able to decide
how they spend it. For example, as set out in the Consultation Paper, users could permit PIPs
to automate or set rules for their digital pound payments (Diagram 7).
The provision of automated payments by PIPs would be subject to a stringent and robust
regulatory framework and always require user consent. No PIP would be able to program
users’ money, or limit where and when it could be spent, unless at users’ request. The Bank
and HM Treasury are committed to working closely with industry and regulators to create a
digital pound ecosystem that is supportive of innovation, while ensuring suitable regulatory
protections are in place.
Users would have control over whether they use digital pounds, and how they choose
to spend them. PIPs could only program digital pound payments with user consent,
and this would be subject to a robust regulatory framework.
Diagram 7: Users would control their money
Page 30
Given the feedback received on programmability, the following actions will be taken forward:
B.1. As with privacy, legislation introduced by the Government for a digital pound would
guarantee that the Bank and the Government would not program users’ digital pounds.
B.2. During the design phase, the Bank and HM Treasury will explore further technological
safeguards against programmability initiated by the Bank or the Government, including futureproofing any regulatory regime to keep pace with technological developments.
Safeguarding access to cash
As set out in the next chapter, respondents to the Consultation Paper raised concerns about
the declining use of cash and a potential lack of support by the authorities in the future. They
emphasised the critical role that cash plays in society, and the importance of continuing to
safeguard and preserve access to it.
Protecting and retaining the public’s access to cash is very important to the Bank and the
Government. The Bank is committed to continuing to provide cash for those who want to use
it. The Government and the Bank will continue to safeguard future access to cash alongside
evaluating the case for a digital pound during the design phase. A digital pound would be
designed such that it forms part of a diverse payments landscape consisting of cash and
digital payments.
As explained in 'Why the Bank and HM Treasury consulted on the digital pound', money and
payments are changing. While cash remains central to the payment habits of some individuals
and communities, its use for payments has declined, and electronic payments are now the
most prevalent payment method.
While access to cash will continue to be safeguarded, the Bank and HM Treasury recognise
that different forms of public money are likely to be needed in an increasingly digital economy.
As set out in the Consultation Paper, a digital pound would not replace cash but complement
it. It would provide the public with greater choice. They would have an additional means of
payment that has many of the core characteristics of cash (i.e. a direct claim on the Bank,
denominated in sterling, directly equal to and interchangeable with a banknote), but also with
digital functionality, for example for online payments. As is the case today, most merchants
would be expected to continue to accept various forms of money, ensuring users can choose
the payment method most suited to their needs.
Safeguarding future access to cash is of critical importance to the Government and
the Bank. The Bank is committed to continuing to provide cash for those who want to
use it. A digital pound would complement, not replace, cash.
A digital pound would sit alongside cash; it would complement, not replace, cash, or
other forms of digital payment.
Page 31
The Government has continued to take decisive action to protect access to cash in law:
through both the Financial Services Act 2021, where the Government legislated to enable
cashback without a purchase, and the FSMA 2023, where the Government legislated to
protect access to cash. The latter legislation established the FCA as the regulator responsible
for seeking to ensure reasonable provision of cash withdrawal and deposit services. It also
gave the Bank the powers it needs to ensure that the infrastructure underpinning wholesale
cash distribution remains effective, resilient and sustainable if cash usage continues to
decline. The Government, the Bank and the FCA are now in the process of implementing this
legislation, and once fully operational it will ensure that all those who want to continue to
withdraw and deposit cash regularly are able to do so.
The Government’s action has been complemented by several industry-led initiatives to protect
access to cash in the UK. LINK, the UK’s cash and ATM network, has committed to protecting
free-to-use ATMs more than one kilometre away from the next nearest free ATM or Post
Office, and free access to cash on high streets.[8] LINK is held to account against this
commitment by the PSR, which has used its powers to give a direction to LINK to maintain the
broad geographic spread of the UK’s free-to-use cash machine network.
Furthermore, in the context of the legislation in FSMA 2023, the UK’s largest high-street banks
have established a framework for providing new shared cash access services across the UK.
As part of this, LINK now makes assessments of access-to-cash needs in local communities
in the event of the closure of a core cash service or where LINK receives a request directly
from a community. Following this assessment, LINK can recommend that an alternative
service is needed, at which point the UK’s largest banks have committed to providing
additional cash access services.
Diagram 8 summarises respondents’ feedback about users’ rights, privacy, and protections,
and how the Bank and the Government will respond.
The Government continues to take decisive action to guarantee access to cash in law.
Page 32
Diagram 8: Users’ rights, privacy, and protections
Page 33
4: Feedback on the design of the digital pound
In the February 2023 Consultation Paper, the Bank and HM Treasury consulted on the
design of a retail digital pound that will be explored during the design phase. The Consultation
Paper sought feedback on twelve questions.
This chapter summarises the responses received from those respondents who provided
detailed feedback on some or all of the twelve design questions. Those responses accounted
for a smaller proportion of the total responses received, and came from a combination of
industry representative organisations, financial services firms, technology firms,
consultancies, civil society groups and academics.
For completeness, this chapter does mention, where relevant, the feedback of individual
respondents who expressed concerns about the possible broader societal implications of a
retail CBDC, such as access to cash, users’ privacy and control of their money, without
commenting specifically on the twelve design questions. The actions and commitments to
address these concerns are described in the previous chapter, 'Users’ rights, privacy, and
protections'.
Future payments landscape
What the Consultation Paper said
The Bank and HM Treasury are exploring a digital pound because money and
payments are changing. Were current payment trends to continue, the Consultation
Paper explained that there would likely be a need for, and benefits from, a digital
pound, to support the safety and interchangeability of money through continued access
to central bank money, and to promote competition, innovation and choice in
payments.
Question asked in the Consultation Paper
1. Do you have comments on how trends in payments may evolve and the
opportunities and risks that they may entail?
Page 34
Summary of respondents’ views
Many individuals expressed concern about the declining use of cash. Some individual
respondents called for the Bank and the Government to protect access to cash legally. The
Government has taken decisive action to protect access to cash in law and remains
committed to maintaining that access.
A small number of respondents from academia and the fintech sector thought the decline of
cash use reflected the public’s willingness to adopt digital payment methods. Some
respondents expressed concern that cash use would continue to decline, to the point it might
no longer be accepted. There were mixed views about whether cash usage would be
supported in the future. However, a small number of respondents thought there would always
be a minimum amount of cash used for payments, due to its familiarity, a preference for
anonymity, the trust of payment upon delivery, merchants’ possible non-acceptance of
electronic payments, and usage by the unbanked.
Some respondents stressed the risk of digital exclusion if cash use continued to decline (see
‘Financial inclusion and Public Sector Equality Duty' below). Indeed, a small number of
respondents thought a digital pound would accelerate the decline of cash usage. Others
pointed out the potential risk to digital-payment users from exposure to online fraud, scams
and cyberattacks.
Other respondents, by contrast, saw the decline of cash use as an opportunity to combat
counterfeiting, money laundering and reduce terrorist funding.
In that context, some saw a digital pound as maintaining access to risk-free public money and
improving payment options where cash is not readily accepted. The Bank and the
Government are committed to maintaining access to cash and meeting cash demand. A digital
pound would complement, not replace, cash.
Many respondents thought that the use case for a digital pound could be made clearer to the
public. Other respondents questioned the need for a digital pound, given that retail payments
today are generally fast, digital, and efficient.
There was broad agreement that the payment trends identified in the Consultation
Paper would continue. But there was a range of views on where a digital pound might
fit in the future payments landscape.
Many respondents called for the Bank and HM Treasury to set out in more detail the
potential use cases for a digital pound. Some respondents thought that a digital
pound could improve innovation in payments, providing greater choice, speed and
lower costs.
Page 35
However, some fintech respondents and civil society representatives felt that a digital pound
would help to position the UK at the forefront of payments innovation and competitiveness.
Agreeing with one of the primary motivations for a digital pound set out in the Consultation
Paper, they noted that a digital pound could lead to improvements in payments, including
greater choice, convenience, speed, and lower cost for users.
A few fintech respondents saw a strong use case for micropayments, which are payments of
extremely low value. Micropayments could enable new business models, for example paying
a small amount to read a single newspaper article, rather than having to pay for a whole
subscription. While in principle possible today, the financial effort required is rarely worth it for
the provider. A small number of respondents from civil society and the technology sector saw
a strong use case for a digital pound to support ‘Internet of Things’ (IoT) services, which refer
to physical devices that are embedded with sensors or software to connect and exchange
data with other devices and systems over the internet. A digital pound could therefore enable
machine-to-machine payments, eg a connected vehicle paying for fuel, electricity or parking.
Several technology companies and a small number of consultancies emphasised the benefits
of new technologies like blockchain and Distributed Ledger Technology (DLT) to support
transparency, security and efficiency in payments. The Bank’s Technology Working Paper
discussed the technologies that could support a digital pound, noting that the use of centrally
governed, distributed database, technologies might be a more efficient and appropriate
approach than the use of DLT solutions. However, the Bank will continue to assess a range of
approaches and monitor ongoing technology developments.
Fintech respondents were largely supportive of a mixed payment ecosystem, where cash, a
digital pound and private digital means of payment, co-existed and were used in a
complementary way. Many respondents mentioned the importance of interoperability, where a
digital pound could be interchanged with other forms of money.
Some of these respondents also noted the role a digital pound could play in safeguarding
payments competition and mitigating the risk of ‘walled gardens’, where it is costly, complex or
slow for users to convert or transfer digital money holdings across platforms run by different
companies. However, a small number of respondents felt that adapting regulatory frameworks
for emerging payment systems, like stablecoin, would be a more effective way to promote
competition.
Some respondents noted challenges that might occur if a retail digital pound coexisted with
private-sector digital assets. They worried about the competing demands that digital pound
requirements would place on the existing payments infrastructure, as well as the payments
Respondents supported a mixed payment ecosystem where a digital pound coexisted with other forms of money, but some were concerned by the demands this
would place on existing infrastructure.
Page 36
industry’s ability to deliver initiatives such as New Payments Architecture (to support
interbank payments), Open Banking (which allows customers to direct their banks to share
their data with third-party providers securely), Swift (a global messaging network for financial
institutions), and the Real-Time Gross Settlement (RTGS) Renewal Programme (see
below).
Some respondents felt greater coordination would be beneficial and called for a
comprehensive roadmap that prioritised initiatives and resources. That view echoed the
feedback received by the recently published independent Future of Payments Review 2023
led by Joe Garner. Based on that feedback, the authors of the Review recommended that the
Government develop a National Payments Vision and Strategy, to bring clarity to its future
desired outcomes for UK payments and simplify the landscape.[9]
A number of respondents in the banking industry thought that private-sector alternatives to a
retail digital pound, such as tokenised bank deposits (tokens issued on a blockchain which are
digital representations of bank deposits), could achieve the digital pound’s stated objectives,
including delivering improved digital functionality. These respondents did not see clear use
cases for a retail digital pound and favoured a wholesale CBDC, as a new platform for highvalue payments in central bank money.
Use cases proposed for a wholesale digital pound included: facilitating cross-border payments
between financial institutions, enhancing the digitisation of financial markets and
infrastructures, better real-time risk management outside of traditional operating hours, and
supporting interoperability with regulated private forms of money for wholesale settlement. A
small number of respondents also mentioned stablecoin issuers using wholesale CBDC as
reserve assets to back their liabilities.
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
The Bank and HM Treasury will continue to monitor payment trends in the UK and
abroad as the blueprint for a digital pound is developed, and a decision taken as to
whether to proceed to build the infrastructure.
If a decision was taken to introduce a digital pound, the Bank and HM Treasury
recognise that its future success would depend on close collaboration with the private
sector. The digital pound would be a joint endeavour between the public and private
sectors.
The potential merits of tokenised bank deposits and those of a wholesale CBDC were
also put forward by several commercial banks.
Page 37
In recent months, the Bank and HM Treasury have refreshed the format and
memberships of the CBDC Engagement and Technology forums to ensure that a
diverse range of voices across civil society, industry and the technology sector is being
heard. The Bank and HM Treasury have also launched a series of industry working
groups, where industry experts will test use cases and potential design functionalities.
The first two of these groups will focus on retailer needs and offline payments.
The Bank will also continue to engage closely with the experiments being conducted
internationally on technologies associated with wholesale CBDC (including
establishing new platforms). The Bank currently enables wholesale settlement through
its RTGS service. The Bank has been improving this service through a
transformational initiative that will deliver an enhanced core settlement engine that is
more flexible, efficient and with more open standards, starting this year. The Bank and
HM Treasury’s current assessment is that the benefits of new technologies for
wholesale settlement would be delivered in the quickest timeframe via the renewed
RTGS rather than a new wholesale CBDC platform.
The Bank will work closely with industry on ideas for tokenised deposits.
Platform model and public-private partnership
What the Consultation Paper said
The Consultation Paper set out the Bank and HM Treasury’s proposal for a platform
model for the provision of a digital pound. The model is based on a public-private
partnership, in which the Bank would provide the core infrastructure and ledger, where
users' digital pounds are issued, held and transactions are settled. Private-sector
intermediaries, both financial and non-financial firms, would access this core ledger
and, using ‘pass-through’ wallets, provide payment and other services directly to endusers. This means that the private-sector digital pound wallet providers (PIPs) would
not hold customers’ funds directly on their balance sheets.
By providing the digital pound wallets, PIPs, as opposed to the Bank, would have the
direct commercial relationships with users. To establish and maintain these
relationships, they would require identity information of wallet account holders, which
would allow them to carry out Know Your Customer (KYC) checks and comply with
AML regulations.
Page 38
Question asked in the Consultation Paper
2. Do you have comments on our proposition for the roles and responsibilities
of private sector digital wallets as set out in the platform model? Do you
agree that private sector digital wallet providers should not hold end-users’
funds directly on their balance sheets?
Summary of respondents’ views
There was broad support for the platform model, with an emphasis on the need for further
detail being provided in the future, for example regarding the allocation of accountability
between the PIPs and the Bank in the case of PIP failure.
The majority agreed that the Bank should provide the core infrastructure and that PIPs should
not hold end-users’ funds directly. However, a small number of respondents thought that
keeping funds off the PIPs’ balance sheets could limit some potential use cases, such as
staking (the process by which users lock up their digital assets for a period of time to support
the operation of a blockchain) and programmability (the ability of users to set rules around
their payments).
Others felt that ‘pass-through’ wallets hosted by intermediaries might add a potentially
unnecessary step that could increase costs, including for end-users, and make the system
more vulnerable to attacks. A small number of respondents from civil society groups were
concerned that the private provision of wallets would concentrate power in the hands of a few
dominant payment fintech and/or card network providers. Concerns were raised that such
concentration in the hands of financial incumbents would weaken competition in payment
services to the detriment of consumers.
Some saw the public-private partnership as an opportunity to design a new payments regime.
Active engagement and participation from the private sector in the early stages of
development, including seeking input from consumer groups and representatives, was seen
as important by some respondents.
There was strong emphasis on the need for clear and fair regulation of the PIPs. The majority
suggested taking a ‘same risk, same regulatory outcome’ approach, to ensure that privatesector intermediaries compete on an equal footing and are held to rigorous standards for
Most respondents agreed that the Bank should provide the core infrastructure and
that PIPs should not hold end-users’ funds directly. There was strong emphasis on
the need for clear and fair regulation of the PIPs to ensure a level playing field.
Page 39
operational resilience, risk management, and compliance. Some respondents from the
banking sector thought greater clarity was needed about how existing legal and regulatory
regimes might need to be expanded to accommodate a digital pound.
Commercial banks and fintechs emphasised the need for digital pound wallets to be
interoperable with other means of payment. Several stressed the need for a seamless transfer
of digital pounds across wallets from different providers. A small number of fintech firms
thought the Bank should set basic requirements for digital pound wallets to ensure
standardisation across PIPs. A small number of payments trade association and industry
groups supported a ‘basic’ digital pound wallet that would provide a mandatory minimum level
of essential services, to prevent user exclusion, for example by supporting the provision of
less commercially attractive use cases.
Some respondents noted their support for the provision of non-payment value-added services
by private providers, eg enhanced risk analytics, dispute-resolution services, and commercial
digital ID services. Many suggested that innovation must be a shared responsibility between
the ecosystem owner and partners.
There was concern, in particular among banks, that PIPs might struggle to identify
commercially viable business models. That concern generally reflected the cost of compliance
with AML/KYC regulations. To several respondents it was not clear how PIPs would raise
revenue without charging consumers and/or merchants. For them, the lack of financial
incentives to become a PIP could reduce private-sector participation. They thought the
proposal that PIPs would not hold digital pounds nor pay interest on customers’ holdings
could reduce user adoption and deprive providers of an associated source of revenue on the
asset side of their balance sheets.
A small number of respondents noted that a lack of revenue might discourage PIPs from
supporting consumer use cases that generated less value.
A small set of trade bodies representing electronic money issuers thought that the
Government should set aside a fund to support PIPs’ investments in a digital pound
infrastructure. Some respondents suggested using the existing payments infrastructure to
promote merchant adoption, as well as the existing customer bases of established payment
ecosystems to support the digital pound’s launch strategy.
There was emphasis on the Bank and HM Treasury ensuring that PIPs’ business
models would be commercially viable.
Page 40
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
In light of the feedback received, the Bank and HM Treasury judge that the platform
model continues to serve best the objectives of a digital pound set out in the
Consultation Paper. Therefore, the platform model will be developed further in the
design phase, and the Bank will explore the possible architecture, components and
solutions in depth.
As set out in the Technology Working Paper response, while the platform model
remains the preferred model, the Bank anticipates that the model will evolve and adapt
over the course of the design phase, taking into account further research and
experimentation. More detail on the proposed model for a digital pound will be
confirmed in the blueprint, which is expected to be completed by the end of the design
phase.
While the design phase work will focus on further elaborating the platform model, the
Bank will continue to explore alternative models proposed by respondents to the
Technology Working Paper. However, at present the Bank judges these models to be
less suitable, given the objectives set out in the Consultation Paper, than the platform
model.
The Bank and HM Treasury will also look to make progress on developing the
regulatory framework for the PIPs and will also prioritise efforts to understand the costs
and revenues for PIPs and the viability of their business models to support
participation in a digital pound ecosystem.
Privacy and data protection
What the Consultation Paper said
In the Consultation Paper, the Bank and HM Treasury proposed that neither the
Government nor the Bank would have access to users' personal data.
The Consultation Paper also noted that a digital pound would be subject to rigorous
standards of privacy and data protection but would not be anonymous. For example,
law enforcement agencies would have to approach the relevant private wallet provider
or third party to access any data as part of an investigation, as they would have to with
bank accounts today. This would require a lawful, proportionate and fair case to be
made. Wallet providers would have the right to challenge any request to access the
data they hold.
Page 41
It was also proposed that users be able to vary their privacy preferences and make
choices about the way their data is used. For example, the Bank and HM Treasury
support private-sector firms exploring ways to allow users to choose from a range of
wallet services, based on tiered access with varying levels of identification, to ensure
that a digital pound is accessible to all. Private-sector firms could also explore building
Privacy-Enhancing Techniques (PETs) into digital pound wallets to provide users with
control of personal data generated by transactions.
Questions asked in the Consultation Paper
3. Do you agree that the Bank should not have access to users’ personal data,
but instead see anonymised transaction data and aggregated system-wide
data for the running of the core ledger? What views do you have on a
privacy-enhancing digital pound?
4. What are your views on the provision and utility of tiered access to the
digital pound that is linked to user identity information?
5. What views do you have on the embedding of privacy-enhancing
techniques to give users more control of the level of privacy that they can
ascribe to their personal transactions data?
Summary of respondents’ views
The main concern was that the Bank and the Government would use the technology and
processes of the platform model to breach users’ privacy actively for surveillance purposes,
for example to track individuals’ spending habits.
There was also concern that the UK authorities would exploit existing legislation granting law
enforcement agencies access to users’ personal data, despite existing legal safeguards. This
was a general concern about breaching existing law enforcement legislation, applied to a
digital pound ecosystem.
Individuals and some civil society groups also shared the misconception that the Bank would
be able to link people’s identity to transaction data and that digital identification would enable
government surveillance. A related misconception was that the Bank and/or the Government
would be responsible for verifying users’ identity. As set out in the Consultation Paper, the
There was wide agreement that the Government and the Bank should not have
access to personal data but many expressed concerns that this would not be
adequately implemented or enforced.
Page 42
PIPs would be responsible for carrying out ID checks, as is done for bank accounts. Users
would therefore be identifiable to the wallet providers, but they would be anonymous to the
Bank and the Government.
Tiered wallets would allow PIPs to offer less stringent ID requirements for low value digital
pound holdings and transactions, supporting consumer choice and the inclusion of those who
are only able or willing to provide more limited forms of ID.
Many respondents supported the benefits that tiered access could provide for financial
inclusion, but others were concerned that the proposal would introduce additional barriers and
control over wallet access.
Some respondents reported it was unclear how AML/KYC checks would apply to tiered
wallets, and that without a uniform approach to identity verification, people may be treated
differently by different PIPs.
Some suggested that developing offline payments capability could offer greater privacy for
low-value payments as transactions would not be recorded on a ledger.
A majority from industry and civil society groups thought that end-users should have a
proactive say in how their data is used. Some thought that users should be opted out of
sharing data with third parties by default and offered benefits if they voluntarily opted in, so
that any monetisation of data from transactions could be subject to informed consumer
consent.
Some respondents mentioned the importance of striking the right balance between building in
privacy (and data-protection-by-design at a minimum to today’s standards) and complying
with AML/CFT reporting requirements.
A few respondents mentioned self-custody wallets, where the PIP would not have custody of a
users’ digital pounds, as a privacy-protective option.
There was support for the exploration of PETs to control and/or shield users’ personal data. A
small number of respondents raised concerns that PETs were still immature and posed
implementation risks, calling for more work, as set out in the Bank’s Technology Working
Paper.
There was broad support for tiered access to digital pound wallets, with the ability to
provide varying levels of identity information.
Respondents supported user control of their data, with a range of views on privacyenhancing functionality. There was support for the exploration of Privacy-EnhancingTechniques (PETs).
Page 43
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
The Bank and HM Treasury understand respondents’ strong feelings about privacy.
The section on privacy and data protection in the previous chapter sets out how the
Bank and HM Treasury commit to addressing these concerns.
The Bank and HM Treasury are committed to exploring how PIPs could offer tiered
access to users, with functionality based on the amount of identification a user is
willing or able to provide.
The Bank will conduct experiments to understand the benefits and trade-offs of both
well-established and emerging types of PETs, and how those technologies could be
applied to support privacy in a digital pound system.
As set out in the Technology Working Paper response, the Bank is also exploring
technologies that could potentially distribute the 'alias service' functionality across a
digital pound ecosystem, such that the alias service would not be part of Bankmanaged infrastructure.[10] With these technologies, the Bank is assessing whether it
is possible to design a privacy-preserving alias service which would not only prevent
the core ledger from accessing personal data, but also limit the sharing of personal
data between users and PIPs.
Payments in scope
What the Consultation Paper said
The Consultation Paper proposed that a digital pound initially focus on in-store,
online and person-to-person payments. The focus may broaden out in the future, as
the payments landscape evolves, for example to enable split, batch or micropayments.
It also noted that the Bank and HM Treasury intend to explore offline and cross-border
payments, and ruled out developing a digital pound that enables government or central
bank-initiated programmable money. However, the Consultation Paper set out that the
PIPs could explore enhanced functionality for users to set rules on their payments.
Page 44
Question asked in the Consultation Paper
6. Do you have comments on our proposal that in-store, online and personto-person payments should be highest priority payments in scope? Are any
other payments in scope which need further work?
Summary of respondents’ views
There was broad agreement that in-store, online and person-to-person (P2P) payments
should be a priority. Some supported a ‘start small, consumer-first’ approach with an initial
focus on P2P payments.
But many favoured considering additional use cases, in particular business-to-business (B2B),
and business-to-consumer (B2C). Consumer-to-business (C2B) was also suggested, eg
mortgage and utility payments. Some mentioned government-to-person (G2P) and person-togovernment (P2G) payments, eg to pay VAT directly to the authorities at the point of sale and
for tax returns.
A number of respondents, from academia, the payments software industry and NonGovernmental Organisations (NGOs), envisioned G2P use cases as including:
A small number of respondents noted that the use of a digital pound by the Government for
G2P payments could support a sense of trust and encourage its adoption.
Some recommended considering retailer-focused use cases, to alleviate merchants’ high
costs and reduce credit-card fraud.
There was broad agreement that in-store, online and person-to-person payments
should be a priority, but business-to-business and government-to-person payments
were also considered valuable payment options to explore. Cross-border payments,
as well as offline capability, were also mentioned as important use cases. There was a
call to explore and experiment with possible future use cases for the digital pound.
Government subsidies
Stimulus pay-outs
Pension payments
Relief payments during natural disasters, eg Covid-related disbursements
Support for Gift Aid, a scheme that enables charities to increase the value of donations
made by reclaiming tax paid on the gift
Page 45
Many respondents mentioned cross-border payments and remittances, as well as offline
capability, as important use cases. Civil society representatives felt offline payments were
needed. This could be for resilience, should the telecommunication networks go down, but
also because the UK, like most countries, does not enjoy 100% mobile or broadband
coverage on a 24/7 basis. A small number of respondents felt that failure to support offline
payments might make a digital pound less attractive compared to private digital currencies
and foreign CBDCs.
Technology firms and some civil society representatives pointed to the use of digital pounds in
micropayments, split payments, Web3 and the Metaverse, and the Internet of Things (IoT).[11]
The majority of respondents felt that more experiments were needed and suggested that
different participants be involved in the exploration of future use cases for a digital pound.
Some respondents wanted more clarity on the novel use cases a digital pound would support
compared to other forms of money.
Some respondents acknowledged the opportunities for innovation provided by this new
payment functionality. Technology firms were supportive of PIP-provided programmability, eg
PIPs offering the use of smart contracts (which automate payments if pre-determined
conditions are met). They suggested that the Bank set the perimeter for programmability
features to clarify what could and could not be done.
Some respondents from the banking industry stressed that programmability should not be
implemented on the Bank’s core ledger, but instead provided as a service by the private
sector. This was consistent with the proposal in the Consultation Paper that PIPs offer to
program payments subject to users’ consent, and the commitment that neither the Bank nor
the Government would program a digital pound.
Other respondents felt that this innovation should not come at the cost of users’ privacy. Some
civil society groups raised concerns that programmability could be a means for the
Government to restrict payments and impose controls on how digital pounds are spent. They
worried that future governments could program money or pressure PIPs into programming
money on their behalf. As set out in the Consultation Paper, a digital pound would not be
designed to enable government or central bank-initiated programmable money.
Respondents expressed a range of views on programmability depending on their
industry.
Page 46
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
As stated in the Consultation Paper, the design phase will explore offline settlement
capabilities further. Following the publication of Requests for Information, the Bank and
HM Treasury have set up Digital pound working groups to engage with experts,
including on offline payments. Their input will be considered alongside the feedback
from individuals and experts set out in this document.
The Bank and HM Treasury understand some respondents’ strong feelings about
programmability. The chapter on 'Users' rights, privacy, and protections’ explains that
legislation introduced by the Government for a digital pound would guarantee that the
Bank and the Government would not program users’ digital pounds.
As set out in the Technology Working Paper response, the Bank will continue to
engage with stakeholders to understand which innovative functionality, including for
programmable payments, PIPs and users might want, and to determine what
infrastructure would be needed to support those features. This will include further
development of the functionalities that the Bank experimented with in Project
Rosalind. The Bank will continue to examine which features of its technological
interface with the private sector are needed to enable the private sector to build and
host smart contracts. The Bank’s current position is that smart contracts would not be
hosted on the core ledger.
Holding limits and access
What the Consultation Paper said
The Consultation Paper proposed setting limits on holdings of digital pounds, at least
during the introductory period. These limits are intended to manage risks to financial
and monetary stability associated with outflows from bank deposits, at a level that
supports the usability of a digital pound. For individuals, it was judged that a limit of
between £10,000 and £20,000 would likely strike an appropriate balance. The
Consultation Paper also sought respondents’ views on a lower limit, such as £5,000.
Corporates would also be limited in their holdings of digital pounds, but the limit would
be significantly higher than for individuals, given corporates’ larger balance sheets.
Technology solutions could support relatively lower corporate limits, for example, if
Page 47
digital pound holdings above the level of the limit were automatically ‘swept’ into a
nominated bank account. The possibility was also raised of restricting access by type
of corporate, for example financial firms, to prevent wholesale use of a digital pound.
The Consultation Paper proposed that non-UK residents would be able to hold and use
digital pounds on the same basis as UK residents.
Questions asked in the Consultation Paper
7. What do you consider to be the appropriate level of limits on individuals’
holdings in transition? Do you agree with our proposed limits within the
£10,000–£20,000 range? Do you have views on the benefits and risks of a
lower limit, such as £5,000?
8. Considering our proposal for limits on individual holdings, what views do
you have on how corporates’ use of digital pounds should be managed in
transition? Should all corporates be able to hold digital pounds, or should
some corporates be restricted?
9. Do you have comments on our proposal that non-UK residents should have
access to the digital pound, on the same basis as UK residents?
Summary of respondents’ views
While feedback to the specific question was provided predominantly by the financial services
industry and academia, it is worth noting that some individual respondents suggested there
should be no limits on digital pound holdings as they were seen as restrictive and preventing
equitable access. They expressed concerns that they would not be able to earn or save more
than £20,000. Contrary to the proposal in the Consultation Paper, some of these respondents
misinterpreted the limit to be in relation to users’ ability to deposit their money in general,
rather than just applied to their digital pound holdings.
There was wide agreement among respondents from the financial services industry and
academia with the need to impose limits at least during the introductory period, to achieve a
balance between usability of a digital pound and mitigating financial stability risks from the
disintermediation of bank deposits.
Views on the appropriateness of limits on individuals’ digital pound holdings in the
transition phase varied, but on balance respondents were supportive.
Page 48
Several of these respondents raised the possibility of a phased, gradual approach to an
agreed holding limit, recommending to ‘start small’, with subsequent reviews, while some
associations and academics favoured further analysis.
There was a wide range of views on the appropriate level of limits for individuals. Most
responses focused on holding limits, but several respondents favoured the use of limits on
transactions, especially in times of stress.
The majority of banks favoured limits in the £3,000-£5,000 range, citing the risk of deposit
outflows in steady state and in stress (with references to the recent rapid withdrawal of
deposits from Silicon Valley Bank in the United States). Some also compared a digital pound
to cash, and the need to size the limit for everyday, low-value, payments. Some respondents
noted other central banks’ proposals, some of which envisaged a lower level than the
proposal in the Consultation Paper.
Banks were mainly concerned that the loss of deposit funding and greater reliance on
wholesale funding would lead to a fall in the supply of credit and/or a rise in lending costs for
households and businesses. A small number of respondents, particularly building societies,
mentioned they would be particularly affected by an outflow of deposits because their
legislative funding limits prevented a wholesale funding ratio above 50%.
By contrast, fintech payment providers, consumer representatives and several academic
respondents either agreed with the proposed £10,000-£20,000 limit or preferred no limits at
all, to support widespread adoption and usability. For example, a few respondents mentioned
the need to allow purchases of big-ticket items such as cars, real estate, holidays, or
weddings. Some recommended lifting limits in times of emergency or natural disaster, to
facilitate extraordinary disbursements to individuals in need. Others mentioned that lower
limits and reduced adoption would undermine the role of a digital pound in supporting the
convertibility of money across its different forms, on demand and without loss of value (the
‘uniformity’ or ‘singleness’ of money).
Some respondents noted the operational challenge of enforcing the holding limits, especially if
individuals held multiple digital pound wallets. Where solutions were proposed, the majority
supported reliance on the automated sweeping of excess holdings (above the limit) into bank
accounts, which would help to mitigate the need for relatively higher limits. That would contain
risks to financial stability while supporting usability.
Views on the appropriate level of limits on individuals’ digital pound holdings ranged
widely.
Page 49
Respondents emphasised the importance of corporates having access to a digital pound, to
promote and sustain widespread adoption, and several advocated access by all corporates.
The majority did not support restrictions by type of corporate. While some respondents
expressed concerns that a digital pound would be used by financial firms for wholesale
activity, they suggested that financial firms’ use of digital pounds be kept under consideration
to support retail-like payments, eg paying wages to employees. Some also pointed to the
combination of sweeping and scheme rules for corporate wallets to mitigate financial firms’
engagement in wholesale activity. A few others pointed to the financial stability risks of using a
digital pound in wholesale markets and thought wholesale use should be prohibited or subject
to regulatory oversight.
For limits on corporate holdings, there was agreement that these should be substantially
higher than for individuals, although several respondents felt it was difficult to assess the
appropriate level without greater clarity on corporates’ use cases for a digital pound. Some
respondents favoured no corporate limit at all.
There was a range of views on whether to vary limits by corporate type or size. A small
number of respondents pointed out that setting different limits may give some firms a
competitive advantage over others.
Some respondents thought that sole traders should be treated as individuals, with a very low
or zero limit on corporate accounts.
Most respondents agreed that non-UK residents should have access to a digital pound, but
several felt its rollout should initially focus on UK residents.
While most thought non-residents should access a digital pound on the same basis as UK
residents, a small number of respondents favoured a cautious approach and the setting of
lower limits on non-resident digital pound holdings. A small number argued for varying holding
limits depending on the jurisdiction.
Several use cases for non-resident access were identified: strengthening the usage of the
pound globally, supporting the role of the pound as a settlement asset for international trade,
facilitating cross-border payments and supporting tourism in the UK.
The majority of respondents favoured wide corporate access and did not support
restrictions by type of corporate. There was agreement that corporate holding limits
should be substantially higher than for individuals.
Most respondents thought non-residents should access a digital pound on the same
basis as UK residents.
Page 50
Many respondents stressed the need for a carefully designed legal and regulatory framework,
based on the application of equivalent standards and requirements to PIPs across the UK and
other jurisdictions. This would ensure a level playing field in the conduct of appropriate digital
identity, KYC, AML and CFT checks, sanctions controls, consumer protection and dispute
resolution.
Some respondents raised concerns about the macroeconomic implications of non-resident
access to a digital pound, mentioning the risk of sterling flight abroad, or, conversely, the
possibility that non-UK jurisdictions might put in place restrictions on digital pound holdings to
prevent the large-scale adoption of a digital pound by their citizens, and to preserve their
monetary and financial sovereignty.
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
In light of the feedback received and the absence of any materially new analysis, the
Bank and HM Treasury are minded to proceed at this stage with a proposed holding
limit in the range of £10,000 to £20,000, at least during the introductory period. As set
out above, respondents’ views on individual limits ranged widely, with three broad
groups emerging. Banks generally preferred a holding limit in the range of £3,000 to
£5,000 per individual to limit deposit outflows; non-banks and other fintechs either
preferred the highest limit or no limit at all to support a wider range of use cases; and a
third, smaller group, including some associations and academics, favoured further
analysis or starting with a low limit and increasing it over time.
The Bank will undertake further analysis to refine the range, informed by continued
engagement with the financial services industry. In particular, the Bank will explore
further the impact of limits on deposit disintermediation in a period of banking stress,
the distributional impact of limits across different types of deposit-taking institutions, the
impact of limits on the viability of PIP business models, risks to usability from lower
limits, and the technological and functional considerations regarding the feasibility of
sweeping. This means the Bank and HM Treasury are open to revisiting the bounds of
the £10,000 to £20,000 range if new information came to light.
During the design phase, the Bank will also further explore what degree of access and
level of holding limits would be most appropriate for corporates. That work will be in
part informed by the input gleaned from the expert working groups on retailer needs,
set up last year by the Bank and HM Treasury following a Request for Information.
Page 51
In light of respondents’ feedback, the Bank and HM Treasury are minded to support
non-UK residents’ access to a digital pound on the same basis as UK residents. Any
non-resident access regime will be in accordance with the G7’s 2021 pledge to design
any future CBDCs in such a way that would avoid the risk of currency substitution in
other countries.
Recognising the need for greater clarity on the regulatory regime for non-UK privatesector wallet providers, the Bank and HM Treasury will ensure that UK standards of
resilience, consumer protection, AML, KYC and any other legal requirements are
upheld.
Further work will be undertaken on whether, and to what extent, non-resident
corporates might have access to a digital pound.
Further public consultation would precede the introduction of primary legislation by the
Government. As part of this consultation, the Bank and HM Treasury would seek public
feedback on limits for both individuals’ and corporates’ holdings of digital pounds.
Financial inclusion and Public Sector Equality Duty
What the Consultation Paper said
Tackling financial exclusion, particularly as financial services become more digital, is a
priority for the Government. This means seeking to ensure that people can access
useful, affordable financial products and services whatever their income or background
and at all stages in their financial lives. The Bank and HM Treasury are considering
how the design of a digital pound could support financial inclusion and the needs of
vulnerable people, for example by providing greater optionality and functionality for
those with specific vulnerabilities and for some financially excluded groups.
In designing a digital pound, the Bank and HM Treasury will also have due regard to
the equality considerations set out in the Public Sector Equality Duty (PSED).
Page 52
Questions asked in the Consultation Paper
11. Which design choices should we consider in order to support financial
inclusion?
12. The Bank and HM Treasury will have due regard to the public sector
equality duty, including considering the impact of proposals for the design of
the digital pound on those who share protected characteristics, as provided
by the Equality Act 2010. Please indicate if you believe any of the proposals in
this Consultation Paper are likely to impact persons who share such protected
characteristics and, if so, please explain which groups of persons, what the
impact on such groups might be and if you have any views on how impact
could be mitigated.
Summary of respondents’ views
Several respondents thought that a digital pound had the potential to improve financial
inclusion in the UK. A few favoured making financial inclusion a primary objective. However, it
was recognised that digital literacy would be a key obstacle to overcome and, as such, further
work would be needed to alleviate digital exclusion. A few respondents recommended
educational campaigns run by the Government and PIPs, including to reassure people that
both cash and digital pounds would continue to be used.
In their general feedback, individual respondents reported feeling strongly that maintaining
access to cash would be critical for financial inclusion, particularly for the vulnerable and the
elderly.
Offline capability was seen by many respondents as an inclusive innovation, given the link
between financial exclusion and digital exclusion. Offline settlement was seen as an
alternative payment method for use in remote areas without good connectivity, for consumers
with no means to afford smartphones or mobile data, or for use by consumers with no digital
skills (in the form of some sort of smart card). It was also seen as a fallback option in the
event of natural disasters. Some respondents also mentioned the importance of being able to
make digital pound payments with a physical card.
Some respondents thought a digital pound could improve financial inclusion,
although improving digital literacy and coverage was seen as key to underpin this.
Respondents’ proposed design choices to support financial inclusion ranged from
offline availability, tiered access and in-person assistance to community-supported or
public provision. Inclusive use cases were also mentioned.
Respondents mentioned a range of design features that could support financial
inclusion.
Page 53
Tiered access to digital pound wallets was mentioned by many respondents (see ‘Privacy and
data protection’ above).
In-person or remote assistance for opening and operating digital pound wallets, as well as
converting digital pounds into cash, was raised as necessary for the successful take-up by
some groups, such as the elderly.
Some respondents saw a role for third-sector organisations, for example community-based
not-for-profit wallet providers, to support access to digital pound services for disadvantaged
users. However, they noted that those organisations would need financial support for their
business model to be viable.
A few respondents favoured a public digital pound wallet that is free of charge or low cost and
offers core payment functionalities. Those respondents thought that this could foster greater
competition by establishing a benchmark, prompting PIPs to work harder to attract digital
pound users.
Use cases seen as supportive of financial inclusion were also mentioned: using digital pounds
to send low-cost remittances overseas, supporting the digitisation of small businesses that
mostly rely on cash, and enabling at-scale G2P payments in times of crisis or disaster.
While respondents did not raise objections to the proposed design of a digital pound on
equality grounds, some concerns were expressed about potential impacts on individuals with
protected characteristics. The Bank and the Government will continue to take this into account
as part of the PSED.
Among persons with protected characteristics, respondents identified two vulnerable groups in
particular: the elderly and those with disabilities. Age was cited as the most common
characteristic, with respondents typically concerned that a digital pound may exacerbate the
financial exclusion of the elderly. Disabilities was mentioned by a few respondents, largely
from organisations rather than individuals.
Respondents considered that low digital literacy among both the elderly and the disabled
would cause difficulties with adapting to a new technology, difficulties understanding the
differences between the digital pound and existing services, and poor understanding of the
privacy features of the digital pound. For example, the low uptake of some existing financial
Respondents did not raise objections to the proposed design of a digital pound on
equality grounds. Some expressed concerns about how the design and rollout of a
digital pound might affect persons with protected, as well as non-protected,
characteristics.
Page 54
technology (eg online and mobile banking) among the elderly could mean that this group
would be less likely to see a high uptake of a new financial technology such as the digital
pound.
Poor accessibility was cited as an important concern for people with disabilities, as
respondents thought that they may find it more difficult to integrate a new financial technology
into their daily lives, especially if the interface were smartphone-based.
Regarding non-protected characteristics, some respondents expressed concerns about the
socio-economic and geographical impacts of a digital pound, citing a widening of the gap
between those who are unbanked or financially excluded and the rest of society, and the
relative exclusion of individuals living in areas of low broadband and mobile data connectivity.
Recommendations to mitigate any negative impact from a digital pound included ensuring that
it would be used alongside cash and bank deposits and be made as accessible as possible.
Supporting financial inclusion and digital education were also seen as important.
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
Tackling financial and digital exclusion remains a priority for the Government. The Bank
and HM Treasury want any digital pound to support financial inclusion across the UK.
Financial inclusion is high in the UK, and the Government has taken several steps to
ensure fair and affordable access to vital financial products and services in the
payments and banking sectors, such as the provision of basic bank accounts. The
Government works closely with regulators, industry, and the third sector to understand
and respond to new developments.
The Bank and HM Treasury are considering how the design of a digital pound could
present opportunities to enhance financial and digital inclusion, drawing on
respondents’ suggestions. A range of actions is being explored:
The Bank will conduct technology experiments on peer-to-peer and peer-tobusiness payments, including exploring how those in areas of low connectivity or
with limited digital access would still be able to use a digital pound.
Inclusion will be an important aspect of the design of a digital pound and will form
part of experimentation during the design phase, such as through the exploration of
physical card payments.
The Bank and HM Treasury have set up a working group to consider specifically the
question of offline payments, which could be an important functionality to allow
users to make payments in areas of low connectivity.[12]
Page 55
The decision to introduce a digital pound would only be taken if the Bank and HM
Treasury were adequately assured that it could be designed and launched in an
equitable and accessible way. It is clear that there is considerable overlap between
financial inclusion, digital inclusion, and access to cash, and the Bank and HM
Treasury are considering all these issues together.
Proposed design
What the Consultation Paper said
The Consultation Paper consulted on the proposed design for a digital pound, given
the Bank and HM Treasury's primary motivations. These are the availability of central
bank money as an anchor for confidence in and safety of money, and promoting
competition, innovation, choice, and efficiency in payments.
The proposed design features for a digital pound are summarised in Diagram 9.
Question asked in the Consultation Paper
10. Given our primary motivations, does our proposed design for the digital
pound meet its objectives?
Summary of respondents’ views
Some respondents suggested taking a ‘start small’, iterative approach through trialling and
testing specific use cases, and modelling economic simulations, during the design phase.
Prior to any decision to introduce a digital pound, an equalities impact assessment
would be conducted and published to set out the impacts that a digital pound would
have on protected groups.
Overall, respondents from a broad range of industries showed support for the
proposed design choices, given the Bank and HM Treasury’s objectives.
Respondents called for open debate and active engagement with stakeholders,
including consumer awareness and education campaigns, during the design phase of
a digital pound.
Page 56
Others offered their expertise and experience to add value to the design of a digital pound,
and a small number of respondents suggested additional design features (eg visibility of the
core ledger by end-users) or design principles (eg a requirement to balance the needs of
consumers and financial services and payments providers) for the platform model.
Others thought that a focus on making a digital pound interoperable with existing forms of
money may inhibit efforts to make the digital pound platform extensible (easy to adapt to
evolving technology or use cases), pointing to the need for a more forward-looking approach.
Several respondents called for the conduct of a Cost-Benefit Analysis of the introduction of a
digital pound. Some felt that the Bank and HM Treasury should justify their decision if they
decided not to proceed with issuing a digital pound.
Respondents called for an open debate, and for the Bank and HM Treasury to engage actively
with stakeholders during the design phase. Some mentioned conducting consumer
awareness and education campaigns to engage the public.
The Consultation Paper explained that a digital pound would not be remunerated. Were the
approach to remuneration to change after a digital pound was introduced, that would follow
public consultation and the Bank would provide adequate lead time, so that holders of digital
pounds were able to exit from, or enter, the system in an orderly manner, if they wished to.
Most respondents who commented on this topic mainly came from the banking and payments
industries and supported the position not to remunerate a digital pound.
However, a small group of respondents raised a number of concerns. Several noted that nonremuneration would limit PIPs' revenues because they would not receive interest payments
on the assets matching their digital pound liabilities. That could constrain digital pound
provision by making it less commercially viable. A small number of respondents noted that not
paying interest might limit user adoption of a digital pound. This could limit its role as an
anchor for the monetary system. Others thought that non-remuneration would not necessarily
dampen bank deposit outflows to digital pounds in times of stress.
Many individual respondents were concerned about the possibility of an expiry date on their
digital pound holdings, the imposition of a negative interest rate on their digital pounds, or,
similarly, the imposition by the PIPs of a usage fee as PIPs sought to generate revenue.
A few academics and industry bodies favoured reviewing this position at a later stage, in light
of the role an interest-bearing digital pound could play in supporting PIPs' revenues and
enhancing the Bank's and the Government's policy tools.
Several respondents shared their views on the position not to remunerate a digital
pound.
Page 57
The Bank and HM Treasury’s response
In light of the feedback received, the Bank and HM Treasury think that the design of a
digital pound proposed in the Consultation Paper remains appropriate to deliver the
Bank and HM Treasury's public policy objectives.
Developing a detailed design for a digital pound will be the focus of efforts in the
design phase of the project. To that end, the Bank and HM Treasury have agreed a set
of design principles that will guide this work. These are detailed in the ‘Next steps’
chapter.
Transparency around the work and engagement with a diverse group of stakeholders
will be more important than ever in the design phase. The Bank and HM Treasury will
build upon the approach to date, including through the CBDC Engagement and
Technology Forums. As explained in the ‘Next steps’ chapter, the CBDC Academic
Advisory Group (AAG), as well as expert working groups, have been set up to
explore particular topics in detail. The Bank and HM Treasury will also continue
engagement with civil society, academics, technologists, and stakeholders across the
UK as well as internationally. This programme of engagement will continue to inform
the national conversation on the future of money as part of the next steps in the digital
pound project.
Page 58
Diagram 9: Next steps following the design proposals
Page 59
5: Next steps
The Bank and HM Treasury have progressed to the design phase of work on a digital pound
and expect to decide whether to proceed to the build phase around the middle of the decade.
As announced in the Consultation Paper, in light of the likely need for a digital pound in the
future, work has now moved to the design phase (Diagram 10). The priority of the design
phase is to develop further, in both policy and technology terms, the in-depth design of such a
digital pound.
Work during the design phase will focus on developing in detail the digital pound proposition,
with a particular focus on the operational, functional and technology model for a digital pound.
That will involve determining the technological feasibility and investment required to build and
operate the digital pound infrastructure. In turn, that will support an overall assessment of the
costs and benefits of building and running the digital pound architecture. This work will equip
the Bank and HM Treasury with the knowledge and capability to build a digital pound and
shorten the development lead times, were a decision taken to introduce one in the future. It
will also provide the basis for the future decision on whether to move to a build phase and
introduce a digital pound. If a decision was taken to move to the build phase, a prototype
digital pound would be developed, first in a simulated environment and then in live pilot tests.
The Government has committed to introducing primary legislation in advance of launching a
digital pound, which would be preceded by further public consultation.
Technologies for a digital pound are also relevant to new forms of digital money issued by the
private sector, such as stablecoins, as well as finding possible applications in financial market
infrastructures. It is likely that digital currency technologies will be significant in shaping the
future of both retail and wholesale finance.
If a decision is taken not to proceed to build a digital pound, the Bank and HM Treasury’s
partnership with the private sector for experiments and proofs of concept in the design phase
will still be beneficial. First, it will promote private innovation in digital currency technologies.
Second, it will encourage innovative digital money business models. Third, it will support
knowledge-sharing across the UK fintech and technology sectors. The design work will also
benefit the Bank and HM Treasury by improving the understanding of the economic benefits
The design phase will present enduring benefits for the digital economy in the UK,
particularly the fintech and technology sectors, even if a decision is taken not to build
a digital pound.
Page 60
and the risks to financial stability of technologies supporting new forms of private digital
money. So even if a digital pound is not built, the design phase will bring benefits to the digital
money ecosystem and help to prepare the UK for the future of money and finance.
It is only practicable to focus – in depth – on one core model for a digital pound in the design
phase explorations. Feedback to the consultation suggests that the model for a digital pound
set out in the Consultation Paper is appropriate. It will therefore be the focus of work in
coming years.
The wider feedback to the consultation has significantly helped to guide priorities. The Bank
and HM Treasury appreciate the strength of feeling among individuals on a range of issues.
As part of the design phase, the following steps will be taken forward:
Diagram 10: Roadmap for the digital pound project
Feedback received in the consultation process has further informed and shaped
priorities in the design phase.
Page 61
The Bank and HM Treasury envisage four workstreams within the design phase (Diagram 11).
The four workstreams of the design phase complement and reinforce one another. For
example, experiments and proofs of concept will be relevant in the national conversation on
the future of money by showing the potential use cases that a digital pound might generate.
Both will also inform the design choices ultimately proposed in the blueprint.
The assessment of whether to proceed to the build phase will be based on the specific design
of a digital pound detailed in the blueprint, as well as being informed by the national
conversation on the future of money. The build phase would then execute the design of a
digital pound as specified in the blueprint.
Before any launch of a digital pound, the Government has committed to introducing primary
legislation.
Privacy would be a core design feature of a digital pound, and an utmost priority, therefore:
The Bank and the Government would not access users’ personal data through the
Bank’s core infrastructure – and legislation introduced by the Government for a digital
pound would guarantee users’ privacy.
The Bank commits to exploring technological options that would prevent the Bank from
accessing any personal data through the Bank’s core infrastructure.
The Bank and the Government would not program a digital pound – and legislation
introduced by the Government for a digital pound would guarantee this.
Throughout the design phase, there is a commitment to engaging with Parliament and
reporting periodically on progress.
The design phase has four key workstreams, which are interrelated.
Experimentation and proofs of concept: focused experiments in collaboration with
innovative private-sector firms. These will establish the technological feasibility of different
design choices.
Blueprint: a comprehensive description of the digital pound architecture, should a decision
be taken to proceed to build it.
National conversation: a programme of engagement by the Bank and HM Treasury with
the public, businesses and wider stakeholders to ensure that work on a digital pound takes
account of all views. This will also build public understanding of a digital pound and user
needs.
Assessment: a framework to evaluate the costs and benefits of a digital pound, to inform
the decision on whether to proceed to the build phase.
Page 62
Experiments and proofs of concept
The Bank will continue to partner with innovative private firms in the design phase to conduct
experiments and proofs of concept. This work will allow the Bank to understand better the
state-of-the-art for technologies and to what extent they can meet digital pound design
requirements. The Bank has already completed successful experiments in relation to
Application Programming Interface (API), point of sale, digital wallet applications and offline
payments.[13]
To ensure a fair and transparent approach to partnerships with the private sector, experiments
and proofs of concept will follow appropriate governance, in line with procurement law and the
Bank’s procurement policy.
Blueprint and design principles
The design phase will set out a clear proposition for a digital pound. That will include setting
out the product and technology proposition for a digital pound that would be proposed for the
build phase.
The Consultation Paper and Technology Working Paper set out objectives for a digital
pound. Taking on board the feedback received on both papers, the Bank and HM Treasury
have developed a set of design principles (Table A). These will guide work in the design phase
by providing a framework to develop the blueprint for the digital pound proposition, alongside
continued engagement with stakeholders.
Diagram 11: Workstreams of the design phase
Page 63
Adhering to these design principles will support the Bank’s core purposes of monetary and
financial stability, and HM Treasury’s objectives of an inclusive and innovative digital
payments ecosystem, while delivering a digital pound platform that is secure, private,
adaptable, energy efficient, and interoperable with other payment rails.
Page 64
Table A: Design principles for a digital pound
Principle Summary
Reliable and secure A digital pound should always be available so users can trust they can make
payments at all times
User privacy and
control
No access to personal data by the Bank and the Government through the Bank’s
core infrastructure
Enable privacy-preserving payment options
Money is not programmed by the Bank or the Government
Support innovation Provide public infrastructure and functionality at good value-for-money to support
innovative services
Lower barriers to entry to promote competition in payments
Interoperable Users would be able to exchange digital pounds conveniently with other forms of
money
Users of a digital pound would be able to pay non-users conveniently, and vice
versa
Adaptable and
scalable
Support our prioritised payment and non-payment use cases
Built with future trends in mind
Adaptable to support use cases we cannot currently anticipate
Inclusive and
attractive
Attractive to individuals and businesses
Designed to be widely accepted
Able to sustain a range of private-sector business models in the ecosystem
Energy efficient Without compromising user choice, a digital pound would support the
Government’s net-zero plans
A digital pound would be at least as energy efficient as existing payments
infrastructures
Page 65
In addition to the CBDC Engagement Forum (with members from industry and civil society)
and the CBDC Technology Forum (with technical specialists) set up in 2021, last year, the
Bank and HM Treasury set up the CBDC Academic Advisory Group (AAG) to ensure that
cutting-edge research from a range of academic disciplines is given due consideration.
The Bank and HM Treasury also set up working groups following the publication of Requests
for Information, to explore particular topics in detail. There will also be a structured
programme of market research that will provide evidence to inform design choices in
accordance with the design principles.
Later this year, the Bank and HM Treasury intend to explain in more detail the approach to the
design phase, including plans for experimentation and proofs of concept, the considerations
the blueprint will seek to address and the methods to be used to gather evidence to support
the development of that blueprint.
Additionally, the Bank and HM Treasury intend to publish periodically discussions on material
considerations related to the design of, or technology for, a potential digital pound. This is in
order to enable stakeholders to understand emerging thinking, and to seek expert input,
feedback and challenge at an early stage. Potential publications are likely to include:
These publications will ensure expert input is accounted for in the eventual digital pound
blueprint. They will not, however, represent final decisions on the design of a digital pound.
National conversation on the future of money
The journey towards issuing any digital pound must involve a conversation about the future of
money. Technology evolves rapidly, and exciting payments innovations in the private sector
are changing money and the way it is used. Last year, in his Mansion House speech, the
Chancellor highlighted this as he launched the independent Future of Payments Review
Delivering the blueprint will require specialist input from a range of stakeholders,
including technical experts. As such, the Bank and HM Treasury have increased their
external engagement, and will ensure stakeholders are informed and involved
throughout the design phase.
Project reports: these would set out findings of the Bank’s experiments and proofs of
concept.
Design notes: these would explain the Bank and HM Treasury’s emerging thinking on
digital pound technology and policy topics.
Forum minutes: these include minutes of, and materials discussed at, meetings of the
stakeholder engagement groups.
Page 66
2023 led by Joe Garner to help deliver the next generation of world-class retail payments in
the UK. The exploration of a digital pound is just one part of our wider work on innovation to
ensure the UK remains at the forefront of payments technology.
Public trust is essential to this process. The Bank and HM Treasury will embark on a
programme of engagement with the public and businesses during the design phase to raise
awareness of this shared work, and, more importantly, ensure that all voices are listened to,
including understanding the concerns, and perceived risks and opportunities of new forms of
digital money. The feedback obtained will help to shape the design of a digital pound and
inform the decision of whether to introduce it.
Assessment
As set out above, the design phase will conclude with a decision on whether to proceed to the
build phase of the digital pound project. The build phase would involve constructing the core
digital pound technology. As such, it would represent a significant infrastructure project.
That decision must therefore be informed by an assessment of the costs and benefits that
building and running a digital pound would entail. The Bank and HM Treasury will assess not
only the financial costs of developing and maintaining a digital pound, but also any wider
economic and societal opportunities and risks. The assessment will be informed by as strong
a base of evidence as can be captured. It will be forward-looking, recognising that a digital
pound could only be introduced into a future payments landscape, rather than the status quo.
It will therefore be essential to consider how the UK economy and financial system might
evolve in the absence of a digital pound.
Page 67
Conclusion
The decision of whether to build a digital pound will be made around the middle of the decade
at the earliest, as the design phase draws to a close. That decision will draw on extensive
engagement with stakeholders across all of society throughout the design phase, as part of
the development of the digital pound's blueprint, the national conversation on the future of
money and Parliamentary scrutiny of the Bank and HM Treasury’s design work.
Further work over the coming years during the design phase will explore the design and
feasibility of a digital pound. This preparatory work, which is being undertaken in collaboration
with the private sector, is critical for the Bank and HM Treasury to understand and prepare for
future changes in the payments landscape, and will bring benefits regardless of the decision
to build a digital pound. This work will help to ensure the UK remains competitively placed to
harness the benefits of future innovation in payments. It will foster an environment supportive
of future payment methods that are even more accessible and efficient than the current
payments landscape.
The Government has committed to introducing primary legislation before launching a digital
pound. Commitments to prevent the Government and the Bank from accessing personal data
through the Bank’s core infrastructure, and not to pursue government or central bank-initiated
programmable digital pounds, would be enshrined in that primary legislation. There would be
further public consultation on a digital pound prior to the introduction of primary legislation by
the Government.
A digital pound would enhance user choice by complementing, not replacing, cash, providing
users with an additional means of making payments in digital form. A digital pound would
enhance user convenience by providing a platform that can support the private sector in
offering innovative payments functionalities in an increasingly digitalised world, including
those that cannot be predicted today.
Page 68
1. UK Finance (2023) – UK Payment Markets Summary.
2. See for example the Libra White Paper and related Diem technical papers.
3. Update on plans for the regulation of fiat-backed stablecoins (October 2023).
4. The original online questionnaire had omitted one consultation question, so a second online questionnaire was
subsequently set up to capture responses to this. The figures discussed therefore combine responses to the two online
questionnaires.
5. For applications of NLP techniques, see Machine learning the news for better macroeconomic forecasting – Bank
Underground (2020) and Open letters: Laying bare linguistic patterns in PRA messages using machine learning –
Bank Underground (2018).
6. The UK’s AML and CFT Regimes include the Money Laundering, Terrorist Financing and Transfer of Funds
(Information on the Payer) Regulations 2017, and the Funds Transfer Regulation 2015.
7. The Trust Framework creates a set of rules and standards to facilitate common recognition and interoperability of
certified digital identities. This allows an individual to bind personal information to their digital identity and share this
information as needed. The system allows for information to be established with varying levels of confidence. These
levels of confidence are stipulated by a combination of the number of pieces of identity evidence, the strength and validity
of the evidence, their activity history, and identity fraud.
8. Free access to cash on high streets where there is a cluster of five or more retailers, and that do not have access to a
free-to-use ATM or a Post Office counter within one kilometre (LINK).
9. The review also contains further recommendations designed to improve the consumer experience of digital payments,
exploit the benefits of Open Banking and improve regulatory alignment.
10. An alias service manages the range of different identifiers (eg phone number, a primary account number (PAN), account
number and sort code) that can be used to route transactions between users. Aliases could be used to allow wallets to be
compatible and interoperable with other payment infrastructure eg a long ‘card number’ for payments at the point-of-sale
or a sort code and account number for account-to-account payments. See the Bank’s Technology Working Paper and
the Technology Working Paper response.
11. Web3 is a broad term that refers to the next wave of digitisation of social and economic interaction. Technologies such as
Artificial Intelligence and Distributed Ledger Technology could bring new economic activity in three-dimensional (3D)
immersive and collaborative digital worlds like the Metaverse, where users can build virtual objects and interact virtually.
12. An open call for input was published to ensure this working group is represented by a diverse group of individuals and
organisations. See Digital pound working groups.
13. Experiments on API were carried out over the past



Central bank digital currency: A systematic literature review using 
text mining approach 
Yen Hai Hoang a
, Vu Minh Ngo a
, Ngoc Bich Vu b,* 
a University of Economics Ho Chi Minh City, School of Banking, 59C Nguyen Dinh Chieu Street, District 3, Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam b Ho Chi Minh City Open University, School of Advanced Study, 97 Vo Van Tan Street, District 3, Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam 
ARTICLE INFO 
Keywords: 
Central bank digital currency 
CBDC 
Literature review 
Text mining 
Frequency analysis 
Topic modeling 
Blockchain 
ABSTRACT 
Central bank digital currency (CBDC) is seen as a possible next step in the evolution of money, 
offering a more stable unit of account, a more efficient medium of exchange, and a safer way to 
store value. However, since it began to get significant attention from academics and practitioners 
a few years ago, many concerns about how a central bank may build an efficient CBDC and how it 
would impact a country’s current financial system still remain unanswered satisfactorily. Based 
on the combination of text mining and systematic review methods, this work presents a thorough 
literature assessment of 191 academic papers on CBDC in order to identify major research issues 
and knowledge gaps that may be addressed in the future. We find seven primary research themes 
linked to CBDC including (1) Central bank, (2) CBDC and other digital currency, (3) CBDC and 
money markets, (4) CBDC and monetary policy, (5) CBDC design and technologies, (6) CBDC and 
payment system, and (7) CBDC and financial stability and regulatory. The finding helps provide 
both overall and in-depth views of the current state of research in digital fiat currency topics, as 
well as drawing some important implications and suggestions on directions for the future 
research. 
1. Introduction 
Undoubtedly, inspired by recent advances in technology-driven payment systems such as mobile payment systems, cryptocurrencies, and block-chain technologies, central banks worldwide recently explored the possibility of issuing digital forms of fiat 
money called central bank digital currencies (CBDC). A central bank’s key tasks are to issue and manage the quantity of money, to 
operate as a clearinghouse for the settlement of payments transactions, and to act as a lender of last resort. However, it might be 
claimed that contemporary central banks have failed to prevent macroeconomic crises and, in fact, may have worsened poor outcomes 
by promoting excessive risk-taking and moral hazard via unorthodox monetary instruments like quantitative easing and negative 
interest rates. A thoughtfully designed CBDC can be a new means for central banks to satisfy numerous policy objectives, improve 
economic efficiency and inclusivity, and serve as a platform for economic innovation (Choi et al., 2021). 
CBDC is expected to offer a more stable unit of account, a more efficient medium of exchange, and a more secure store of value 
(Murray, 2019), and it is seen as a possible next step in the development of money (Kiff et al., 2020; Wang et al., 2022). Numerous 
academicians are interested in its application to the local economy (Erlando et al., 2020) or an open economy (Minesso et al., 2022) 
supply-side monetary issues (Kirkby, 2018), boosting financial inclusion (Allen, Gu, and Jagtiani, 2022; Cullen, 2021), or facilitating 
* Corresponding author. 
E-mail addresses: yenhh@ueh.edu.vn (Y.H. Hoang), vunm@ueh.edu.vn (V.M. Ngo), ngoc.vb@ou.edu.vn (N. Bich Vu). 
Contents lists available at ScienceDirect 
Research in International Business and Finance 
journal homepage: www.elsevier.com/locate/ribaf 
https://doi.org/10.1016/j.ribaf.2023.101889 
Received 30 May 2022; Received in revised form 7 January 2023; Accepted 25 January 2023 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
2
cross-border payments (Allen et al., 2020; Kochergin, 2021). Some investigate whether the implementation of CBDC might increase 
the efficacy of fiat currency function by facilitating the direct transfer of central bank money to families and businesses (Arner et al., 
2020; Mantym ¨ aki ¨ et al., 2020). Arner et al. (2020) propose that replacing cash with a CBDC that resembles cash may reduce the cost of 
maintaining the physical currency supply and safeguard it against counterfeiting. Thus, it is considered that the social value of CBDC 
lies in its capacity to transfer some of the anonymity of currency into the digital sphere or perhaps combine the characteristics of cash 
and deposits (Adams et al., 2021; Pocher and Veneris, 2021). 
Could a digital money system, especially the central bank digital currency (CBDC), be a viable replacement or complement for a 
central bank’s conventional money issuance and circulation? This is one of the key research questions that are being extensively 
explored by the central banks and academicians worldwide. In order to have a concrete foundation for a satisfactory answer to this 
question, it is crucial to have a comprehensive understanding about this topic. Despite the fact that the number of CBDC’s studies have 
grown significantly since 2020, the knowledge on this emerging topic is still in high demand due to more and more countries are 
exploring CBDC and considering its use. There has been several studies providing solid literature review on this new field, however, our 
study is the first one that employs an advanced method, i.e text-mining, to conduct a systematic review on a large database that can 
outperform similar existing studies. 
Specifically, we attempt to address the above question by systematically reviewing the literature on the topic related to CBDC using 
the text mining approach. Using 191 abstracts of journals and conference articles on the Scopus database related to CBDC topics 
collected until Feb 2022, we attempt to identify the most common CBDC themes explored among academicians using frequency 
analysis of terms occurrences and topic modeling. We found that the topics involving CBDC has significantly changed over time since 
2020. In addition, using network analysis and diagrams, we defined the relationships between terms and clusters of topics for further 
analysis. In general, from the top most occurred terms in 191 abstracts, seven most common themes are discovered and in-depth 
discussed in this study including (1) Central bank, (2) CBDC and other digital currency, (3) CBDC and money markets, (4) CBDC 
and monetary policy, (5) CBDC design and technologies, (6) CBDC and payment system, and (7) CBDC and financial stability and 
regulatory. From the systematic reviews, we also suggest a number of knowledge gaps and implications that could guide future 
research directions on the CBDC topic. 
The remaining sections of this study are structured as follows. Section two presents the research methods employed or the systematic review. In section three, we provide the result of the key outcomes of text mining, network analysis, and an in-depth review of 
the main themes in CBDC topics. Finally, we conclude the paper in section four, following by our discussion and suggested 
implications. 
2. Methodology 
Text-based information retrieval has been becoming a key aspect of more and more study fields in the analytics domain during the 
last decade (Kushwaha et al., 2021). The fast and consistent rise of text-based content such as discourse on social media along with the 
development and expansion of the Internet, has necessitated the creation of the text mining frameworks that can be used to a variety of 
management domains. Numerous approaches have been developed to construct, query, and analyze various big data in terms of text. 
These include descriptive analytics, such as reporting, dash-boarding, visualizations, and discovery analytics, which capture early 
signals via text summarizations and feature extraction (Hashimoto et al., 2016) from discourses (i.e. sentiment, topics), as well as 
predictive analytics (Nassirtoussi et al., 2014), which is primarily driven by a variety of econometric models to complex machine 
learning algorithms (Yau et al., 2014; Valdez et al., 2018). 
The text-mining approach has been becoming one of the popular approaches for systematic review in different academic disciplines 
given their advantages compared to traditional methods (Hao et al., 2018; Algå ¨ et al., 2020; Karami et al., 2020). There are a number of 
studies that have explored the application of text mining for systematic literature review. For example, Zunic et al. (2020) employed 
text mining to analyse the sentiment of systematic reviews in the field of health sciences. Similarly, Valdez et al. (2018) discussed and 
suggested text mining algorithms to identify relationships between key concepts in systematic reviews related to the field of social 
science. 
For systematic review, it is crucial to minimize possible bias when identifying all relevant research themes. This requires reviewers 
to meticulously and methodically scan papers for relevant research findings, which may be exceedingly resource-intensive and timeconsuming (O’Mara-Eves et al., 2015). Thus, text mining is an invaluable tool for systematic literature review, as it can help to quickly 
and efficiently identify relevant papers from large datasets (Algå ¨ et al., 2020). Text mining can also be used to extract key concepts 
from the literature and to identify relationships between them. This can help to identify trends and patterns in the literature, and can 
provide a more comprehensive understanding of the research topic. Furthermore, text mining can be used to analyse the sentiment of 
the literature, allowing researchers to better understand the opinions of authors on the topic. 
This section describes the steps of our research framework: data collection, frequency analysis, topic modeling, and topic analysis 
using network diagrams. 
2.1. Data collection 
To get a better understanding of CBDC topics, we may utilize the primary contents of journal and conference papers to identify 
trends, key topics, and practical concepts. The abstract of an article includes principle information that summarizes the article’s 
content. Thus, in this paper, relevant abstracts of academic publications are used as inputs for text mining techniques. 
Firstly, we have restricted our analysis only to Scopus databases for the current study and use the API provided by Elsevier to extract 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
3
data from the database (see https://github.com/ElsevierDev/elsapy). We determined the most relevant keyword as “central bank 
digital currency” and used it as input for the API search using python code. As a result, we found about 350 relevant publications from 
journals and conferences published from 1997 to February 2022. Next, using another round of processing, we extracted abstracts from 
these publications from online publishing websites. 
2.2. Inclusion and exclusion criteria 
Establishing the inclusion and exclusion criteria is critical for ensuring that the data included in the systematic literature review are 
relevant. First, we manually checked the raw data to identify any abstracts that were not entirely downloaded. This initial phase 
eliminated ten papers without an abstract for text mining. Second, non-English-language publications were omitted from the current 
investigation. Given that text is the most important input for analysis, translation from other languages to English might affect the 
precision of text-mining. This phase ensures that the findings of text mining for topic modeling and network analysis are similar and 
more accurate. This second round eliminated seventeen publications. 
This analysis considered only scholarly articles that gave direct insight into CBDC-related topics. Therefore, a second round of 
abstract reading is necessary to ensure that each abstract directly relates to CBDC. In the end, we remove more than 131 papers whose 
abstracts do not meet this requirement. Cross-check was also used to ensure that at least two researchers examined each abstract prior 
to its exclusion from the sample. Therefore, abstracts that solely cover digital currency, cryptocurrencies, or overly broad information 
Fig. 1. Wordcloud of the most frequent terms in the CBDC abstract. 
Fig. 2. number of CBDC publications over time. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
4
Fig. 3. Topic modeling using LDA algorithm for papers’ abstracts over time. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
5
on digital transformation trends or other irrelevant issues unrelated to Central banks and digital currency are disqualified. After 
applying these exclusion criteria to around 350 papers, text mining algorithms were used to the remaining 191 abstracts. 
2.3. Frequency analysis 
Abstracts are unstructured textual material that must be decoded. They are published in a variety of fields. Text mining approaches 
enable exploratory research for the purpose of identifying semantic trends (Das et al., 2027). To understand the overall picture, we 
examined the frequency of the top thirty and one hundred most often used terms using a bar chart and a word cloud, respectively. A 
word cloud visualizes the frequency of terms in a corpus by varying the size of the words – with a bigger size indicating a higher 
frequency (Fig. 1). 
From the word-cloud analysis, the most frequent terms in papers’ abstracts such as money, monetary policy, payment, technology, 
blockchain, model, design, account, cash, develop, implement, country, etc. suggest some of the most prevalent topic discussed about 
CBDC. These topics are also confirmed using the frequency analysis of bigrams (two-words term) over time in papers’ abstract in 
Appendix 1. Some of the most frequent topics mentioned related to CBDC are digital money, monetary policy, private money, 
distributed ledger, European central bank or electronic payment. The research themes in 2020 focused more on the payment system, 
the risk of the current banking system, and the benefits for private sectors when CBDC is issued. Meanwhile, from 2021 to February 
2022, the design (national or universal CBDC) and technology choices of CBDC (blockchain-based or account-based) are the focused 
research themes, together with some early discussion on critical regulatory issues of CBDC. 
The number of publications for each year is also presented to see the development of the research areas over time (Fig. 2). We could 
see that the ideas of CBDC could be traced backed long time ago but until 2018, the research on CBDC seems to be not in the main 
stream and mostly ignored. Since 2018, CBDC topic has started to get attention following the emergence of private digital currencies, 
especially Bitcoin as the most prominent private cryptocurrency. From 2020 onward, the number of CBDC research has grown 
exponentially as more and more countries are starting to explore CBDCs. 
2.4. Topic modeling 
Topic modeling, as one of the most common text mining approaches, is an efficient and methodical way to analyze thousands of 
documents in a matter of minutes. Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) is a legitimate and extensively used topic model based on statistical distributions (Mcauliffe and Blei, 2007). LDA presupposes that in a corpus represented by a bag-of-words, there is an interchange of words and documents. LDA finds semantically related terms that appear in many texts in a corpus. These word lists, or 
"topics," are subsequently understood as meaningful "themes" by human intuition (Karami et al., 2018a). 
LDA has been used on both long-length (e.g., abstracts) and short-length (e.g., tweets) corpora (?) for a variety of applications, 
including health (Karami et al., 2018b; Webb et al., 2018), e-petitions (Hagen, 2018), opinion mining (Karami and Pendergraft, 2018), 
investigation of social media strategy and transportation literature (Sun and Yin, 2017). 
We regarded abstractions to be our documents, and the term “abstract” and “document” will be used interchangeably from now on. 
LDA gives a probability to each set of words in relation to each of the topics, as well as a probability to each of the topics in relation to 
each of the documents. In conclusion, LDA determines the association between topics and documents, P(T|D), and words and topics, P 
(W|T). LDA produced the following results for n documents (abstracts), m words, and t topics: the probability of each of the words given 
a subject, or P(Wi |Tk), and the likelihood of each of the topics given a document, or P(Tk|Dj). To represent the themes, the top words 
from each topic in decreasing order of P(Wi|Tk) were selected. In this study, the topic modeling is executed with bi-grams (two-words 
phrases), not the single word, to make sure that we get the maximum comprehension of the topic extracted. 
2.5. Topic analysis using network diagram 
Our primary goal is to comprehend how CBDC and related topics arise from existing literature. We employed an inductive technique (Kar & Dwivedi, 2020), which is generally used for theory creation. After summarizing key terms using topic modeling, we 
attempted to understand the emerging themes deeply using a network diagram of the key terms (Kushwaha and Kar, 2020). These 
network diagrams are essentially a grouping of key terms that co-occur with CBDC. The results of the networking exercise are shown in 
figures in the results sections of the network analysis. 
3. Result 
3.1. Topic modeling 
Fig. 3 presents the four most popular topics which are researched in academic articles in different timeframes, including from 1997 
to February 2022, before 2020, in 2020, and after 2020. In each topic, there are the top 5 bi-grams shown which have the most likely to 
be connected to each other and to the topic they are representing. Combining the results from topic modeling with a manual review, we 
could understand the development of researched themes over time in the CBDC topic. In general, for the whole period of the investigation from 1998 to February 2022, the four most popular topics in articles’ abstracts are (1) blockchain-based CBDC, (2) European 
CBDC and its effects on monetary policy and personal data, and (3) private digital currency and payment system, and (4) the definition 
of CBDC as a sovereign digital currency. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
6
Before 2020, the most frequent research themes about CBDC are (1) CBDC and fiat money for financial inclusion, (2) the definition 
of CBDC, privacy issues and monetary policy, (3) CBDC impacts on fiat money and payment system, and (4) CBDC and other private 
digital currency. In 2020, the research themes consisted of the main themes of (1) CBDC impacts on monetary policy and (2) technological design of CBDC and (3) impacts of CBDC on traditional banking systems. After 2020, the research themes are (1) national, 
universal and cross-border CBDC, (2) CBDC regulatory issue, and (3) impacts of CBDC on traditional banking systems. 
From the topic modeling analysis, we could see the development of topics of CBDC over time. Before 2020, studies on CBDC 
revolved around the introduction of definition of CBDC, the motivation of central banks to issue CBDC (financial inclusion), and 
relationship between CBDC and other digital currencies. Then, starting from 2020, it focused more on the technical sides and possible 
impacts when CBDC is implemented on a country’s financial and banking systems such as changes in current payment system, the risk 
of the current banking system, and the benefits for private sectors when CBDC is issued. Especially, from 2021 to February 2022, the 
cross-border option for CBDC exchange between countries are the focused research themes, together with some discussion on critical 
regulatory issues of CBDC. 
In addition, using the CTM algorithm for topic modeling, we run a robustness test for the results of topic modeling (Abstract 2). The 
CTM (Correlated Topic Model) algorithm is a type of topic modeling which uses probabilistic generative models to uncover latent 
topics from text data. It is based on a Bayesian approach which allows for the incorporation of prior knowledge about the topics and the 
relationships between them (Blei and Lafferty, 2007). This allows the algorithm to capture the correlations between topics and to 
generate more interpretable results. The CTM algorithm has also been used in a variety of applications such as document clustering, 
text summarization, and sentiment analysis. Results from Abstract 2 shows that CTM algorithm define very similar emerged topics 
compared to the previous results with LDA algorithm confirming the results of essential topics discussed in papers’ abstracts. 
3.2. Network diagrams 
As a robustness test for the topic modeling, we extended our analysis by using network analysis and the modularity algorithm. Each 
term plays the role of a node in the network, and the links show their connections to other terms. Based on the strength of the connections between terms, the modularity algorithm determines how a network can be divided into different modules (also called groups, 
clusters, or communities) (Blondel et al., 2008). Table 1 presents an overview of the statistics of the network. 
In total, 101 modules or groups of terms can be formed using the modularity algorithm. Using different colors to represent each 
module, Fig. 4 shows some of the largest modules with the most components in the network. The results of the network analysis 
confirmed the main themes extracted from the topic modeling analysis. We discovered the seven most discussed themes that have 
arisen in network diagram analysis. These seven themes are as follows: (1) central bank, (2) CBDC and other digital currency, (3) CBDC 
and money markets, (4) CBDC and monetary policy, (5) CBDC design and technologies, (6) CBDC and payment system, and (7) 
financial stability and regulatory. 
The above themes are elaborated as follows: 
3.3. Central banks 
Fig. 5 shows networks of terms in the central bank theme related to CBDC. Number of central banks’ CBDC projects have been 
mentioned in the literature including projects from China (Allen et al., 2022; Cheng, 2022; Shen and Hou, 2021; Li and Huang, 2021), 
Sweeden (E-Krona) (Kochergin, 2021; Peebles, 2021; Dostov et al., 2021) or ECB (Wagner et al., 2021; Nabilou, 2020; Groß et al., 
2020). Among them, the most popular CBDC projects mentioned as the role models is the e-CYN projects and the digital Euro from ECB. 
China’s central bank, for instance, aims to develop a digital version of the yuan based on a centralized CBDC mechanism. The Digital 
Currency Electronic Payment (DC/EP) initiative seems to use blockchain technology in part. The Swedish central bank has initiated a 
blockchain-based e-krona pilot program for the year 2020, with the second part of the project commencing in February 2021. The 
European Central Bank, the Bank of Canada, and others have also accelerated their R&D agendas. The Bahamas became the first to 
implement a blockchain-based CBDC in 2020 (PwC, 2021). Globally, according to a survey conducted by the Bank for International 
Settlements (BIS) in 2021, 86% of central banks are actively investigating the potential for CBDC, 60% are experimenting with the 
technology, and 14% are instituting trial programs (Boar and Wehrli, 2021; Soderberg et al., 2022). In addition, the PWC CBDC 
worldwide score (PwC, 2021) indicates that CBDC is not a novel idea. Since 2014, more than sixty central banks have investigated the 
Table 1 
The statistics of the network. 
Metric Value 
No.of nodes 1323 
No.of edges 2292 
Average degree 1.787 
Average Weighted Degree 1.836 
Network diameter 16 
Average path length 5.095 
Number of weakly connected components 82 
Number of strongly connected components 843 
Modularity 0.546 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
7
implications of CBDC. 
According to Fig. 5, other topics mentioned regarding to this theme are CBDC purposes or incentives, constrains and challenges, 
CBDC classifications or categories. In particular, regarding the central banks’ incentives and motivations to adopt CBDC, Kochergin 
(2021) divided it into three groups. The first group consists of nations where the CBDC launch may be planned to boost national 
demand for central bank money (Sweden, Norway, Singapore, etc.). The second group consists of nations that can afford to maintain 
national currencies in international settlements (the United States and the European Union) or to extend the use of national currencies 
at the international level (China). The third group includes nations where the use of digital currencies may be linked to the monetary 
policy implementation and financial inclusion or to tackle the de-dollarization of the financial system (Uruguay, South Africa, 
Cambodia, etc.). 
Regarding the choice on types of CBDC projects to implement, most of the current projects has pursued retail CBDC models. 
However, the number of wholesales CBDC projects is growing given their potential in international trading and payment sytemes in the 
future (Arauz, 2021; Kochergin and Yangirova, 2019). Especially, the pilot phase of e-CNY since 2021 from the People’s Bank of China 
has put many countries in a much more urgent situation to have their own CBDC infrastructures, given the importance of China in 
world trade. After the initial success with the retail CBDC domestically, China is now conducting cross-border wholesale testing in 
addition to its domestic usage. It has been collaborating with the Bank of International Settlements and Hong Kong, Thailand, and the 
United Arab Emirates on the mBridge project to construct a prototype for an interoperable wholesale CBDC (BIS Innovation Hub Hong 
Kong Centre, 2022). Given the current situation of cross-border CBDC, countries worldwide need to develop both retail and wholesale 
CBDC infrastructures to match the new world trade requirements with CBDC as one of the means of payment in the foreseeable future 
(Auer et al., 2020; Auer et al., 2021). 
Emerging economies such as Southeast Asian countries have proven to be fast in their CBDC development and implementation. 
Thailand and Malaysia’s CBDC projects have entered pilot phases. Cambodia officially launched its DLT-based CBDC in 2020 and has 
been testing cross-border digital currency payment with Malaysia (PwC, 2021). However, ASEAN countries have very different approaches to CBDC designs. Thailand is adopting wholesale CBDC, while other ASEAN countries such as Cambodia, Malaysia, and 
Vietnam are adopting retail CBDC. However, until CBDC projects aim to solve common issues such as more efficient payment systems 
or financial inclusion, the differences could be easily reconciled in the future (Bank of Thailand, 2021). In Africa, the Central bank of 
Fig. 4. All topics network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
8
Fig. 5. Central bank network diagram. 
Fig. 6. Digital currency network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
9
Nigeria has also been quick in its CBDC adoption compared to other regions (Boar and Wehrli, 2021). Nevertheless, there is currently 
no research about CBDC in this region, given the potentially huge benefit of CBDC for financial inclusion (Ozili, 2021) and economic 
growth (Erlando et al., 2020). 
Overall, it can be seen that the motivation to adopt CBDC for each country is different. It also appears that developing countries 
tend to speed up more vigorously in terms of researching, testing, and implementation to obtain financial inclusion or cross-border 
payments, while more advanced economies are motivated to introduce CBDC to enhance domestic payments efficiency as well as 
financial stability. Therefore, it is likely that there would be no one-size-fits-all CBDC development (Georgieva, 2022). Each country 
should have its own way of developing CBDC that is most suitable for its specific circumstances and requirements. 
3.4. CDBC and other digital currencies 
Fig. 6 shows networks of terms in the digital currency theme related to CBDC. The future of banking and finance can be potentially 
impacted significantly by the emergence of digital currencies. Especially with the fast development of blockchain technology, the 
financial world has evolved vigorously with both commercial banks and the central banks in many countries have expanded their 
services in accordance with the new trends in financial technology (Fintech). The term digital currency is not an exhaust definition but 
can be referred to the following terms: e-money, electronic money, network money, digital money, electronic currency, digital cash, 
electronic cash, e-cash, mobile money, and, more recently, crypto-currencies (Berentsen, 2005; Fabris, 2019). Alternatively, digital 
currencies can be categorized into private digital currency and public digital currencies (Gans and Halaburda, 2015). Regardless the 
provision of a digital currency is provided by the public sector or by a private initiative, the implementation of such new instruments is 
likely to provide a significant boost to the retail use of digital assets (Castr´en et al., 2022). 
It can be seen that the development of digital currencies encourage a cashless economy which can bring many socio-economic 
benefits, such as providing convenient means of payment, lower transaction costs, or enhancing transparency in payments, hence, 
mitigating money laundering and other crimes (Fabris, 2019). However, digital currency in the form of crypto-currency involving 
blockchain technology has raised serious concerns due to the threat of easing criminal activities such as money laundering, human 
trafficking, etc., tax evasion, and violation of capital controls. From the perspectives of governments and regulatory agencies such as 
the central banks, the private digital currencies are similar to the foreign currencies supply, which cannot be controlled (Rahman, 
2018). Another concern for the government is that due to the volatility in the prices of digital currencies, the price crash is possible 
with further consequences for both the economic situation as well as the well-being of the private citizens. 
Despite those concerns, private digital currencies appear to be increasing as payment instruments for end-users. In order to 
maintain the effectiveness of monetary policies as well as reinforce financial stability, central banks have to develop strategies to tackle 
this challenge. In the era when electronic devices and high-speed networks have become practically universal (Bordo and Levin, 2017) 
and the role of cash is gradually abolished, many central banks around the globe are considering the possibility of establishing digital 
currencies of their own, usually called Central Bank Digital Currency (CBDC) (Bech, Shimizu, & Wong, 2017). This new form of money 
is issued digitally by the central bank and serves as legal tender meaning it would function like the fiat money with a fixed nominal 
value and shall be valid as legal tender for transactions (Mancini-Griffoli et al., 2018). According to Nabilou (2020), issuing CBDC is the 
main innovative non-regulatory action that central banks can take as a strategy to provide an alternative virtual currency, which could 
aim at complementing, substituting, or otherwise exerting a competitive force on cryptocurrencies by leveraging on its price stability. 
However, the introduction of CBDC can be risky for the economy in certain aspects. In particular, issuing CBDC may result in the 
Fig. 7. Money market network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
10
banking sector instability, especially in times of crises, where businesses and households might switch deposits from their commercial 
bank accounts to their CBDC account with central banks, facilitating a bank run from bank deposits to the safe nest of the CBDC. As a 
result, the capability to supply credit of banks would be substantially restricted. Weakening such a function from the banking industry 
and granting the public direct access to the central bank balance sheet may potentially lead to the less efficient allocation of credit in 
the economy due to the centralization of credit allocation under the control of central banks. 
3.5. CBDC and money market 
Fig. 7 shows networks of terms in the money market theme related to CBDC. The significance of money markets can be explained in 
three aspects, which consist of the contribution to market efficiency and market discipline; the profound implication for financial 
stability as well as financing conditions of businesses and individuals; and the central role as an initial link of monetary policy 
transmission (Cœur´e, 2012). Well-functioning money markets not only provide liquidity to other financial markets and support an 
efficient payments system but also ensure an effective transmission of monetary policy across the financial system and to the real 
economy (Aziz et al., 2022; Cœur´e, 2012). 
With its unique characteristics, CBDC can have important implications in money markets such as the substitution effects which 
depend on the way CBDC is granted, which will affect different types of financial assets (Lober ¨ and Houben, 2018). For example, if 
CBDC is provided to individuals and designed as a non-interest bearing and an instrument for retail payment, it might primarily replace 
cash (as token-based CBDC) and commercial bank deposits (as account-based CBDC) (Lober ¨ and Houben, 2018). Meanwhile, a CBDC 
that pays interest and is readily transferable can be viewed as an alternative to money market funds or other short-term investments 
including treasury bills, reverse repurchase agreements, etc., and can be a liquid and credit risk-free asset facilitating final settlement. 
As a consequence, people may convert some of their investments in the money market into CBDC, which could lead to further redemptions for money market funds and worsen market illiquidity during the time of financial stress - when investors tend to move cash 
to less risky assets such as CBDC. Therefore, substitution effects will also be influenced by whether a CBDC is non-remunerated (as is 
cash) or paying interest at a fixed or adjustable-rate and whether that rate might possibly move with the policy rate (Lober ¨ and 
Houben, 2018). As a consequence, a CBDC attracting considerable demand as an investment or asset to hold may change the structure 
and functioning of funding markets, affecting both financial and non-financial corporations, both issuers and borrowers in money 
markets would face more challenges because a CBDC would be a substitution for such claims. Ultimately, those who issue claims 
brought by the central bank to accommodate demand for CBDC would be in a more favorable position. 
So far, there has been two strands of literature regarding the economic and financial implications of CBDC on money markets. On 
the one hand, the introduction of CBDC can have positive implications for the financial system, of which the money market is an 
important component. As the demand for cash weakens with time, issuing CBDC could help the sovereign money of countries maintain 
its role in sustaining the public confidence in payments by providing the reference value for all forms of private money (Jamet et al., 
2022). A CBDC could also improve capital allocation by facilitating access to payments and reducing transaction costs (Assenmacher 
et al., 2021; Keister and Sanches, 2021). Furthermore, CBDC’s presence can potentially enhance competition in banks’ funding 
markets by reducing banks’ market power (Andolfatto, 2021; Chiu et al., 2019). Consequently, in contrast with common opinions that 
CBDC can lead to the risk of bank disintermediation, some other research recently suggests that a CBDC can foster bank intermediation. 
Specifically, an increase in its remuneration would force banks to raise the interest on their deposits, leading to higher CBDC and 
deposit balances, hence, higher credit supply (Bindseil and Jablecki, 2013). As the use of cash declines, a CBDC provides an alternative 
to deposits and a floor on rates, limiting banks’ monopoly profits and encouraging them to increase lending (Auer and Bohme, ¨ 2021). 
On the other hand, experts have raised concerns about potential unintended consequences of a CBDC that can induce the outflows 
of money market funds as mentioned above, which could be made worse in times of financial stress. In a more technical aspect, Saito 
(2021) argued the role of CBDC, especially in the form of crypto-currency (CBCCs), potentially can have a significant impact on the 
nominal pricing system, including the price level and the nominal rates of interest. Based on the analysis of the quantity theory of 
money (QTM) and the fiscal theory of the price level (FTPL), the author shows that in a deflationary environment where bond interest 
has already been close to zero, strong money demand for central banks currencies, as well as ordinary money demand, may quickly 
disappear. From this study, there is concern that financial and economic crises could trigger the large-scale shift from private deposit 
currencies to central bank currencies. 
Within a similar research theme to Saito (2021), Jia (2020) implements a formal analysis to evaluate the macroeconomic impact of 
negative interest rates on CBDC from the point of view of a neoclassical general equilibrium model with monetary aggregates. The 
study shows that paying negative interest on CBDC motivates people to lower savings and increase consumption thanks to the substitution effect. In turn, a decrease in savings causes a drop in capital investment, hence lowering both output and real money balances 
(Jia, 2020). However, solutions to mitigate the risks can be considered by central banks, including limiting the yield of CBDC relative to 
other instruments or imposing limits on the amount of CBDC one can own as well as the speed at which a single party can accumulate it 
(FitchRatings, 2022). 
All in all, it can be seen that the introduction of CBDC can imply both positive and negative effects on the financial system of which 
money markets are an integral part. The current literature suggests that regulatory agencies need to ensure the proper design, as well as 
the supply of CBDC, would not lead to sudden changes or shocks for the money markets and the entire economy. 
3.6. CBDC and monetary policy 
Fig. 8 shows networks of terms in the monetary theme related to CBDC. The existing literature suggests two main views in regards 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
11
to the impact CBDC would have on monetary policy. The first group of opinions argues that the distortionary effects of CBDC on 
financial stability might be mitigated through appropriate policies, and thus, it would not directly affect the macroeconomic system 
and the monetary policy of the country (Nelson, 2018; Shirai, 2020). Therefore, digital currencies do not necessarily imply a risk to 
monetary or financial stability (Li et al., 2014) because they are unlikely to replace fiat paper currencies, hence, pose minimal risks to 
monetary policy (Nelson, 2018). 
However, the second group of scholars argues that CBDC entails a potential change in the monetary policy and the macroeconomic 
system (Bordo and Levin, 2017; Fiedler et al., 2019; Kim and Kwon, 2019; Kirkby, 2018; Meaning et al., 2018). One of the prominent 
studies by Barrdear and Kumholf (2016) points out that the implementation of CBDC would bring considerable changes to the real 
economy and the implementation of monetary policy. In particular, the authors argue the CBDC introduced through purchases of 
government bonds will be likely to increase real GDP by 3% (Barrdear and Kumhof, 2016). Based on this finding, the authors further 
suggest that one of the benefits that CBDC can bring is the gains in the effectiveness of the countercyclical monetary policy, particularly 
if a sizeable share of shocks is to the demand or supply of money, given the substitutability between CBDC and bank deposits is low 
(Barrdear and Kumhof, 2021). In line with this, Bordo and Levin (2017) advise that CBDC may lead to a deeper transformation of the 
monetary system as consumers are predicted to prefer CBDC thanks to its roles as a costless medium of exchange, a store of value, and a 
stable unit of account. 
In further to this, it is important to examine the impact of CBDC on price stability and inflation control, which are the key goals of 
monetary policy. Specifically, Meaning et al. (2018), with the assumption that the real value of CBDC can be held stable over time and 
would eventually contribute to price stability, suggest that CBDC would have a significant impact on the monetary system due to its 
influence on the monetary transmission mechanism (Meaning et al., 2018). Supporting this argument, Chen and Siklos (2022) show 
that economic history can be a source of information to estimate the possible impact of CBDC on inflation as the introduction of CBDC 
with the embed technology will raise the speed and frequency of cash-like transactions. However, the fashion in which CBDC can have 
a potential impact on inflation might be hard to predict as it provides governments and central banks with new tools to intervene in 
markets (Prasad, 2021). Ultimately, the impact of CBDC will be on a broad scale, including the relationship between governments and 
central banks as well as the relationship between the central bank and the financial sector. 
The impact of CBDC on monetary policy also largely depends on the system design for CBDC. For example, Davoodalhosseini 
Fig. 8. Monetary policy network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
12
(2021) describes a system that can implement the CBDC in which a debit card system is owned and monitored by the central bank, 
although its operations can be outsourced to other third parties such as fintech companies provided their low operational costs. Each 
individual can have an account with the central bank, which they can earn interest on top of utilizing these balances for buying 
necessities and services. The author argues that with such a system, the implementation of monetary policy becomes more transparent 
as it directly affects people’s decisions to carry balances rather than through the financial system (Davoodalhosseini, 2021). Additionally, with the varying aggregate supply of CBDC, it is most likely that CBDC would lead to more effective quantitative easing 
(Meaning et al., 2018). A classic limitation of monetary policy that has received significant discussion in the existing literature is the 
Zero Lower Bound constraint, i.e., where the interest rates are at zero, and when there is a need for lowering interest rates, the central 
bank cannot go below zero interest rate (Nabilou, 2020). In this context, some scholars say that CBDC would allow central banks to 
conduct a more effective monetary policy where CBDC would help central banks to impose charges on their digital currency, which 
evades the limitation of Zero Lower Bound on the nominal interest rate (Bordo and Levin, 2017; Dow, 2019). Similarly, Goodfriend 
(2016), Agarwal and Kimball (2015), Rogoff (2017), and Nabilou (2020) suggest that a CBDC could potentially make it easier to set a 
negative rate on central bank money and thus alleviate the lower bound on interest rates. 
Nevertheless, from another perspective, the difference in interest rates imposed on CBDC can lead to the switching behavior of 
people between CBDC and bank deposits (Meaning et al., 2018). For instance, when a monetary policy contraction is implemented, an 
increase in the rate paid on reserves would lead to an increase in rates paid on bank deposits and thus a decrease in the relative return 
of CBDC (e-cash as an example). This would make CBDC less attractive to hold and lead to a substitution of CBDC into bank deposits. 
On the contrary, a monetary policy expansion would have the opposite effect, making CBDC relatively more attractive and leading to a 
substitution from deposits into CBDC. These flows in and out of an e-cash CBDC could potentially be a source of instability in the 
banking sector (Gross and Schiller, 2021). 
Overall, it seems that current literature so far tends to support the argument that CBDC will exert a certain impact on the 
implementation of monetary policies and influence its transmission mechanism to the real economy. However, it’s important for policy 
makers to be aware of several risks involved while adopting CBDC as one of the unconventional monetary policy tools. 
Fig. 9. CBDC design and technologies network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
13
3.7. CBDC design and technologies 
Fig. 9 shows networks of terms in the CBDC design and technologies theme. Because, from the point of view of central banks, the 
effectiveness of CBDC creation depends on its design from the beginning, a major part of the included studies focuses on the technical 
characteristics of a hypothetical CBDC. For instance, a CBDC designed to provide a secure payments service could have a different core 
purpose than one used as solely a mechanism of monetary policy operation (Shen and Hou, 2021) and should have a very different 
technical core from one which is designed to combine monetary and payment functions at the same time (Agur et al., 2022). 
The decision to opt for a specific design can depend on whether that design can be validated on the blockchain, i.e whether an 
intermediary can verify the account holder’s identity, which lead to the debate between the choice of an account-based CBDC versus a 
token-based CBDC. In particular, a token-based CBDC might extend some of the characteristics and functionality of cash for retail 
transactions (Bhawana and Kumar, 2021; Han et al., 2021) and could be made readily accessible to the public (Adams et al., 2021). 
Universal access to this CBDC might be gained by a digital signature, and privacy will be guaranteed by default (Bhawana and Kumar, 
2021; Geva et al., 2021). The demand for cash plays a critical role in the attractiveness of CBDC and the choice of token-based CBDC or 
account-based CBDC (Agur et al., 2022; Khiaonarong and Humphrey, 2019). In nations where the use of cash replacements (such as 
cards, electronic money, and mobile phone payments) has reduced the need for physical cash, the demand for the central bank digital 
currency will be low. In contrast, if there are few alternatives to cash, the demand for digital money should be higher. McLaughlin 
(2021) stated that we are at the crossroad of choosing the future of money. 
Given the high popularity of cash usage among the public in emerging countries, token-based CBDC is currently a more popular 
choice for central banks worldwide (Atlantic Council, 2021) and also for academicians (Dashkevich et al., 2020). According to Atlantic 
Council (2021), the number of central banks that decided to choose distributed ledger technology (DLT) for CBDC (18 central banks) is 
more than three times the choices of the conventional centrally controlled database for CBDC (5 central banks). Table 1 summarizes 
the contents of the selected 22 studies concerning the technological features of CBDC designs in this literature review. Among these 
studies, there are 17 studies that pursue ideas of token-based CBDC with distributed ledger technology involved, and only one pursued 
the idea of non-blockchain token-based alternatives (Geva et al., 2021). 
Additionally, regarding the choice between the permission or permissionless blockchains architecture for CBDC, most studies 
suggest the use of a permission blockchain over a permissionless one (Bhawana and Kumar, 2021; Cukierman, 2020; Sun et al., 2018; 
Tian et al., 2019; Zhang and Huang, 2021). Current options for producing digital fiat currencies include RSCoin, Corda, and Quorum, 
among others (citation). Based on Bitcoin RSCoin is specifically built for central banks. Bank of England and University College London 
suggested RSCoin as a blockchain-based CBDC prototype system in 2016. It is one of the few public blockchain projects for CBDC till 
now. In contrast, Corda and Quorum are permission distributed ledger technologies built, respectively, on Bitcoin and Ethereum 
(Zhang and Huang, 2021). These projects’ primary application scenarios are intrabank payments, interbank payments, cross-border 
payments, and settlements. Recent studies are also concerned about the ability of interoperability between different blockchains 
(cross-chain) for cross-border transactions, which is most likely being one of the most crucial functions for digital money in the future 
(Han et al., 2021; Lee et al., 2021). 
However, blockchain-based CBDC also has problems such as efficiency, scalability, and cross-chain interoperability (Dashkevich 
et al., 2020; Zhang and Huang, 2021). Therefore, account-based CBDC is also a viable option in the future of digital money. A CBDC 
based on an account might be used by transferring claims registered on the account (Geva et al., 2021; McLaughlin, 2021). As CBDC 
can be a substitute for cash, especially in the context ofdepleted physical cash, it can helpreduce the costs associated with maintaining a 
cash-based economy (Bordo and Levin, 2017). These measures would deter tax evasion, money laundering, and other illegal activities 
(Arner et al., 2020; Pocher and Veneris, 2021). Furthermore, it is seriously considered by central banks (Arner et al., 2020; Murray, 
2019) as it may provide a more trustworthy real-time window on economic activity to exert impact on monetary policy (Geva et al., 
2021; Naheem, 2019). Particularly, McLaughlin (2021) argued that even though the digital currencies without central issuers have 
arisen as the potential future of money since 2008, the majority of real-world innovation in payments has occurred in the adoption of 
electronic money wallets by hundreds of millions of individuals and the FinTech revolution. 
Moreover, to balance the tradeoff between the privacy issue and anti-money laundering/anti-crime financing, researchers recently 
have proposed different architectures for combining both token- and account-based CBDC together in one implementation framework 
for central banks. For example, Bhawana and Kumar (2021) proposed the two-layered CBDC architecture in which the use of 
permission blockchain is most suitable in the wholesale CBDC between the central bank and the commercial banks and the token-based 
for end-users. Adams et al. (2021) also outlined a proposal for implementing CBDC based on open banking standards and supports both 
account-based and token-based CBDC models, transacting online and offline with immediate finality, while considering the European 
PSD2 requirements, including (multi-factor) strong customer authentication (SCA). 
Overall, due to the advantages and disadvantages for both token-based and account-based CBDC, it is crucial for central banks to 
have a proper design of CBDC that can balance different requirements across stakeholders such as privacy requirement for the users 
and reasonable level of control over individual’s account to combat financial crimes. In order to increase the adoption of CBDC among 
general public, it is suggested that significant benefits in the usage of CBDC such as ease of use, convenience, availability, and 
credibility should be considered (Jabbar et al., 2022a, 2022b). 
3.8. CBDC and payment system 
Fig. 10 shows networks of terms in the payment system theme related to CBDC. Publications regarding CDBCs from 1997 to April 
2020 pointed out that central bank holds monopoly power either establishing “traditional money” (i.e., Paper money) or digital 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
14
currency. Furthermore, the existence of another currency issued by central banks, i.e CBDC, can help facilitate a more diverse methods 
of payments in the economy, question that remains is about the difference between CBDC and physical money payment systems. 
Physical money system (paper currency and coin) is supplied from central banks into the economy through commercial banks and 
other financial institutions, which are intermediary channels enforcing the monetary policies of central banks. Despite that, once 
central banks establish their own digital currencies and accept them as digital legal tender, payment systems might change. 
The existing literature shows that there are two payment systems widely mentioned, namely one-tire and two-tier systems. The 
former is CDBCs accounts of a final user at central banks (Token-based system). It is similar to a physical money payment system in 
which customers’ account balance at central banks is equivalent to reserve accounts, but registration is open to the public (Nabilou, 
2019). With this system, customers can create digital wallets at central banks and use tokens to make transactions with other customers 
who also have CBDC at central banks. 
For the two-tier system, the first tier is among central banks, Commercial banks, and large Fintech companies (account- based 
system). Depending on the choice of each country’s Central bank, the third party can either be commercial banks or both commercial 
banks and Fintech companies. The second tier (token-based system) is where commercial banks and Fintech companies distribute 
CBDC to users and organizations through their channels or users’ digital wallets (Buckley et al., 2021). 
The token-based payment system based on blockchain technology might cause central banks to struggle with managing and 
identifying money laundry, tax evasion, and terrorism funding. Furthermore, by making it widely available, central banks will be 
overloaded and bear the risk of being hacked due to security flaws (Fantacci and Gobbi, 2021). Meanwhile, the account-based system 
will reduce the pressure on the technological infrastructure system and the need for high-quality human resources that are capable of 
applying highly complex central banks’ systems compared to directly using one-tier distribution systems from central banks to customers. For example, the two-tier payment systems that China has been implementing also have advantages allowing commercial 
banks and large Fintech can provide services more efficiently and effectively. 
Regardless of the payment system chosen, it should be noted that CBDC is still centralized despite different scales. This is the 
fundamental difference between CBDC and private digital systems (decentralized finance). With the account-based system of CBDC, 
centralization is much higher (not much different from the distributing system of physical money). With a token-based system, the 
Fig. 10. Payment system network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
15
change in the supply of CBDC revolves around central banks, but transaction settlement of CBDC remains decentralized (Bech and 
Garratt, 2017). 
In developing countries, the launch of a centralized-finance payment system for CBDC will help more people with low income, 
especially those in rural areas can access to banking services more effectively, thus, enhance financial inclusion. On the other hand, a 
centralized finance system is only effective in the short term because once a country accepts crypto currencies as ledger currency, 
central banks should switch to a semi-centralized model (Buckley et al., 2021). 
The choice of a suitable payment system, however, depends on whether central banks would want to replace or provide an 
additional means of cash entirely. It also depends on whether the CBDC holders as users or legal ones, or both (Soderberg, ¨ 2019). 
Research has also shown that whatever choice is made on payment systems, CBDC can hardly replace physical money in international 
transactions (Fantacci and Gobbi, 2021). Even China has only allowed payments using CBDC domestically yet internationally. To use 
CBDC in international transactions, agreements must be met, and a committee managing policies and regulations among central banks 
from different countries with other banking organizations (such as IMF, IFC) (Kuehnlenz et al., 2022a, 2022b) and multilateral organizations (such as WTO) must be formed (Fantacci and Gobbi, 2021). However, researchers have also pointed out that digital 
currencies, either private (i.e., Libra) or public (CBDC), are being considered more of a payment method than physical money (Belke & 
Beretta, 2020). 
3.9. Regulation and financial stability 
Fig. 11 shows networks of terms in the financial stability and regulatory theme related to CBDC. The trend of the private sector 
issuing and circulating digital currency as a means of payment has presented a challenge to central banks to control money laundering 
activities and illegal transactions. Attributing the responsibilities of financial institutions and the companies providing financial 
services in controlling money laundering is also difficult. To solve the problem, central banks need to change to adapt to the situation in 
the market. Besides the revolution in the mode of controlling monetary policies, central banks issuing their own digital currencies is a 
way to control the flow of payment using digital currencies (Kovanen, 2019). 
For the account-based payment system, commercial banks transfer the commercial bank’s deposit to CBDC accounts at the central 
Fig. 11. Financial stability and regulatory network diagram. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
16
banks. CBDC would become the resource of central banks and can be converted to physical money at a certain exchange rate (Fiedler 
et al., 2019). This payment system would create instability in the financial system (Belke and Beretta, 2020). In case the commercial 
banks want to improve liquidity, they need to restructure their assets (e.g., selling their receivables). Besides, when deposits are 
transferred directly to CBDC accounts, central banks become both the monitoring agencies and the ones that mobilize capital 
competing against the commercial banks. Therefore, it is difficult to separate the roles of supervising commercial banks and currency 
trading (Belke and Beretta, 2020). Meanwhile, it is necessary to separate these roles of the central banks, even when the central banks 
have their own digital currencies (Ovchinnikova and Kursevich, 2018). 
Another issue that raises the concern of researchers is financial instability when using digital currencies, especially when using the 
two-tier payment system. Using CBDC to lower the entry barriers to the industry providing financial services, many fintech companies 
provide services similar to those of banks, with more advanced technologies. The borders separating financial institutions, markets, 
and financial service providers are not clearly set. Recognizing digital currencies as a means of payment, central banks need to change 
their control and supervising mechanisms of commercial banks, from the regulations for currency service providers to specific regulations on the activities of currency trading (Kovanen, 2019). 
However, there are contrasting opinions about the impact of the two-tier payment system on the financial system and the regulation 
of central banks. When the nonbank institutions can deposit as well as directly borrow CBDC from central banks, the deposits of banks 
and non-banks can be considered as reserves at the central banks. The central banks would pay interest for the reserves. Therefore, 
when lending interests on the market are lower than that of the central banks paying for the reserves, the financial intermediaries 
would lower the lending volume to their customers. So, in order to regulate and control the supply of money, central banks can alterthe 
interest rate of CBDC, hence, improve the effectiveness of interest rate tool as a tool for monetary policy. Besides, CBDC will provide a 
new financial asset for central banks. The operating mechanism of CBDC is not credit and debit but the reserves (Habib et al., 2020). 
The central banks can apply different interest rates to the volumes of reserves to achieve the desired volume (Bindseil, 2020). At 
European central banks, they would suggest a reserve ceiling, and when the reserve balance is close to the ceiling, the interest rate is 
high, and vice versa when the volume of the reserve is low, the interest rate is low, and even penalties are applied if the reserve is too 
low compared to the ceiling. By doing so, central banks can establish a payment system for even the retail payment services while still 
being able to encourage the significant institutions to maintain a high level of reserve. However, the interest rate for the reserve can be 
low, but it should not be below zero percent, so the CBDC accounts can be a payment channel at the same time do not create a too big 
flow of deposits from intermediaries to central banks. Thus, with regulating mechanism considering commercial banks and fintech 
accounts at central banks as a reserve, central banks’ payment and adjustment of interest rates as per the balances of reserve accounts 
would contribute to financial stability and improve their neutrality. With this mechanism, central banks can conduct their monetary 
policies and can set the interest rates below zero percentif necessary (Cullen, 2021). 
Another option is the approval of central banks for Fintech to open an account at the central banks and provide electronic wallet 
services to the customers. Hence, the private sector can participate in the process of money trading at central banks. This payment 
system improves market efficiency and decreases the monopolistic power of the big financial institutions and financial stability 
(Cullen, 2021). 
With the token-based payment system, central banks manage CBDC accounts of individual customers and institutions through the 
electronic wallet. Commercial banks, financial institutions, and Fintech also use its infrastructure of payment technology to provide 
services to retail and corporate clients. Therefore, the customers would have more options (European Banking Authority, 2018). 
Besides, the token-based payment system, CBDC, instead of putting pressure on the financial system, would decrease the market power 
of giant financial institutions, contributing to financial stability. This payment system can also decrease the pressure of huge electronic 
accounts of clients at central banks and improve the neutrality of the central banks (Auer and Bohme, ¨ 2020). In order to ensure the 
stability of the financial market, central banks of several countries (i.e., E.U.) have promulgated policies (e.g., digital finance strategy 
in the E.U.) to make sure that the people can access the innovative financial products and ensure the safety for the users and stabilize 
national finance (European Commission, 2020). However, if there is an incident where the people convert physical money to CBDC at 
central banks or otherwise transfer CBDC at central banks to physical money in commercial banks at a huge volume, it would result in 
financial instability (Belke and Beretta, 2020). 
However, it is challenging to design an optimal model of payment system and similar legal regulations for commercial banks when 
applying CBDC. The selection of the model depends on a country’s economic development and the development of its financial systems. In countries with better operation capabilities and advanced technological infrastructure to conduct a high volume of daily 
transactions, it is more reasonable to apply a one-tier payment system and implement the regulations to effectively monitor this 
payment system (Buckley et al., 2021). However, when CBDC utilizes a one-tier payment system, central banks would likely compete 
against commercial banks and other intermediaries. Being both a regulator and transaction facilitator, the policies of central banks 
would tend to lack neutrality. When improving the competition between central banks and commercial banks, central banks would not 
completely play the role of the bank of banks; financial instability would be more likely if a certain bank cannot survive under the 
pressure of competition. With the points mentioned above, a feasible model for central banks when using CBDC is the wholesale 
payment system in which central banks issue CBDC to the commercial banks and fintech companies. Commercial banks and Fintech 
companies then distribute CBDC to the customers through the network of the distribution system and their technologies (Buckley et al., 
2021). 
3.10. Discussion, implications and knowledge gaps for further research 
The move towards an economy with the presence of CBDC has gained momentum. Nearly a hundred countries are now researching, 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
17
testing, and distributing CBDC to the general public (Georgieva, 2022). For example, in China, the digital China Yuan (e-CNY) has 
reached a hundred million individual users with the value of billions of yuan in transactions. In the U.S, President Biden signed the 
Executive Order that directs the U.S. Government to assess the technological infrastructure and capacity needs for a potential U.S. 
CBDC as well as encourages the Federal Reserve to continue its research, development, and assessment efforts for a U.S. CBDC (The 
White House, 2022). There are some key highlights drawn from our comprehensive review of the most commonly discussed themes in 
the existing literature about CBDC that can be served as the foundation for further discussion and research. 
First, the motivation to adopt CBDC for each country is different. It also appears that developing countries tend to speed up more 
vigorously in terms of researching, testing, and implementation to obtain financial inclusion or cross-border payments, while more 
advanced economies are motivated to introduce CBDC to enhance domestic payments efficiency as well as financial stability. 
Therefore, it is likely that there would be no one-size-fits-all CBDC development (Georgieva, 2022). Each country should have its own 
way of developing CBDC that is most suitable for its specific circumstances and requirements. Therefore, a research direction will 
continue to be fruitful is the determination of specific factors influencing the adoption of CBDC among different countries since so far 
the number of studies on this strand of literature has still been very limited (Ngo et al., 2022; Mou et al., 2021). 
Second, issuing CBDC is the main innovative non-regulatory action that central banks can take as a strategy to provide an alternative virtual currency, which could aim at complementing, substituting, or otherwise exerting a competitive force on private cryptocurrencies by leveraging on its price stability. However, the introduction of CBDC can be risky for the economy, i.e facilitating a bank 
run from bank deposits to the safe nest of the CBDC. Accordingly, the capability to supply credit of banks would be substantially 
restricted as a consequence of the bank run and granting the public direct access to the central bank balance sheet may potentially lead 
to the less efficient allocation of credit in the economy due to the centralized control of central banks regarding credit allocation. In the 
absence of empirical data, it is suggested that more studies with simulation methods to quantify the potential impact of CBDC on the 
economy and on banking sector should be encouraged to ensure the best possible outcome as well as mitigating potential risks related 
to the introduction of CBDC. 
Third, it can be seen that the introduction of CBDC can imply both positive and negative effects on the financial system of which 
money markets are an integral part. The current literature suggests that regulatory agencies need to ensure the proper design, as well as 
the supply of CBDC, would not lead to sudden changes or shocks for the money markets and the entire economy. In addition, it seems 
that current literature so far tends to support the argument that CBDC will exert a certain impact on the implementation of monetary 
policies and influence its transmission mechanism to the real economy. Therefore, we suggest that studies focus on examining risks 
involved while adopting CBDC as one of the unconventional monetary policy tools would be helpful for central banks in this process. 
Forth, in terms of technology applied, the most commonly used technology to develop CBDC is the Distributed Ledger Technology 
(DLT) which is considered to be highly secure as they are decentralized, immutable, and hence, highly transparent. Although there are 
different forms of DLTs, the decentralized nature of this technology allows for global and anonymous transactions (Ellul et al., 2020). 
Therefore, it is crucial for governments and regulatory agencies to have a proper design of CBDC that can have a balance between 
ensure the privacy for end users and at the same time maintain a reasonable level of control over individual’s account to combat 
financial crimes. We suggest that more future research on factors that can offset negative perception of general public related to the 
disclosure of personal information can be helpful in fostering CBDC’s adoption. 
Fifth, the existing theme of CBDC and the payment system shows that both one-tier and two-tier payment have their own advantages and disadvantages. Therefore, it is challenging to design an optimal model of payment system and similar legal regulations 
for commercial banks when applying CBDC. The selection of the model depends on a country’s economic development and the 
development of its financial systems. The choice of a suitable payment system also depends on whether central banks would want to 
replace cash entirely or only provide CBDC as a complement to cash. Moreover, regardless of the choice to be made, CBDC can hardly 
replace physical money in international transactions (Fantacci and Gobbi, 2021). To use CBDC in international transactions, agreements must be met, and a committee managing policies and regulations among central banks from different countries with other 
banking organizations (such as IMF, IFC) and multilateral organizations (such as WTO) must be formed (Fantacci and Gobbi, 2021). 
Last but not least, the introduction of CBDC can have an impact on a country’s financial stability. To avoid the potential financial 
instability, the central bank needs to conduct research on the selection of an appropriate payment mechanism and accordingly adjust 
policies and regulations regarding the organization of payment operation and supervision of banks’ payment activities. In further to 
this, policymakers should develop a strong and secure technology infrastructure as well as high-quality human capital to ensure the 
smooth operation of the decentralized financial technology system. 
4. Conclusion 
Returning to the initial question regarding whether a digital money system, especially the central bank digital currency (CBDC), 
can be a viable replacement or complement for a central bank’s conventional money issuance and circulation, this study casts some 
light on addressing this question by systematically reviewing literature in the topic related to CBDC using text mining approach. Using 
191 abstracts of journals and conference articles on Scopus database related to CBDC topic collected until Feb 2022, with frequency 
analysis of terms occurrence and topic modeling, we found that the most common CBDC themes explored among scholars are (1) 
central bank, (2) CBDC and other digital currency, (3) CBDC and money markets (4) CBDC and monetary policy, (5) CBDC design and 
technologies, (6) CBDC and payment system, and (7) financial stability and regulatory. 
Thanks to the powerful text-mining technique, we also acknowledged that topics investigated about CBDC have significantly 
changed over time since 2020. Specifically, the research themes about CBDC up until 2020 have evolved from less diverse and basic 
themes such as CBDC as an alternative to cash to more diverse research dimensions of CBDC that include the impact of CBDC in 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
18
different aspects, technically, socially and economically, from 2020 onward. From the systematic reviews, we provided some discussion and suggested a number of knowledge gaps in Section 3 which could be used as guidance for future research direction on the 
CBDC topic, ranging from determining specific factors influencing the adoption of CBDC among different countries; examining risks 
involved while adopting CBDC as one of the unconventional monetary policy tools would be helpful for central banks in this process; or 
CBDC development technology and CBDC implementation process to the economic policy implications for governments and regulatory 
agencies, to research on factors that can offset negative perception of general public related to the disclosure of personal information 
can be helpful in fostering CBDC’s adoption. Additionally, CBDC implementation will likely require infrastructure, social and political 
acceptance, environmental sustainability, and addressing privacy issues (Elsayed and Nasir, 2022). 
All in all, it can be seen that the history of money is turning into a new chapter. Countries are seeking the balance between preserving critical aspects of the conventional monetary and financial systems while exploring new digital forms of money. Throughout 
the literature, it is essential to note that CBDC is like a double sword, which can have both positive and negative impacts on the 
financial system and the economy as a whole depending on the way it is designed, implemented, and introduced. Finding a delicate 
balance between the design developments and policy considerations is crucial for governments to both achieve targets like financial 
inclusion and avoid undesirable effects such as a sudden change in the financial system that could hinder financial stability. 
CRediT authorship contribution statement 
Yen Hoang Hai: Methodology, Conceptualization, Formal analysis, Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing, Supervision. Vu Minh Ngo: Methodology, Formal analysis, Investigation, Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing, Visualization, 
Supervision. Ngoc Binh Vu: Methodology, Formal analysis, Investigation, Writing – original draft, Writing – review & editing. 
Data Availability 
Data will be made available on request. 
Acknowledgement 
This research is funded by University of Economics Ho Chi Minh City, Vietnam (UEH); Grant ID no. 2022-05-30-1007. 
Appendix A. Supporting information 
Supplementary data associated with this article can be found in the online version at doi:10.1016/j.ribaf.2023.101889. 
References 
Adams, M., Boldrin, L., Ohlhausen, R., Wagner, E., 2021. An integrated approach for electronic identification and central bank digital currencies. J. Paym. Strategy 
Syst. 15 (3), 287–304. 〈https://www.ingentaconnect.com/content/hsp/jpss/2021/00000015/00000003/art00007〉. 
Agarwal, R., & Kimball, M. (2015). Breaking through the zero lower bound: International Monetary Fund. 
Agur, I., Ari, A., Dell’Ariccia, G., 2022. Designing central bank digital currencies. J. Monet. Econ. 125, 62–79. https://doi.org/10.1016/J.JMONECO.2021.05.002. 
Algå, ¨ A., Eriksson, O., Nordberg, M., 2020. Analysis of scientific publications during the early phase of the COVID-19 pandemic: topic modeling study. J. Med. Internet 
Res. 22 (11), e21559. 
Allen, F., Gu, X., Jagtiani, J., 2022. Fintech, cryptocurrencies, and CBDC: financial structural transformation in China. J. Int. Money Financ. 124, 102625 https://doi. 
org/10.1016/J.JIMONFIN.2022.102625. 
Allen, S., Capkun, S., Eyal, I., Fanti, G., Ford, B., Grimmelmann, J., … Zhang, F. (2020). Design Choices for Central Bank Digital Currency: Policy and Technical 
Considerations. 
Andolfatto, D., 2021. Assessing the impact of central bank digital currency on private banks. Econ. J. 131 (634), 525–540. 
Arauz, A., 2021. The international hierarchy of money in cross-border payment systems: developing countries’ regulation for central bank digital currencies and 
facebook’s stablecoin. Int. J. Political Econ. 50 (3), 226–243. 
Arner, D.W., Buckley, R.P., Zetzsche, D.A., Didenko, A., 2020. After libra, digital yuan and COVID-19: central bank digital currencies and the new world of money and 
payment systems. SSRN Electron. J. https://doi.org/10.2139/SSRN.3622311. 
Assenmacher, K., Berentsen, A., Brand, C., & Lamersdorf, N. (2021). A unified framework for CBDC design: remuneration, collateral haircuts and quantity constraints. 
Atlantic Council. (2021). Central Bank Digital Currency Tracker. Retrieved May 23, 2022, from Atlantic Council website: https://www.atlanticcouncil.org/ 
cbdctracker/. 
Auer, R., & Bohme, ¨ R. (2021). Central bank digital currency: the quest for minimally invasive technology. Retrieved from. 
Auer, R., Cornelli, G., & Frost, J. (2020). Rise of the central bank digital currencies: drivers, approaches and technologies. 
Auer, Raphael, Haene, P., Holden, H., 2021. Multi-CBDC arrangements and the future of crossborder payments. Bank Int. Settl. 41 (2), 33–39. 〈https://www.bis.org/ 
publ/bppdf/bispap115.htm〉. 
Auer, R., & Bohme, ¨ R. (2020). CBDC architectures, the financial system, and the central bank of the future. VoxEU. org–CEPR’s policy portal. 
Aziz, A., de Roure, C., Hutchinson, P., & Nightingale, S. (2022). Australian Money Markets through the COVID-19 Pandemic. Retrieved from https://www.rba.gov.au/ 
publications/bulletin/2022/mar/australian-money-markets-through-the-covid-19-pandemic.html. 
Bank of Thailand. (2021). The Way Forward for Retail Central Bank Digital Currency in Thailand. 
Barrdear, J., Kumhof, M., 2021. The macroeconomics of central bank digital currencies. J. Econ. Dyn. Control, 104148. 
Barrdear, J., & Kumhof, M. (2016). The macroeconomics of central bank issued digital currencies. 
Berentsen, A. (2005). Digital Money, Liquidity, and Monetary Policy (originally published in July 1997). First Monday. Retrieved from https://firstmonday.org/ojs/ 
index.php/fm/article/view/1512/1427. 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
19
Bhawana, & Kumar, S. (2021). Permission Blockchain Network based Central Bank Digital Currency. 2021 IEEE 4th International Conference on Computing, Power 
and Communication Technologies, GUCON 2021. https://doi.org/10.1109/GUCON50781.2021.9574020. 
Bindseil, U., & Jablecki, J. (2013). Central bank liquidity provision, risk-taking and economic efficiency. 
BIS Innovation Hub Hong Kong Centre. (2022). Project mBridge: Connecting economies through CBDC. 
Blei, D.M., Lafferty, J.D., 2007. A correlated topic model of science. Ann. Appl. Stat. 1 (1), 17–35. 
Blondel, Vincent D., Guillaume, Jean-Loup, Lambiotte, Renaud, Lefebvre, Etienne, 2008. Fast unfolding of communities in large networks. J. Stat. Mech.: Theory Exp. 
no. 10 (2008), P10008. 
Boar, C., Wehrli, A., 2021. Ready, steady, go? – Results of the third BIS survey on central bank digital currency. BIS Pap. 114, 77–82. 〈www.bis.org〉. 
Bordo, M.D., & Levin, A.T. (2017). Central Bank Digital Currency and the Future of Monetary Policy. https://doi.org/10.3386/W23711. 
Castr´en, O., Kavonius, I.K., Rancan, M., 2022. Digital currencies in financial networks. J. Financ. Stab. 60, 101000 https://doi.org/10.1016/j.jfs.2022.101000. 
Chen, H., Siklos, P.L., 2022. Central bank digital currency: a review and some macro-financial implications. J. Financ. Stab., 100985 
Cheng, P., 2022. Decoding the rise of Central Bank Digital Currency in China: designs, problems, and prospects. J. Bank. Regul. 1–15. 
Chiu, J., Davoodalhosseini, S.M., Hua Jiang, J., & Zhu, Y. (2019). Bank market power and central bank digital currency: Theory and quantitative assessment. 
Available at SSRN 3331135. 
Choi, K.J., Henry, R., Lehar, A., Reardon, J., Safavi-Naini, R., 2021. A proposal for a Canadian CBDC. SSRN Electron. J. https://doi.org/10.2139/SSRN.3786426. 
Cœur´e, B. (2012). The importance of money markets [Press release]. Retrieved from https://www.ecb.europa.eu/press/key/date/2012/html/sp120616.en.html. 
Cukierman, A., 2020. Reflections on welfare and political economy aspects of a central bank digital currency. Manch. Sch. 88 (S1), 114–125. https://doi.org/ 
10.1111/MANC.12333. 
Cullen, J., 2021. Economically inefficient and legally untenable”: constitutional limitations on the introduction of central bank digital currencies in the E.U. J. Bank. 
Regul. 2021 23:1 23 (1), 31–41. https://doi.org/10.1057/S41261-021-00162-4. 
Dashkevich, N., Counsell, S., Destefanis, G., 2020. Blockchain application for central banks: a systematic mapping study. IEEE Access 8, 139918–139952. https://doi. 
org/10.1109/ACCESS.2020.3012295. 
Davoodalhosseini, S.M., 2021. Central bank digital currency and monetary policy. J. Econ. Dyn. Control, 104150. 
Dostov, V., Pimenov, P., Shoust, P., Krivoruchko, S., & Titov, V. (2021, December). Comparison of the Digital Ruble Concept with Foreign Central Bank Digital 
Currencies. In 2021 4th International Conference on Blockchain Technology and Applications (pp. 70–75). 
Dow, S., 2019. Monetary reform, central banks, and digital currencies. Int. J. Political Econ. 48 (2), 153–173. 
Ellul, J., Galea, J., Ganado, M., Mccarthy, S., Pace, G.J., 2020. October). Regulating Blockchain, DLT and Smart Contracts: a technology regulator’s perspective, (Vol. 
21,. ERA Forum, pp. 209–220. 
Elsayed, A.H., Nasir, M.A., 2022. Central bank digital currencies: an agenda for future research. Res. Int. Bus. Financ. 62 (August), 101736 https://doi.org/10.1016/j. 
ribaf.2022.101736. 
Erlando, A., Riyanto, F.D., Masakazu, S., 2020. Financial inclusion, economic growth, and poverty alleviation: evidence from eastern Indonesia. Heliyon 6 (10), 
e05235. https://doi.org/10.1016/J.HELIYON.2020.E05235. 
European Banking Authority (2018). Report on the impact of Fintech on incumbent credit institutions’ business models. Retrieved from https://www.eba.europa.eu/ 
file/28458. 
European Commission (2020). Communication from the Commission to the European Parliament, The Council, the European Economic and Social Committee and the 
Committee of the Regions on a Digital Finance Strategy for the E.U. Retrieved from https://eur-lex.europa.eu/legal-content/EN/TXT/?uri=CELEX:52020AE4935. 
Fabris, N., 2019. Cashless society–the future of money or a utopia? J. Cent. Bank. Theory Pract. 8 (1), 53–66. 
Fantacci, L., & Gobbi, L. (2021). Stablecoins, Central Bank Digital Currencies and U.S. Dollar Hegemony. Accounting, Economics, and Law: A Convivium. 
Fiedler, S., Gern, K.-J., & Stolzenburg, U. (2019). The Impact of Digitalisation on the Monetary System. ECON Committee Monetary Dialogue Papers. 
Fiedler, S., Gern, K.J., Stolzenburg, U., 2019. The Impact of Digitalisation on the Monetary System. Study for the Committee on Economic and Monetary Affairs. Policy 
Department for Economic, Scientific and Quality of Life Policies, European Parliament. 
FitchRatings. (2022). U.S. Federal Reserve Digital Currency Could Impact Money Market Funds. Retrieved from https://www.fitchratings.com/research/fund-assetmanagers/us-federal-reserve-digital-currency-could-impact-money-market-funds-15–03-2022. 
Gans, J.S., Halaburda, H., 2015. Some economics of private digital currency. Econ. Anal. Digit. Econ. 257–276. 
Georgieva, K., 2022. The Future of Money: Gearing up for Central Bank Digital Currency. International Monetary Fund. https://www.imf.org/en/News/Articles/2022/ 
02/09/sp020922-the-future-of-money-gearing-up-for-central-bank-digital-currency. 
Geva, B., Grünewald, S.N., Zellweger-Gutknecht, C., 2021. The e-banknote as a ‘banknote’: a monetary law interpreted. Oxf. J. Leg. Stud. 41 (4), 1119–1148. https:// 
doi.org/10.1093/OJLS/GQAB019. 
Goodfriend, M. (2016). The case for unencumbering interest rate policy at the zero bound. Paper presented at the Jackson Hole Economic Policy Symposium. 
Gross, J., & Schiller, J. (2021). A model for central bank digital currencies: Implications for bank funding and monetary policy. Available at SSRN 3721965. 
Groß, J., Klein, M., Sandner, P., 2020. Central bank digital currencies: benefits, risks and the role of blockchain technology. Wirtschaftsdienst 100 (7), 545–549. 
Habib, M.M., et al., 2020. The fundamentals of safe assets. J. Int. Money Financ. 102, 102119. 
Han, J., Kim, J., Youn, A., Lee, J., Chun, Y., Woo, J., & Hong, J.W. K. (2021). Cos-CBDC: Design and Implementation of CBDC on Cosmos Blockchain. 2021 22nd AsiaPacific Network Operations and Management Symposium, APNOMS 2021, 303–308. https://doi.org/10.23919/APNOMS52696.2021.9562672. 
Hao, T., Chen, X., Li, G., Yan, J., 2018. A bibliometric analysis of text mining in medical research. Soft Comput. 22 (23), 7875–7892. 
Hashimoto, K., Kontonatsios, G., Miwa, M., Ananiadou, S., 2016. Topic detection using paragraph vectors to support active learning in systematic reviews. J. Biomed. 
Inform. 62, 59–65. 
Jabbar, A., Geebren, A., Hussain, Z., Dani, S., Ul-Durar, S., 2022a. Investigating individual privacy within CBDC: a privacy calculus perspective. Res. Int. Bus. Financ., 
101826 
Jabbar, A., Geebren, A., Hussain, Z., Dani, S., Ul-Durar, S., 2022b. Investigating individual privacy within CBDC: a privacy calculus perspective. Res. Int. Bus. Financ., 
101826 
Jamet, J.-F., Mehl, A., Neumann, C.M., & Panetta, F. (2022). Monetary policy and financial stability implications of central bank digital currencies. Retrieved from 
https://voxeu.org/article/monetary-policy-and-financial-stability-implications-central-bank-digital-currencies. 
Jia, P. (2020). Negative interest rates on central bank digital currency. 
Karami, A., Lundy, M., Webb, F., Dwivedi, Y.K., 2020. Twitter and research: a systematic literature review through text mining. IEEE Access 8, 67698–67717. 
Keister, T., & Sanches, D.R. (2021). Should central banks issue digital currency? Available at SSRN 3966817. 
Khiaonarong, T., Humphrey, D., 2019. Cash use across countries and the demand for central bank digital currency. J. Paym. Strategy Syst. 13 (1), 32–46. 〈https:// 
www.ingentaconnect.com/content/hsp/jpss/2019/00000013/00000001/art00005〉. 
Kiff, J., Alwazir, J., Davidovic, S., & Farias, A. (2020). A Survey of Research on Retail Central Bank Digital Currency. 
Kim, Y.S., & Kwon, O. (2019). Central bank digital currency and financial stability. Bank of Korea W.P., 6. 
Kirkby, R., 2018. Cryptocurrencies and digital fiat currencies. Aust. Econ. Rev. 51 (4), 527–539. https://doi.org/10.1111/1467-8462.12307. 
Kochergin, D.A., 2021. central banks digital currencies: world experience. Mirovaia Ekon. Mezhdunarodnye Otnos. 65 (5), 68–77. https://doi.org/10.20542/0131- 
2227-2021-65-5-68-77. 
Kochergin, D.A., Yangirova, A.I., 2019. Central bank digital currencies: key characteristics and directions of influence on monetary and credit and payment systems. 
Financ.: Theory Pract. 23 (4), 80–98. 
Kovanen, A., 2019. Competing with bitcoin - some policy considerations for issuing digitalized legal tenders. Int. J. Financ. Res. 10, 4. 
Kuehnlenz, S., Orsi, B., Kaltenbrunner, A., 2022a. Central bank digital currencies and the international payment system: the demise of the US dollar? Res. Int. Bus. 
Financ., 101834 
Y.H. Hoang et al. 
Research in International Business and Finance 64 (2023) 101889
20
Kuehnlenz, S., Orsi, B., Kaltenbrunner, A., 2022b. Central bank digital currencies and the international payment system: the demise of the US dollar? Res. Int. Bus. 
Financ., 101834 
Kushwaha, A.K., Kar, A.K., 2020. Micro-foundations of artificial intelligence adoption in business: Making the shift. In: Re-imagining Diffusion and Adoption of 
Information Technology and Systems: A Continuing Conversation: IFIP WG 8.6 International Conference on Transfer and Diffusion of IT, TDIT 2020, Tiruchirappalli, India, 
December 18–19, 2020, Proceedings, Part I. Springer International Publishing, pp. 249–260. 
Kushwaha, A.K., Kar, A.K., Dwivedi, Y.K., 2021. Applications of big data in emerging management disciplines: a literature review using text mining. Int. J. Inf. Manag. 
Data Insights 1 (2), 100017. 
Lee, Y., Son, B., Jang, H., Byun, J., Yoon, T., Lee, J., 2021. Atomic cross-chain settlement model for central banks digital currency. Inf. Sci. 580, 838–856. https://doi. 
org/10.1016/J.INS.2021.09.040. 
Li, S., Huang, Y., 2021. The genesis, design and implications of China’s central bank digital currency. China Econ. J. 14 (1), 67–77. https://doi.org/10.1080/ 
17538963.2020.1870273. 
Lober, ¨ K., & Houben, A. (2018). Central bank digital currencies. Retrieved from https://www.bis.org/cpmi/publ/d174.pdf. 
Mancini-Griffoli, T., Peria, M.S.M., Agur, I., Ari, A., Kiff, J., Popescu, A., Rochon, C., 2018. Casting light on central bank digital currency. IMF Staff Discuss. Note 8 
(18), 1–39. 
Mantym ¨ ¨
aki, M., Wir´en, M., & Najmul Islam, A.K.M. (2020). Exploring the Disruptiveness of Cryptocurrencies: A Causal Layered Analysis-Based Approach. Lecture 
Notes in Computer Science (Including Subseries Lecture Notes in Artificial Intelligence and Lecture Notes in Bioinformatics), 12066 LNCS, 27–38. https://doi.org/ 
10.1007/978–3-030–44999-5_3/TABLES/2. 
Mcauliffe, J., Blei, D., 2007. Supervised topic models. Advances in neural information processing systems, p. 20. 
McLaughlin, T., 2021. Two paths to tomorrow’s money. J. Paym. Strategy Syst. 15, 1. 
Meaning, J., Dyson, B., Barker, J., & Clayton, E. (2018). Broadening narrow money: monetary policy with a central bank digital currency. 
Minesso, M.F., Mehl, A., Stracca, L., 2022. Central bank digital currency in an open economy. J. Monet. Econ. 127, 54–68. 
Mou, C., Tsai, W.T., Jiang, X., Yang, D., 2021. Game-theoretic analysis on CBDC adoption. BenchCouncil International Federated Intelligent Computing and Block 
Chain Conferences. Springer, Singapore, pp. 294–305. 
Murray, J., 2019. central banks and the future of money. SSRN Electron. J. https://doi.org/10.2139/SSRN.3369649. 
Nabilou, H., 2020. Testing the waters of the Rubicon: the European Central Bank and central bank digital currencies. J. Bank. Regul. 21 (4), 299–314. 
Naheem, M.A. (2019). Exploring the links between AML, digital currencies and blockchain technology: Journal of Money Laundering Control, 22(3), 515–526. 
https://doi.org/10.1108/JMLC-11–2015-0050/FULL/HTML. 
Nassirtoussi, A.K., Aghabozorgi, S., Wah, T.Y., Ngo, D.C.L., 2014. Text mining for market prediction: a systematic review. Expert Syst. Appl. 41 (16), 7653–7670. 
Nelson, B., 2018. Financial stability and monetary policy issues associated with digital currencies. J. Econ. Bus. 100, 76–78. 
Ngo, V.M., Van Nguyen, P., Nguyen, H.H., Tram, H.X.T., Hoang, L.C., 2022. Governance and monetary policy impacts on public acceptance of CBDC adoption. Res. 
Int. Bus. Financ., 101865 
O’Mara-Eves, A., Thomas, J., McNaught, J., Miwa, M., Ananiadou, S., 2015. Using text mining for study identification in systematic reviews: a systematic review of 
current approaches. Syst. Rev. 4 (1), 1–22. 
Ovchinnikova, N., Kursevich, V., 2018. Fedcoin-a blockchain-backed central bank cryptocurrency. Вестник Тульского филиала Финуниверситета 1, 452–453. 
Ozili, P.K., 2021. Can central bank digital currency increase financial inclusion? Arguments for and against. SSRN Electron. J. https://doi.org/10.2139/ 
SSRN.3963041. 
Peebles, G. (2021). Privatizing Cash: Currency and Public Goods in Sweden. Accounting, Economics, and Law: A Convivium. 
Pocher, N., Veneris, A., 2021. Privacy and transparency in CBDC: a regulation-by-design AML/CFT scheme. IEEE Trans. Netw. Serv. Manag. https://doi.org/10.1109/ 
TNSM.2021.3136984. 
Prasad, E.S. (2021). The Future of Money: How the Digital Revolution is Transforming Currencies and Finance: Harvard University Press. 
PwC. (2021). PwC CBDC global index PwC Global CBDC Index 2021. Retrieved from https://www.pwc.com/gx/en/industries/financial-services/assets/pwc-cbdcglobal-index-1st-edition-april-2021.pdf. 
Rahman, A.J., 2018. Deflationary policy under digital and fiat currency competition. Res. Econ. 72 (2), 171–180. 
Rogoff, K., 2017. Dealing with monetary paralysis at the zero bound. J. Econ. Perspect. 31 (3), 47–66. 
Saito, M., 2021. Central bank cryptocurrencies in a competitive equilibrium environment: can strong money demand survive in the digital age? Strong Money Demand 
in Financing War and Peace. Springer, pp. 161–189. 
Shen, W., Hou, L., 2021. China’s central bank digital currency and its impacts on monetary policy and payment competition: game changer or regulatory toolkit? 
Comput. Law Secur. Rev. 41, 105577 https://doi.org/10.1016/J.CLSR.2021.105577. 
Shirai, S. (2020). Growing central bank challenges in the World and Japan: Low inflation, monetary policy, and digital currency: Asian Development Bank. 
Soderberg, G., Bechara, M., Bossu, W., Che, N.X., Kiff, J., Lukonga, I., Yoshinaga, A., 2022. Behind the scenes of central bank digital currency: emerging trends, 
insights, and policy lessons. FinTech Notes 2022 (004). https://doi.org/10.5089/9798400201219.063. 
Soderberg, ¨ G., 2019. The e-krona–now and for the future. Sver. Riksbank Econ. Comment. 1–9. 
Sun, H., Mao, H., Bai, X., Chen, Z., Hu, K., & Yu, W. (2018). Multi-blockchain model for central bank digital currency. Parallel and Distributed Computing, 
Applications and Technologies, PDCAT Proceedings, 2017-December, 360–367. https://doi.org/10.1109/PDCAT.2017.00066. 
The White House (2022). FACT SHEET: President Biden to Sign Executive Order on Ensuring Responsible Development of Digital Assets. Retrieved May 24, 2022, 
from https://www.whitehouse.gov/briefing-room/statements-releases/2022/03/09/fact-sheet-president-biden-to-sign-executive-order-on-ensuring-responsibleinnovation-in-digital-assets/. 
Tian, H., Chen, X., Ding, Y., Zhu, X., & Zhang, F. (2019). AFCoin: A Framework for Digital Fiat Currency of central banks Based on Account Model. Lecture Notes in 
Computer Science (Including Subseries Lecture Notes in Artificial Intelligence and Lecture Notes in Bioinformatics), 11449 LNCS, 70–85. https://doi.org/ 
10.1007/978–3-030–14234-6_4. 
Valdez, D., Pickett, A.C., Goodson, P., 2018. Topic modeling: latent semantic analysis for the social sciences. Soc. Sci. Q. 99 (5), 1665–1679. 
Wagner, E., Bruggink, D., Benevelli, A., 2021. Preparing euro payments for the future: a blueprint for a digital euro. J. Paym. Strategy Syst. 15 (2), 165–187. 
Wang, Y., Lucey, B.M., Vigne, S.A., Yarovaya, L., 2022. The effects of central bank digital currencies news on financial markets. Technol. Forecast. Soc. Change 180, 
121715. 
Yau, C.K., Porter, A., Newman, N., Suominen, A., 2014. Clustering scientific documents with topic modeling. Scientometrics 100 (3), 767
